Is there a way to punish him?
to prevent such a thing from happening again
Or how long will it take to get the restaurant ready? Can I ask you?
At the annual meeting of Zhejiang University of Science and Technology, students sang the lead, and the research results made people's brains wide open - Xinhua News Agency
Washing hands with air, diagnosing diseases with breath, and pinpointing the source of smog with pinpoint accuracy. Last night, a series of brain-teasing academic achievements were awarded at the opening ceremony of the 2016 Academic Conference of Zhejiang University.
The main researchers of these achievements are students, and the research covers a wide range of fields, including environmental, mechanical, energy, medical, life science, humanities education, etc. Students started from a curious idea and created many high-value-added inventions with practical value, some of which have won awards at home and abroad.
Bio-sensors: Your family doctor
A team from the Biomedical Engineering College, led by Dr. Zhang Diming, demonstrated a bio-sensor on a smartphone, which is only half the size of a smartphone.
"All you need to do is take a deep breath, and the device can give you a preliminary assessment of your health based on the composition of your breath. "
Zhang Di Ming introduced that this set of sensors is connected to the smart phone, and the health report will be displayed on the phone after the gas is released.
Smart wristbands that can detect health conditions on the market can generally detect physical parameters such as temperature and pulse.
The bio-sensor uses a new material, graphene, and its target is chemical elements. Its "sensitive nose" can more deeply and accurately reflect the health condition of the body.
Intelligent surgical lights: the surgeon's high-energy eyes
In addition to smart phones, smart operating lights were also used in the operating room.
The invention won a silver medal at the 44th International Invention Exhibition in Geneva, Switzerland this year.
Zhu Linjing and Shen Junfei, graduate students from the College of Optoelectronics and Optoelectronic Science and Engineering, opened up a new idea in the defects of traditional surgical lamps, and invented the intelligent LED surgical shadowless lamp.
"Many diseases can be detected and cured early, but it has something to do with the light in the doctor's operating room. "
Shen Junfei said that for example, if the doctor cannot clearly see all the tumor tissues when doing early cancer detection, the cancer cells will still spread afterwards.
The smart surgical light has four light discs that can be adjusted to enhance the contrast of different tissues under light.
During the operation, the doctor can adjust the size, brightness, spectrum, color uniformity and shadow-free rate of the light spot at any time according to the needs of the operation and the habits of the patient.
This intelligent surgical light has been used in the Department of Medicine of Zhejiang University Affiliated Shaoxing Hospital, the Department of Medicine of Zhejiang University Affiliated Children's Hospital and other hospitals, and received good feedback.
Last October, the invention won the first prize of the National Challenge Cup.
Air-washing hands: save water and be cool
Ordinary people wash their hands with water, at most with some soap, and some hand wash liquid. Li Qizhang and his classmates invented a "air hand-washing device."
All we have to do is stand on the hand-washing station and our weight will compress the air out.
"It's like a firecracker.
The compressed air forms a fluid in the water tap, and it combines with the water.
That way we can get our hands clean!"
The color reaction and bacterial residue tests proved that the effect of this method of washing was the same as that of the ordinary washing method.
This device only needs to rely on our own gravity as the driving force, and can ensure the degree of cleaning and save 90% of water. The whole process is completely energy-saving and environmental protection.
Last year, the invention stood out among many world-class universities in the second Global Major Challenge Summit, and won the only gold award.
Please arrange for a refill as soon as possible, thx
Please cancel the order and return the cash, no points, and never use #PRS_ORG# again!
Bones and spicy pickled vegetables are not suitable for children to eat
If so, please order as soon as possible.
No, thank you
He told me to tell you where he was #PRS_ORG#
I didn't wait and cancelled the order.
I bought #PRS_ORG#, but I wrote the wrong address
Can it be changed?
or cancel the order
Okay, trouble.
A certificate that means a lot to me - the first aid certificate.
This is one of the skills certificates I feel is important beyond my driver's license!
To put it simply: emergency measures are actually emergency rescue measures in the event of an emergency, that is, rescue before the ambulance arrives.
It is well known that the ambulance takes some time to arrive after an accident, and that is the crucial time.
That's when you need to get help.
If I really did have a heart attack, stroke, or respiratory arrest, we only have four minutes, golden four minutes!
So everyone around you knows how important it is to know first aid!
When someone falls down around you, you can use your professional knowledge to help them, rather than standing there doing nothing and feeling helpless.
"In China, we have official figures of 300,000 accidental deaths every year, the most dangerous of which is sudden cardiac arrest.
Nationwide, it averages 15%.
In Las Vegas, 75 to 80 percent can be saved, and in Shanghai and Beijing, it's less than 1 percent."
This is what founder Lu Le said.
If someone has a heart attack, and they stop breathing, and they stop their heart, there's nothing you can do.
Only by artificial respiration and chest compression can people be saved.
I found that there are not many people who have this awareness to learn first aid, but when things happen, it is too late, so I still call on everyone to learn this skill, so that we can react in time when faced with emergencies.
Maybe it could save a life!
First aid certificates can be obtained at the local Red Cross training center. I took the course at the Red Cross training center in Zhuhai, and the students also have a discount.
PS: The last picture is my 25 before 25 list, adding CPR to the list was a few months ago, but I did it!
Then I plan to take other certificates I want to take, and I plan to take a diving certificate. I saw that there was a diving first aid certificate on Xiaohongshu, and I needed a first aid certificate to take the certificate. So the first aid certificate is still very useful!
I ordered #NUMBER#
One shrimp dumpling for 13 yuan!?
I haven't tried it
Why can't #NAME# understand?
For $13?
Yesterday #PRS_ORG# failed to deliver the food, but this time I was given a shrimp dumpling!?
Because obviously I saw that the code was valid when I entered it before.
To sum up, I personally think that "The Four Seas" is a rotten movie in all aspects.
But you have to say that this movie is not a highlight, at least the music selection is pretty good.
There are many kinds of bad movies, one of which is the one that puts you to sleep in the movie theater. Another is the one that leaves you fuming after you've seen it. "42" is like a monkey on Mt. Emei, it can light up your anger in countless ways.
In the matter of insulting the audience, Han Han is truly gifted.
The most painful thing about this movie is that it seems to be a creature from a K-novel, and it is difficult to describe, like the wind coat on Xiao Ma Ge.
Even after you've seen it, you wonder if there's some hidden meaning the director is trying to get across, but when you really think about it, it's just a pile of shit.
First, I'll try to explain some of the plot points that are hard for me to understand.
The boss's hometown should be a small island in the south, and he lives with his grandmother.
Her grandmother had one wish: to see snow, and so the plot was arranged for a neighbor to drive a small van and take her to see snow in the northeast.
Elderly people in a van from the south to the north to see snow?
He and his dad are also very comfortable with it.
Then the old man stopped speaking.
How did his brother get a license to run a hotel on a derelict ship?
Why can the scooter gang in the island easily block a mountain road in just a few minutes?
Then the truck delivering rebar in the middle of the road stopped, and nobody could find the truck driver.
It's too obvious to be a prop.
Why would a felon with a bad credit rating and a history of street racing end up as a reserve police officer?
Why didn't the police report the high-interest loans? The police even asked if there was a problem in the movie.
An adult knows how to use a smartphone, but doesn't know how to use a hotel room key card to open the door, and then forcibly arrange for the hotel owner to sleep outside the room?
The whole film is filled with this inexplicable plot, which makes me cringe every time I remember it.
Besides the plot, what is worse is that the film's theme, or rather, that the film has no theme, is a loathsome patchwork.
At first you think he's going to make a comedy, then you think it might be an inspirational movie, and by the time you've seen half of it, you think it might be a movie about how hard it is to make it as a young person in a small town, and by the time it's over, you don't really know what you just watched, and you're left with a lot of self-doubt, and you wonder why you went to the movies to watch poop.
For the most part, most people are pretty familiar with the tropes of all sorts of movies, like if you want to make a movie about a motorcycle racer, it's inspirational plus comedy, and then you tell the story of how a talented nobody becomes a success.
If you want to make a love movie, then you have to be honest and tell the story of the feud between the small town youth and the service staff girl.
If you want to reflect reality, then at least your plot shouldn't include things that don't happen in the real world.
(Like the new motorcycle that was just burned, and can still sing afterwards), you can't go to open some of the brain holes that Kennedy saw.
As for the heroine, who is not mentally retarded, but behaves like a 5-year-old in some aspects, I don't know if this is the result of the actress' acting or the director's requirements.
There's another thing I don't understand, Han Han, as a race car driver, why is he so eager to add a crash scene in his own movie?
Such a movie arrangement is in the Spring Festival, is it to give the audience a headache?
Application: T&D value encoder with battery box
Origin: Shenzhen, China
The size of the battery box is as follows:
The related baby products of A2 series are as follows:
CN1 connector CN1 signal I/O connection line CN1 terminal block brake resistor
Low-power encoder cable Medium-power encoder cable Low-power power line Medium-power power line
Low-power power line brake, high-power power line brake, encoder and power plug, servo battery box
1. We cooperate with the express company.
1）Cooperation with express delivery is based on Wangwang’s signature!
2) SF Express
2. Buyers who need the product urgently or have time constraints are advised to choose SF Express. SF Express is relatively assured, and payment can be made after the freight is changed.
3. Buyers have questions about the shipping fee charged by our store, and they can choose to pay for the extra shipping fee.
4. Bulky products are generally delivered by logistics. Please contact us separately.
1. Our shop supports 7 days return and exchange service. Due to the problems of product quality and quantity, our shop bears the freight.
2. Quality problems of non-products themselves, due to buyers choose the wrong model and other factors need to return and exchange, without affecting the normal use of the product and not affecting the secondary sales, our store supports free return and exchange service, round-trip freight and freight need to be borne by the buyer.
3. This store does not support the delay of express delivery to cause the need for return, and the seller needs to bear the freight demand.
4. Customized products are not eligible for return or exchange if there is no quality problem.
1. Is this the original product?
Answer: Any products that are not marked with the original factory brand are domestic substitutes.
2. Do you have a copy?
Q: Sorry, we do not sell fake products. The fake products have the same logo and packaging as the original.
3. Is domestic xxx produced in China?
Answer: Yes, the domestic ones are substitute products, not the products produced in China by the original factory, but they are all used domestically.
Professional provides domestic servo, PLC connecting cables, connectors and other peripheral accessories, mainly including servo encoder, power cable, control connector, power aviation plug, terminal block and cable, lithium battery, PLC program download line, connecting line and other accessories, brake resistor, local bus, wire cable, all accessories are strictly in accordance with Mitsubishi standard, professional engineers do it.
And we use servo and PLC to test the quality and durability of our products to ensure that we provide our customers with quality and durable products.
Please contact us for a quote!
The factory direct sales production, welcome the agent to wholesale!
Other lengths are available on request.
For more information, please contact the store.
If we just waive the tipping amount for you, what does that mean?
Can I do that?
I got it, but all three of my drinks spilled.
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment of the well wall brick module device:
Zhengzhou Yixin is a domestic concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment, inspection well block machinery, well wall body module machinery professional production factory, from semi-automatic to fully automatic production line.
After years of practice and development, it has now acquired high-quality products, mainly including hydraulic, mobile, and fully-automated check-well series equipment and supporting devices.
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in the well: Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment assembly site:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules of the well, and the characteristics and advantages of Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment:
Yixin checks that the brick making machine equipment is widely applicable to the new type of building materials for municipal underground construction such as coal, heat, water, electricity, gas and so on.
Such as drainage, water storage facilities, inspection holes, rainwater outlets, square pits, septic tanks and small constructions, bridge wing walls and so on.
The advantage of using concrete modules to build inspection wells is that the upper, lower, left and right sides of the modules are all concave and convex structures, and they are combined to form a chain lock.
The shear strength of the wall body is far superior to that of the plain friction masonry.
The modules are hollow-core structures, and the vertical holes of one module are connected with the horizontal holes of another module, and the core of the hole is filled with concrete, which plays the role of secondary reinforcement and waterproof.
Modules are provided with holes, and the horizontal tendons and vertical tendons are respectively increased in the overall strength of the structure.
In addition, the use of concrete to check the well module construction of the well, drainage well not easy to occur collapse, sinking, leakage and other phenomena, the well wall and wall module mechanical performance is stable, simple operation, standard forming size.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine device is equipped with data input and output devices, and a one-key touch screen LCD monitor is used to monitor the whole process of mechanical operation, realizing the ideal man-machine dialogue, automatic analysis of raw materials, density operation, safety logic control and fault diagnosis system.
The mechanical hydraulic system of the wall body module uses a single-cylinder hydraulic system for conveying and a double-cylinder hydraulic system for conveying.
The independent hydraulic integration station avoids the influence of the host vibration on the hydraulic system, and ensures the reliability of the hydraulic system operation.
The concrete inspection module brick machine equipment cloth box travel module box demoulding and rising, the storage box door closed, the automatic transport of the pallet, all of which are completed independently by the hydraulic system, so as to reduce the wear and maintenance of the machine.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment adopts imported computer, electrical appliances, sealing parts, hydraulic parts, and the comprehensive performance is stable and reliable.
The mechanical vibration platform of the wall body module is made of whole plate steel, and the surface is cut by numerical control flame cutting machine, so that the filling box can be freely guided, and the mechanical wear is reduced to the greatest extent.
Reduce the load of the mold, fill the filler and encrypt the amplitude of the two-in-one, use the integrated, all-synchronous, and the vibration of the table and the vibration of the mold to ensure that the real effect is achieved.
The vibration mechanism, the computer automatic control system and the amplitude adjustment according to the cost of raw materials are used to prolong the service life and reduce the cost.
The wall body module has double functions of automatic and manual control.
Inspecting the molds:
The inspection well of Yixin brick machine checked the mud bricks on the surface:
A corner of Yixin's workshop:
Inspection of concrete module production and processing equipment
Zhengzhou wall brick module equipment can not only produce check bricks, but also produce various standard bricks, hollow bricks and road flower bricks.
On the delivery site:
Chongqing Middle School of Vocational and Technical Education is trying out modern apprenticeships, Xinhua News Agency reported.
Yesterday, the reporter learned from the municipal education department that this year, my city will pilot the "modern apprentice system" talent training model in 60 secondary vocational schools. At the same time, the students who are accepted for trial training will have apprentice identity, and will be pre-registered as employees of the trial enterprises after enrollment.
The municipal education department requires that the enrollment and admission procedures of vocational schools be standardized, and that the dual identities of vocational school students and enterprise employees be clearly defined. The agreement between the apprentice, the school and the enterprise should be signed according to the principle of mutual choice. For apprentices who are 16 years old but not 18 years old, the agreement should be signed by the apprentice, the guardian, the school and the enterprise. The specific posts, teaching contents and rights and interests of the apprentice should be determined.
Encouraging pilot schools to adopt modern apprenticeship forms and cooperate with enterprises to conduct pre-employment and transfer training for enterprise employees.
The pilot schools must reform the talent training model.
The school and the enterprise jointly design the talent training plan, and jointly formulate the professional teaching standards, course standards, job standards, master standards, quality monitoring standards and corresponding implementation plans.
The trial period is one trial cycle, and the internship time of students in enterprises is determined according to the professional talent cultivation plan, and the top-level internship is generally for 6 months.
In the practice of enterprises, the enterprise group management mode should be implemented. According to the characteristics of different professions, one master can lead 2-5 apprentices to form a learning group to ensure that students master the skills required for each work station.
According to the arrangement, from 2016 to August 2019, our city determined three batches of 60 city-level modern apprentice training pilot projects, each with about 50 people, and trained about 3000 students (apprentices) in total.
According to the principle of first testing and then implementing, from point to face, we will explore the establishment of a long-term mechanism for school-enterprise joint enrollment, joint training and integration of education, so as to effectively improve students' job skills and improve students' employment rate and employment quality.
My app says it was delivered, but I haven't received it
Just ordered room service, I don't know if it was left at the door
Then call for re-delivery
I live in Shau Kei Wan, why would my order be delivered to Hoi King Garden?
Did you get the address wrong?
This vacuum cleaner has been considered for a long time, and it has been hard to cut the grass. The cleaning effect is good, and the dust in the home is significantly reduced. However, it is a little heavy to hold it with one hand. The wet vacuum cleaner needs to be improved, and there will be dust marks when going back and forth. Overall, it is very satisfactory.
The pressure cooker is very heavy, and it looks very high-end. It is suitable for me, a kitchen novice, and the child says that it is better than I can cook. I have done two meat and two vegetarian dishes, and the sweet and sour pork is particularly delicious. The time is long, and the other is very short. The noise is very small, and there is no need to worry about frying and no need to worry about not knowing how to do it!
When the goods arrived, I was eager to cook three dishes in the afternoon. It was really a science and technology to change life. The control of temperature and seasoning was precise. The taste of the dish directly upgraded to the level of a chef. It was good. For those who are not good at cooking, it is a godsend. I recommend that you buy it!
I've added a new member to the kitchen staff.
The smart cooking machine can automatically control the temperature and automatically stir-fry.
No more fear of getting burned by hot oil, no more fear of not controlling the heat well enough to brown or burn the food.
The food cooked in the street is much more delicious than what I made, and the tomato fried eggs are especially delicious, and the egg taste is very good.
This pot is a good buy.
It's good and worth buying, and it's very good
Overall, it was very good, very clear, and consistent with the description.
Worth having.
The service was also very good.
The screen is big, clear, eyes don't get tired, haven't found any other abnormalities
It is thicker than the mainstream display, and the bezel is a bit wide, and the gap between the bezel and the screen is a bit large, but the screen display effect is good, and the accessories are complete.
The delivery is fast!
The service was great!
After using it for a while, the quality is good, and the screen resolution is also very clear.
The IPO was a great success, 1 for 4, too good to be true
The delivery is fast, the things are good, and the second one is indeed a good thing. The picture quality is high, and it is not distorted because of the large screen. The interface is complete.
The experience is good, the colors are restored well, and the quality is good!
China Children's Center will hold a series of activities to let children "high-tech" celebrate Children's Day - Xinhua News Agency
On May 20 (Huang Xiaoxi, Zhou Shanshan), the reporter learned from the China Children's Center that from May 28 to June 1, the China Children's Center will hold a series of activities, including the Children's Creativity Experience, the Children's Visual Art Festival and the Parent-Child Book Culture Carnival, so that children can spend "Children's Day" in the charm of frontier science and technology.
It is understood that the Children's Center of China held activities during the Children's Day of this year, including the Children's Future Learning Carnival, the First Children's Visual Art Festival, the Book and Fragrance Carnival, and the All-Family Love Reading Book Series.
Li Zhongming, deputy director of the China Children's Center, introduced at the media conference on June 20 that the "Love, Create, Innovate" Children's Future Learning Carnival is the focus of the China Children's Center's celebration of "June 1" this year.
The activities aim to organically combine social innovation with family individual creativity, and through children and family participation to experience various innovation education activities, so that innovation practice becomes the cultural gene of the general family, and "doing it yourself" becomes the new learning and living way of the whole family.
It is reported that the "Love Home Create Cool" Children's Future Learning Carnival includes dozens of cutting-edge science and technology experience contents such as the "Bean Fruit Maker" experience activity, the anniversary celebration of the "Old Cow Children's Exploration Hall" and the "Exploration of the Whole Family Love Children's Love Six One" activities, the VR national experience plan, the "Creator Tribe" interactive workshop and other dozens of cutting-edge science and technology experience contents.
Change the Five-Flavored Meat Rice to the Five-Flavored Pickle Rice
Will I have to buy another $100 or $200 to use it?
Worried that it will take a long time to complete
Okay, thank you.
Is it from the same rider?
Can you follow up on this?
The restaurant said it had been cooking for half an hour
But no one took the food away from the rider.
South African doctor: Omicron's transmission power is strong, but most are mild
Many doctors and medical experts in South Africa believe that the disease caused by the Omicron variant is milder than that caused by the Delta variant, although it spreads faster.
According to Reuters, with the spread of the Omikron variant in South Africa, more than 5,000 doctors in the KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa reported that the symptoms of the patients they are currently treating for COVID-19 are relatively mild, such as body aches and coughs similar to those of flu.
Dr. Unben Pillay, the director of the organization, said he sees dozens of patients a day, but none of them have needed to be hospitalized.
"They can control the disease at home, and most people recover within 10 to 14 days of isolation," Pierce said.
He said it includes the elderly and those with health problems, who are more likely to fall seriously ill with the virus.
He said that compared to the previous Delta outbreak, his new coronavirus patients were "short of breath and had low oxygen levels.
Many will be hospitalized in a few days."
Within two weeks of the first report of the omicron variant in southern Africa, other doctors were sharing similar experiences.
While it will take several weeks to collect enough data, doctors' observations and early evidence have provided some clues.
According to the South African National Institute of Communicable Diseases, only 30% of the new coronavirus patients admitted to the hospital in recent weeks are severe cases, which is half of the proportion of severe cases in the first wave of the epidemic; the average length of stay in the hospital has been shortened from 8 days to 2.8 days; and only 3% of the recent new coronavirus patients have died, which is 20% in the early outbreak in South Africa.
Dr. Willem Hanekom, director of the African Health Research Institute, cited data and other reports from the National Institute of Communicable Diseases to say: "At this point, almost all the indications are that this is a mild disease.
He also said, "It's still early days, we need to get the later data.
Typically, hospitalizations and deaths occur later in the course of the disease, and we are only two weeks into this outbreak.
At the same time, scientists around the world are observing the number of cases and hospitalizations, and testing the effectiveness of the current vaccines and treatments.
While Delta remains the world's main coronavirus strain, cases of the Omicron variant are emerging in dozens of countries, with South Africa serving as the epicenter of the outbreak.
Health officials said new cases in Hodan province increased by 400 per cent in the first week of December, with tests showing that more than 90 per cent of cases were attributed to the Omicron variant.
Thanks to today's supporters, all 80 boxes have been delivered!
Ingredients for the beauty tonic:
The function of the white fungus: sweet and neutral, belongs to the lung, stomach and kidney channels; it has the effects of strengthening the essence, nourishing the kidney, lubricating the intestines, benefiting the stomach, nourishing the blood, and strengthening the heart; it is used for the treatment of diseases such as lung heat cough, lung dry cough, women's menstrual disorder, stomach inflammation, constipation, etc; it is a good supplement for Yin deficiency, fire toxicity, etc.
The action of pectin: Bitter, neutral, enter the large intestine and bladder channels.
Effects: and blood, lymphatic, stop diarrhea, stop pain, can also replenish water, lubricate the intestines, if there are people with constipation, can eat more plum gel.
The benefits of wolfberry: sexual balance, sweet taste, liver and stomach meridian.
It is good for the liver and eyes, nourishing the liver and kidney, whitening and nourishing the skin, and replenishing the deficiency and nourishing the body.
The benefits of red dates: sweet and bland, enter the spleen and stomach, and have the effect of nourishing the spleen and stomach and replenishing qi and blood and calming the mind. If the spleen and stomach are weak, those who suffer from insomnia can take more red dates.
The benefits of Longan meat: sweet and warm in nature, tonifies the heart and spleen, and is suitable for those who are deficient in both the heart and spleen.
Dragon fruit can moisturize the skin and beautify the skin, nourish the blood and calm the mind, replenish the heart and spleen, strengthen the yang and invigorate the qi, and people with anemia can also take it. People with insomnia can also take it.
The effect of lotus: sweet and bitter, neutral, heart, spleen and kidney.
Calm the mind and relieve insomnia, stomach weakness, forgetfulness, irritability, thirst, nourishing and replenishing the deficiency.
Therefore, this beauty and health soup is not only a dessert, but also a health food!
Eating more can make you feel better!
And it won't cost you an arm and a leg, either. Eating it won't leave a hole in your pocket!
This food is already cold, and the food may spoil
Order #NUMBER# was originally scheduled to arrive at 18:40, but was changed to arrive at 19:15.
Dinner time is limited, so please handle it quickly!
I didn't get one
Placed an order five minutes ago, why is it already completed?
The actual discount code details are where to see
Education Times: What can be done to rescue abducted children?
If we compare the famous public service advertisement saying "there is no killing without buying and selling", then in a good environment where there is no demand for "kidnapping", group prevention and control, and the whole nation's anti-kidnapping will make the act of kidnapping unprofitable, risky, and costly, and this kind of crime will not happen again and again.
Recently, the Criminal Investigation Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security has launched an emergency release platform for missing children information developed by the Bureau.
It is an Internet information platform established to provide an authoritative channel for the release of missing child information and the timely recovery of abducted children.
When I heard the name of this app, I felt very warm.
The new technology means is not only called "artistic" and full of spirit, but also uses information technology properly, which is practical and effective.
The top priority of the anti-kidnapping law enforcement is to find the kidnapped children and protect their safety and freedom.
The second is the trial and punishment of the suspects.
The significance of criminal punishment can be listed as individual punishment, social prevention, and legal education.
But before the trafficking case is solved, the safety of the victims should be our top priority.
Matters of importance and urgency can be put aside for the time being under the urgent "search for rescue" purpose. Controversial and disputable topics such as "whether it is necessary to execute people who sell children" can be put aside for the time being and discussed with caution, but the matter of rescuing children who have been kidnapped cannot be put off.
Based on the experience of investigating such cases, traffickers tend to leave the scene of the crime as soon as possible after they have made a profit.
The search for a missing child can be delayed by a minute, and that minute can mean a child is one step closer to being out of reach of a parent, and the investigation becomes more difficult.
In this case, it is a practical move to use platforms such as "Circle of Friends" to help crack cases and find missing children.
After all, "kidnapping" is a big task that requires the operation of an entire legal system.
Fighting crime, safeguarding the rights and interests of children and parents, from the improvement of the law, to the protection of the law, and from the meticulousness of the law enforcement, there is no need to neglect the care of “protecting the young and helping the weak”.
In addition, the prevention of child trafficking from the family to society can also be done better.
For example, a common scenario is a family of three taking a nap at a train station, with the parents fast asleep, only to wake up to find their child missing.
Two-year-olds cannot be expected to have sufficient self-protection skills, but as a parent of a young child, you should at least have some awareness of the need to protect.
Parents taking turns to rest, or placing their children in a safe environment, are the bare minimum to prevent children from being abducted.
From another perspective, the side that buys abducted children should also be paid attention to and punished.
Individual bad acts are often just one link in a long chain.
According to the Criminal Law of China, the minimum penalty for the crime of trafficking in children is 5 years in prison, and the maximum penalty is death and confiscation of property.
The crime of trafficking in children is clearly one of the more serious crimes, given the trend towards leniency in sentencing.
There are still many cases of kidnapping every year.
It is clear that some people have outdated ideas about raising daughters, and their legal awareness is low.
The legal education for this group should be synchronized.
To effectively control the crime of trafficking, it is not enough to rely solely on official strict enforcement.
If the "market" of kidnapping exists widely, the traffickers are greedy and keep innovating the means of kidnapping, which will form a "battlefield" between the traffickers and the law enforcers, and the anti-kidnapping action will be in a low-efficiency situation.
Therefore, eliminating backward concepts and popularizing legal knowledge can also help to eradicate the crimes of buying and selling children.
Yang Haodong delivered the spirit of the 19th CPC National Congress and the provincial Party congress at Maolan Mountain
Drawing inspiration from the centennial struggle of the Party
Hunan Daily, December 10 (Full media reporter Gong Baowei) According to the unified arrangement of the provincial committee, on the morning of December 10, the provincial committee Standing Committee Member and the provincial committee Propaganda Department Secretary Yang Haodong gave an interactive lecture at the Maolan Mountain Video and Culture Park, to study and implement the spirit of the Sixth Plenary Session of the 19th CPC Central Committee, the important speech and important instructions of Xi Jinping, General Secretary of the CPC Central Committee, and the spirit of the 12th Party Congress of Hunan Province.
Yang Haodong expounded on the core meaning and practical requirements of the spirit of the plenum from three aspects of ideological belief, original intention and mission, self-revolution and the youth party, and the leadership and theory of the Party, based on his own understanding and personal experience, in a profound and systematic manner.
He pointed out that it is necessary to learn the spirit of the plenary session and the important instructions and important speeches of General Secretary Xi Jinping on the important issues of the Hunan Provincial Party Congress, and to integrate the spirit of the plenary session and the spirit of the provincial Party congress, so as to enhance the sense of responsibility to uphold the “two establishments” and to achieve the “two maintenances”, and to firmly move forward along the direction indicated by General Secretary Xi Jinping.
During the interactive exchange, grassroots cadres, entrepreneurs and young people asked questions about the relationship between the three historical resolutions, how to understand the decisive significance of “two established”, how cultural enterprises should grasp the guidance, and how young people in the new era can draw strength from the history of the Party’s hundred years of struggle. Yang Haodong answered one by one with simple language and vivid examples. He hoped that young party members would learn from the history of the Party’s hundred years of struggle, unite closely around the Party Central Committee, and firmly follow the Party to write the responsibility and responsibility with youth.
The number of graduates from colleges and universities in Beijing in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000 - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11 (Reporter Yang Na) On December 11, the Beijing Municipal Education Commission and the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau jointly held a video conference on the employment and entrepreneurship of graduates of Beijing universities in 2022. It was learned that the number of graduates of Beijing universities in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000, an increase of 16,000 from last year.
A relevant official from the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau said that Beijing will deploy the employment work of graduates from Beijing universities in the aspects of strengthening the matching of supply and demand, strengthening policy support, expanding employment channels, ensuring difficulty assistance, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship, and improving service efficiency.
Reporters learned that the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau will build a practice platform, increase the supply of jobs, actively contact 40 job experience bases of universities and colleges, visit employers, integrate demand information and job information, and focus on “six one batch”, that is, expand the recruitment of public institutions, expand the recruitment of state-owned enterprises, expand the recruitment of grassroots projects, expand the recruitment of military enlistment, expand the employment of trainees, and expand the employment of entrepreneurs, to ensure that 100% of the difficult families of graduates will be helped.
In fact, I don't know whether the shop made a mistake or the rider made a mistake.
No receipt on the bag
No trace found
I hope you understand
Because the delivery time was 30 minutes faster than the display
Thank you
Yes, a new rider has come in.
He's been waiting for a long time.
The restaurant has been saying it's working on it.
We waited for several hours
The International Olive Council divides olive oil into two categories: virgin olive oil (virgin olive oil) and refined olive oil (lampante olive oil or refined olive oil).
Virgin olive oil, or extra virgin olive oil, is the oil obtained from the fresh fruit of the olive tree by mechanical cold pressing, filtration and other treatments to remove impurities.
Based on the acidity, it can be divided into three levels:
Extra Virgin Olive Oil: is the highest quality and purest form of olive oil. It is a pure, natural product.
The taste is excellent, with a delicate floral fragrance and acidity of less than 1%.
Extra virgin olive oil (EVOO): has a slightly higher acidity, but does not exceed 2%, and has a pure, aromatic taste.
Ordinary virgin olive oil (virgin olive oil): flavour and aroma are acceptable, acidity is not more than 3.3%.
Refined olive oil is the olive oil obtained after the initial pressing that has a free acidity of more than 3.3%. It is also known as secondary oil.
Refined olive oil can be divided into two levels:
Extra Virgin Olive Oil (EVOO): Refined olive oil mixed with a certain proportion of virgin olive oil to balance the taste and colour. Its acidity is less than 1.5% and it is transparent and yellow in colour.
Refined olive-pomace oil or olive-pomace seed oil (Refined Olive-Pomace Oil): is obtained by extracting and refining from the pomace.
If you have seen the grading system, you should have noticed that the acidity of olive oil is a very important indicator.
Olives, like grapes for wine, come from different regions and different varieties of olive fruit, and will produce different grades of olive oil.
The best place to grow olive trees:
The Mediterranean coast has the most suitable soil and climate conditions for the growth of olive trees, including the most suitable soil and climate conditions for the growth of olive trees, sunshine, air humidity, rainfall and other climatic conditions.
Apart from the Mediterranean coast, it can only be grown in scattered areas in other regions.
The main production area and production site (Mediterranean):
Italy, Spain, Greece, Turkey, Portugal, Morocco, Syria, Israel, Tunisia, Algeria, Egypt, Pakistan, Lebanon, etc., have climates similar to theirs.
The harvesting month of olive oil:
The period from mid-March to mid-June is the time when the olive tree flowers and bears fruit. The fruit starts to develop and mature from mid-July to mid-October, and the fruit changes from green to red, purple, and finally black.
November to February is the harvest season for fruit (the freshness of olive oil is very important).
The nutritional content of olive oil:
Olive oil is rich in monounsaturated fatty acids, such as oleic acid and linoleic acid, as well as vitamin A, vitamin B, vitamin D, vitamin E, vitamin K and antioxidants.
Olive oil is considered to be the most suitable oil for human nutrition among all the oils discovered so far.
The Democratic National Convention comes to a close, and Biden says the flame of freedom will never be extinguished
The online "Summit for Democracy" (Summit for Democracy) convened by U.S. President Biden and attended by governments and leaders of civil society and the private sector from 110 countries in the world ended on Friday (Dec. 10).
In his closing remarks, Biden said the flame of freedom burns in the hearts of every person in the world, and tyranny can never extinguish it.
He also said that he plans to hold the second Global "Democracy Summit" next year.
Taiwan government representative and political commissioner Tang Feng-ho also spoke at the summit on the second day. Hong Kong democracy and human rights activist Lo Kuan-chung, who is currently living in exile in the UK, also spoke at the summit on the second day.
Biden said: "We know the work ahead is daunting.
But we know that we can meet the challenge because I have said before, as this Summit has shown, democracy is everywhere.
Dictatorship can never extinguish the tiny flame of freedom that burns in the hearts of men and women all over the world. ”
Biden also said that defending democracy requires a collective effort from the whole society.
He said: "As leaders of government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, to strengthen the fence of democracy, to push for reform, to achieve transparent accountability, to be more resilient to authoritarian bullying and shocks, and to stand up to those who would seek naked power before the public interest.
The second day of the “Democracy Summit” will focus on defending human rights, consolidating democracy and countering authoritarianism, and combating digital authoritarianism and affirming the value of democracy.
This day is International Human Rights Day.
The Secretary-General of the United Nations, Mr. Guterres, also spoke at the opening of the day, saying that democracy is facing challenges globally, especially the challenges brought by new digital technologies.
He said: "Now is the time to reaffirm our common values and positions and the resilience of democracy.
This will require deepening social dialogue, addressing inequality, tackling corruption, updating the social contract, investing in quality education and expanding opportunities for women and girls.
This also requires a firm condemnation of all forms of populism, nationalism and extremism, including the use of all the tools provided by the technological revolution. "
Hong Kong human rights activist Lo Chung-kit delivered a speech through a pre-recorded video at the summit, reminding participants to continue to pay attention to the human rights situation of Chinese minorities such as the Uyghurs and Tibetans in Hong Kong.
He said: "For a long time, the world has been directly affected by China's rise, but there is no mechanism to hold China accountable.
That is why political leaders and civil society leaders must work together.
We must use all that we have (resources) to ensure that the restoration of democracy is our first priority. ”
Lo Kuan-chuen also called for the free world to unite to fight the threat of the CCP.
He said: "Maybe some of you are afraid of offending General Secretary Xi Jinping, maybe some of you don't want to lose the Chinese market, maybe some of you don't realize the threat of the Communist Party to our democratic values.
That's why we failed.
That's why we have to change. "
Executive Yuan Councilor Tang Feng attended a roundtable discussion titled "Fighting Digital Autocracy, Affirming Democratic Values" and released a "National Statement" through video, emphasizing that Taiwan is at the forefront of the fight against autocracy and authoritarianism.
He also shared his experience in combating the novel coronavirus through information transparency and building mutual trust.
He said: "At a time when Taiwan's democracy is flourishing, we have always stood at the forefront of the global fight against authoritarianism, and played a leading role in promoting global freedom, democracy and human rights.
During the pandemic, authoritarian governments have justified human rights violations in the name of public health and the common good. Global democracy is regressing.
However, in Taiwan, we can control the epidemic without closing the city, and we can defeat fake information without removing it. ”
At the same time as the second day of the "Democracy Summit", the U.S. Treasury Department announced the imposition of sanctions on 15 individuals and 10 entities in China, North Korea and other countries that were found to have committed serious human rights abuses, and the imposition of investment restrictions on a Chinese company that was found to have used surveillance technology to commit human rights abuses.
Already photographed and uploaded to you
I know.
But the restaurant doesn't know why it's continually pushing back delivery times.
It was supposed to be #NUMBER#.
So, I'm not calling it.
I'm done
I will definitely complain
Why didn't you tell me earlier?
By the time you get there
No, I didn't get a call.
Please let him know he's welcome to come back to our company
I don't want to wait another #NUMBER# minutes.
A meal took an hour and a half
#PRS_ORG# did not receive
I want to cancel the order
Why not cancel it?
Hello, the chicken soup served at the restaurant is alive
I wanted to try tennis, but I was afraid I wouldn't stick with it, so I wanted to start with something similar in price.
In fact, the price is often directly proportional to the friendliness, if you can't distinguish, then the expensive normal situation will be more friendly than the cheap, this kind of "entry-level" is actually industrial waste.
They are very low-tech, and the ball bounces on a spring and vibrates a lot, and the hard balls can't hold up. The pros can't handle them.
Their logic and subtext is - - - Tennis is so hard, you know you'll never learn, and you know you won't spring for the good stuff, so we'll spring for the cheap stuff, and you'll play twice, and then you'll never play again, and this racket will be cheap, and you won't care.
When you can really tell the difference, that means you've progressed, and then I'll come back here and buy the expensive stuff, and I'll make twice as much money.
It is suggested that you spend the same amount of money to buy a second-hand racket that is a little better. Choose Prince or Dunlop. These two brands are not famous enough, so good rackets are not sold at a high price. A new racket of 500 or 600 is good enough. A second-hand racket of 200 is not bad either, and you can enjoy the joy of a thousand-yuan racket.
It's friendly to beginners, but once you get past the beginner stage, it's useless, but most people, especially girls, can't get past the beginner stage.
The order has been delayed several times in delivery time.
Can you follow up on this?
Postponed
Thank you
That is to say, I actually have credit?
Do I need to place a new order? Did I not need to pay attention to that one?
Hi, I ordered food from this restaurant but it was missing a lot and the chicken was raw
#PRS_ORG# No reason was given, please cancel
I ordered delivery, nothing to do with pick up
Jiangxi will train 10,000 rural elementary school music teachers in 3 years - Xinhua News Agency
Nanchang, May 22 (Reporter Chen Yushan) A reporter recently learned from the Jiangxi Provincial Education Department that in order to enhance the guarantee capacity of the shortage of discipline teachers and realize the balanced development of compulsory education in rural areas, since 2016, Jiangxi Province has planned to train qualified music, art and physical education teachers for every primary school in rural areas (townships and below) in the province in three years, totaling 10,000.
It is understood that the trainees this time are rural elementary school teachers under 45 years old who have basic knowledge or talent in music, art and physical education, and can teach other disciplines of music, art and physical education.
Through training, they will master the basic knowledge and teaching skills of the aesthetics of voice and body, update the teaching ideas and concepts, master the modern teaching methods, improve the teaching ability, activity design ability, campus culture ability and self-development ability, and build a team of one major and many specialties, so as to alleviate the shortage of rural voice and body teachers.
In order to ensure the quality and effect of training, Jiangxi also plans to train 1,000 teachers from 100 counties (cities, districts) in music, art and physical education in the whole province, so as to comprehensively improve their teaching demonstration and leading ability, research and design ability, training ability and network training workshop construction ability, and play the role of teaching, demonstration, guidance and supervision.
Because waiting another 20 minutes is an hour #NUMBER# minutes
I don't want to eat food that was made 1 hour ago
I've found the buyer for the wrong order
But my hubcap was missing
The editor brings you the best facial cleanser.
How good is the face wash cream?
1. Hanbo Skincare Makeup Set Moisturizing and Moisturizing Whitening and Brightening Brightening Skin Lightening Gift Box Five-Piece Set Gift Box (Facial Cleanser Toner Emulsion Moisturizing Emulsion Brightening Essence Eye Cream)
Recommended reasons: It has the effect of tightening the skin, repairing the peptides, shaping the tight skin, saying goodbye to the loose skin, improving the eye corner fish tail wrinkles and the fine lines around the eyes, and the moisturizing effect is very excellent. It can penetrate quickly into the skin.
The shelf life (year) is 5, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, the efficacy of whitening, the net content (mL/g) set, the product packaging has a gift box, suitable for mixed skin, the efficacy of spot, the efficacy of moisturizing, the efficacy of moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the efficacy of tightening, the product packaging has a seal, the product is produced in Jiangsu Suzhou, whether it is a special purpose cosmetic, the efficacy is other, currently has 140,000+ people to evaluate, received 99% of the good rate, evaluated that it is very easy to use, the packaging is very good, high-end and atmospheric.
2. Hanbu skin care makeup set hyaluronic acid mild and clean moisturizing and moisturizing large water light moisturizing luxury gift box six sets (facial cleanser, toner, emulsion, essence, cream)
The reason for recommendation: It has the effect of repairing, moisturizing, whitening and toning the skin. It can improve the problem of rough skin and large pores of the skin, and is suitable for mixed skin. It is clean and not dry after washing.
The shelf life (year) is 5, and it is not a special purpose cosmetic. The product packaging has anti-counterfeiting measures, suitable for mixed skin, moisturizing effect, suitable for skin age 25-34, net content (mL/g) 120ml + 120ml + 100ml + 6g * 3, moisturizing effect, product packaging has outer box, product packaging has seal, product production place is Jiangsu Suzhou, currently has 7700+ people evaluated, received 99% of good ratings, evaluated that it is refreshing and comfortable, moisturizing effect is good, high-end and atmospheric.
3. OsmoOSM makeup set for skin care and beauty, nutrition and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and moisturizing, moisturizing and
Recommended reasons: Deeply clean the skin, help remove the dust and oil on the skin, refine the pores, and effectively moisturize the skin. It can effectively nourish the skin and moisturize the skin. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and pigmentation. It can improve the skin's yellowness and
The shelf life (year) is 4 years, whether it is a special purpose cosmetic or not, its efficacy is to soothe and calm, its efficacy is to whiten, its net content (mL/g) is set, its efficacy is to moisturize, it is suitable for any skin type, its efficacy is to moisturize, its packaging has an outer box, its efficacy is to refine pores, its efficacy is to deep cleanse, it has already received 220,000+ people's evaluation, it has a 98% good rating, people say it is comfortable to use, it is relatively high-end, it is packed well.
4, Hanhoo Red Pomegranate Fresh and Nourishing 6-Piece Set (Skin Care, Makeup, Moisturizing, Student, Face Wash, Toner, Eye Cream, Gift Box)
Recommended reasons: Deeply clean the pores and dirt, soften the aging keratin, pull and tighten the skin, lighten the facial lines, soften and plump the facial skin, moisturize at the same time can improve skin quality, prevent the occurrence of fine wrinkles, suitable for any skin type, mild and non-greasy.
Hello, how long will it take to deliver my order?
They've all gone home.
Your rider is #PHONENUMBER# and his name is #NAME#
Please give me a reasonable explanation.
Yes, but your rider is a problem, and you need to deal with it
If possible, it would be best to check if it is still on the road.
OK, if you don't, you'll get your money back.
In fact, there are many things to consider when dressing and matching for chubby girls.
The skirts worn by fat girls should not be too short or too long. They should be knee-length and just cover the fat parts of the thighs.
If a skirt is too short, it will reveal the fat on your legs.
Too long will make you look short and fat.
If you wear separates - top, skirt and tights in different colours - it will make you look taller.
In fact, many dark-colored clothes are the staple of plus-size girls (the author knows this very well), and dark colors are also a good way to cover up your body fat. The elegant and noble black short skirt is also a favorite of plus-size girls.
Wearing dark colors, especially black shorts, will make you look thinner.
If your calves are big, don't wear anything that draws attention to them.
The more popular it is, the better, and the color should not be too bright.
To avoid people noticing your legs and making you feel fat.
For the slightly chubby girl, it is necessary to tell her the secret of dressing and matching.
Plus-size girls should not wear tight-fitting short skirts, and the tops should not be too short or tucked into the skirts, which will make people feel uncomfortable. If the legs are thick, they should wear black long stockings or grid stockings (the kind with small grids), and choose soft printed bell skirts, which can cover the shortcomings of plus-size girls.
Of course, chubby girls are also picky about wearing short skirts.
Fat girls should choose tops with the same color as the short skirt to make their bodies look taller.
Short skirts paired with high heels can make your legs look longer, which is the hottest trend in summer!
If you are a plus-size woman with thin legs, you should choose a long skirt with a lot of frills.
It not only covers your big belly, but also shows your advantages.
The A-line skirt is very thin and is more suitable for fat girls. Choose a tight-fitting shirt to create a sense of hierarchy.
A simple white T-shirt matched with a short skirt, the fat MM can also try.
Skinny girls can also be fashionable.
If you can master the rules of dressing, then the tiny-fat girls will be the focus of everyone's attention.
After changing the dressing and matching, I should also exercise more in my life, and try to get out of the label of chubby girl as soon as possible 😄
The 18th World Beverage Innovation Awards is jointly organized by FoodBev Media and Brau Beviale, the international beer, brewing and beverage industry exhibition held in Nuremberg, Germany.
It attracted 279 works from 25 countries and 22 different categories.
The finalists were announced on October 15, and the final winners will be announced online on November 11 (British Summer Time).
We saw that LP28, a sugar-free yogurt from Yuanfeng Forest, was shortlisted for the Best Dairy Drink Award, and the marketing of Yili's "GOGO Wuhan" was shortlisted for the Best Marketing Activity Award, and the packaging cooperation between Pepsi Cola and the People's Daily new media was shortlisted for the Best Packaging Design/Label Award.
Laura Nettle, senior marketing manager at FoodBev Media, said: "We are delighted to be celebrating the 18th anniversary of the World Beverage Innovation Awards with Brau Beviale.
From new flavors, new concepts and new features to brands, packaging and manufacturing, we've seen trends in the beverage industry as the industry continues to innovate in a more sustainable way.
The World Beverage Innovation Awards recognized the most ambitious new products and developments from global beverage brands this year.
Here is the full list of finalists in each category.
Ardagh Group's technology can turn 100 per cent of recycled glass into new bottles.
The water comes in a box with a bag inside, which is 100 per cent recyclable and reduces packaging by 66 per cent and carbon emissions by 97 per cent.
LatCub is 100% biodegradable, uses less paper and does not use harmful glues or tape to the environment.
Ardagh Group's technology can re-melt 100 per cent of recycled glass into new bottles.
The final winners will be announced on the FoodBev Media YouTube channel on November 11 (UK Summer Time), and FBIF will continue to report for you, stay tuned!
Why so long
Starved to death
From 7:30 to now
Don't answer if you can't
I can go out and buy my own food, I don't need to do this here #PRS_ORG #
Xinhua News Agency + | Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League Fuels Winter Olympics Enthusiasm - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, Beijing DreamING player Pang Yaotian (zhong) scored a goal during the match.
On that day, the 2021-2022 season Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League continued to compete at various ice rinks in Beijing.
This year's league is divided into regular season and post-season, and the participating athletes' age groups are U6 to U18. There are two groups, the competitive group and the selection group, and nearly 3,600 players from 256 teams from the whole city participate.
The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League has developed for more than ten years, and has become a platform for young people to hone their skills and make friends, and also to send out excellent players to the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Team and the Youth Team.
The league has played a role in promoting the sport of ice hockey in Beijing for young people, and has fanned the enthusiasm for ice hockey in the Winter Olympics, laying a foundation for the development of ice hockey in Beijing in the post-Olympic period.
Girl shoots arrow at sister to raise money: "It's just a flesh wound" - Xinhua News Agency
A girl stands in front of a large wooden board in Hangzhou, with the words "human target, 10 yuan per arrow" written on it.
Yesterday morning, a photo of a "Hangzhou girl who became a target for donations for her sister" went viral on social media.
The photo shows a girl standing in front of a wooden board that is slightly higher than a human being, with the words "human flesh target, 10 yuan per arrow" written on it, indicating that passers-by can use a bow and arrow to shoot.
The incident has sparked a heated debate online.
Last night, the publicity officer of the Hangzhou City Public Security Bureau confirmed that the police confirmed that the girl had made such a radical move for the sake of her sister, but this kind of behavior should not be encouraged, and the girl left the local police station yesterday.
Girl on street 'arrow target' fundraiser warned
In one of the pictures circulating online, a long-haired girl stood in front of a large wooden board, and the words "human target, 10 yuan per arrow" were written in black ink on the board. On another wooden board in front of her, her bank account, WeChat and Alipay accounts were written.
The image sparked controversy after it was posted online.
Some netizens thought that this was a "seeking attention" behavior, and many netizens expressed sympathy for this.
"We were patrolling around 10 a.m. on the 23rd when we found the situation on the square. At that time, there were already a lot of onlookers. "
When local media interviewed the police officers at the Tianshui police station near the incident site, they said that there were two girls who were selling snacks, both of whom were in their 20s and dressed in a youthful and beautiful manner.
Among them, the girl who was made into a "human target" has been crying and begging passers-by to play the game; the other girl is helping to shout, saying that her friend's sister has leukemia and is in urgent need of surgery. Please help.
"We have contacted the local police in Guizhou and learned that the girl was raising money for her sister's leukemia treatment. "
Last night, the propaganda officer of the Xincheng Sub-Bureau of the Hangzhou Public Security Bureau told the reporter of Xinjing that the girl's name was Jiguangli and she was raising money for her sister Jiguangyan.
But since the treatment still costs more than 300,000 yen, it was difficult to come up with a good way to raise the money, so he did this.
He said that throughout the whole process, two girls were the targets, one was responsible for holding the bow, but did not participate in it, and no one was found to have shot an arrow, only that some people watched and took photos and posted them on Weibo.
Police later determined that the bow used was not controlled.
The official said, "We do not advocate this kind of fundraising."
After being warned by the police, she left the police station.
Heat dissipation effect: good; light weight: convenient; appearance: satisfactory; material: satisfactory.
The new machine is very good.
The performance is stable, and the four outlets for heat dissipation are no problem, and it is worth recommending.
This HONGO dark knight dragon game is very good, the workmanship and materials are good, and the brand is reliable!
The price of the Honor Shadow Knight Dragon is not too expensive.
Personally, I feel that the dark shadow knight dragon is really good. The game effect: the game effect is smooth and can play most of the games. My chicken all high** frame rate is stable, and it is very smooth. Lol is also not in a word, CSgo is also easy to handle, and most of the three a games can be played.
Heat dissipation: The heat dissipation effect is good, the fan is very powerful, and it is quiet when working. The game effect is also good when the fan is full open.
Exterior Material: The exterior is pretty cool, and the screen display effect is very good. Game performance: The screen is very clear, and it is enough to play 1080 games.
I bought the notebook and it's really good. It's mainly used for design, and it's very cost-effective. It's lighter than I expected, and it's prettier than I expected. The red on the bottom is a very good wine color. It's not too vulgar, and it's much better than I expected. It's worth buying. Girls are also suitable.
I started riding with the Nightriders two years ago and have been riding for two years now, and the value for money is very good, and the quality is very good!
I have also recommended this product to my friends!
We have already purchased the three machines in this series!
It looks good and is well-equipped
I bought it for my nephew, but I wanted to wait for the 4/18 event, but he needed it urgently, so I bought it in advance, so I missed the big event of the bank.
However, the price is very good, and the logistics is also very fast. I will come back to review it after a period of time.
A brand new, high-value-for-money gaming laptop computer, with a very good design style and already installed windows 11 and office 2019
Effect: Bought it for my child to do 3D rendering, the software has been installed, and my child says it can be used, and the performance of this computer can do 3D design work.
He said it was a good gift for his son.
The computer is good, especially the customer service attitude is very good, do not know what to ask, recommend to buy
It's good, and the graphics on the games are really nice
What is the most popular thing in 2021?
Undoubtedly, the Tokyo Olympics.
Do you think only Olympians can win awards?
Some time ago, there was an article called "Look! Project Managers Can Impact Gold Medal Olympic Projects" which was very popular. The article mentioned that project managers in many projects are absolutely unbeatable: moving bricks, going on business trips, staying up late is a daily routine for project managers; fighting fires, taking the blame, and apologizing are nothing for them.
It seems to be a joke, but it also reflects the daily bitterness of project managers. Behind it is the lack of enthusiasm for the current project management work.
And the people who are engaged in project management are gradually choosing to get out of the predicament of work through some actions.
As the number of PMP (international certification for project management professionals) applicants has been increasing year by year, more and more project managers have improved their project management skills through learning.
According to the "Development Report of Project Management in China (1999-2019)", as of September 2019, the total number of PMP® applicants nationwide was nearly 6 million, and the number of PMP® certified was about 420,000, and the number of valid certificates was about 300,000, accounting for 31.2% of the total number of PMP® certificates in the world.
Over the past 10 years, the number of PMP holders has been increasing year by year, which indicates that more and more project managers realize that it is not a good way to do things by simply copying the past "old experience". The ever-changing work environment tells us that we need to learn to stand on the shoulders of giants and explore the road ahead.
However, can PMP certification guarantee the smooth running of project management work?
Many project management beginners said that through learning related courses such as PMP/IPMP, they can systematically master the ten major fields and five process groups of project management, but when actually carrying out project management work, they are still in the dark.
Many project managers often feedback the following problems: Project management cognition is not enough, relying on personal experience, project management theory is empty, do not know how to practice; lack of systematic project management process system support, unable to land in work, project estimation is not accurate, sensitivity of control degree is low, project is dragged on and on; unclear division of labor among members, the "old man" in the team does not know how to deal with it; cross-departmental assistance communication is not smooth, and the project is difficult to progress ……
Therefore, focusing on product innovation and R&D management for more than ten years, it has helped many excellent enterprises to cultivate a large number of product managers, project managers and other R&D key talents, and has won the title of “China Enterprise R&D Management Talent Training Demonstration Base”.
The online course of "Project Manager Training Camp" is a kind of online fragmented learning, which combines the real cases, tools and methods of many R&D type enterprises, and helps you master the essential knowledge and standard actions of project managers, and walk on the advanced path of your own project management.
This is also an opportunity for enterprises to use lower costs and less investment to promote the development of project managers, and to achieve efficient operation results.
The course is not only taught by Tsinghua Huaxia experts (the former Huawei R&D management team), but also integrates international advanced project management theories and real business scenarios from many well-known enterprises.
It will also provide scientific and practical management tools and methods, rich templates and forms, and help students convert the knowledge learned after class into specific work.
One order of dumplings?
Why have six fingers?
In the run-up to the 12.12 shopping festival, Jingxin calls on consumers to practice rational consumption - Economic Observer - professional financial news website
This year's "Double 11" shopping festival nationwide network payment business transaction amount reached 1.77 trillion yuan, surpassing the previous year's record.
The variety of fancy red envelopes and live-streaming shopping sprees have once again made consumers exclaim that they have benefited. On the one hand, it makes people marvel at the strength of national consumption. On the other hand, it cannot help but calm down and think about the impact of consumerism on society and the mainstream consumer group in contemporary society.
Before the arrival of “Double 12”, Jingxin Consumer Finance Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as “Jingxin”) issued a rational consumption advocacy, reminding all users, especially young people, to establish good consumption awareness and consumption habits, and refuse blind consumption and excessive consumption.
The results of the 2020 Consumer Financial Literacy Survey and Analysis Report released by the People's Bank of China showed that the national consumer financial literacy index was 66.81, up 2.04 from 2019.
In general, the performance of Chinese residents in the aspect of financial consumption is better, but there are large differences in different aspects of financial behavior and skills, and the level of basic financial knowledge needs to be further improved.
The financial literacy of the elderly and young people is relatively low, and “old and young” will still be the focus of financial education. The report released by Nielsen showed that young people have huge consumption potential, and credit consumption has become an important way to upgrade consumption. 86.6% of young people use credit products, and nearly half of them do not have debt accumulation. Although young people as a whole show a rational consumption trend, they are different from the label of “overspending” by the outside world. Some young people do have excessive consumption and imitation consumption behaviors, and they have a lot of financial pressure and debt risk, and even social problems are gradually increasing. Financial enterprises should be willing to assume social responsibility and provide positive guidance.
As a licensed consumer financial institution, Česká Spořitelna has always been committed to helping people build their own happy life with high-quality and thoughtful services, and promoting consumers to establish good and correct consumption concepts, and actively respond to regulatory calls, and improve the rational consumption awareness of consumers, especially young people, with practical actions.
In the past few years, ZTE has carried out a comprehensive and diversified financial knowledge popularization activities for young people, including the innovation practice contest and other forms of cooperation with domestic top colleges and universities to subtly guide the consumption demand of young people, help them establish a rational consumption concept, plan their consumption demand reasonably, and thus help them accumulate wealth in their lives.
As the Double 12 arrives, Jinsheng reminds all consumers to establish reasonable consumption consciousness and correct money views, resist blind consumption and overconsumption, avoid the pitfalls of consumer loans, and avoid affecting personal credit and economic life in the future.
When shopping, one must plan in advance and pay back on time.
If you miss a payment, it will be recorded on your credit report and may affect your ability to buy a car or house in the future.
At the same time, when enjoying financial products and services, you should also choose regular institutions and channels, and pay attention to checking whether the relevant institutions have the qualifications to operate.
In the future, ZTE will continue to rely on its mature and reliable consumer finance system and continuously updated and upgraded financial products to provide consumers with more suitable and diversified services, and help consumers cultivate the concept of rational consumption and moderate borrowing, and become a trusted consumer finance partner for consumers for life.
I won't go
I'm on a delivery.
For one hour, no one has contacted me, and this is all online fraud.
You think I'm ordering take-out for the first time?
After the survey, you are saying the same thing! I checked the address several times before placing the order
Okay, thank you! How many days is it?
Vietnam News - Gulf Cooperation Council tackles common challenges
The stops on the prince's tour include Oman, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Qatar, Bahrain and Kuwait.
It is noteworthy that this is the first visit to Qatar by the Crown Prince since Saudi Arabia and its Arab allies imposed an embargo on Qatar in mid-2017, leading to a Gulf diplomatic crisis.
In the crisis, Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates, Bahrain and Egypt cut off diplomatic relations with Qatar and imposed a comprehensive embargo, accusing Qatar of supporting terrorist organizations and having close relations with Iran.
The diplomatic tensions have seriously affected the internal unity of the Summit, and have had a negative impact on the economic development of the countries in the region.
Four Arab nations have blocked land, sea and air routes to Qatar.
The crisis was resolved only at the Gulf Cooperation Council summit in January 2021, when the Gulf states signed a pact brokered by the United States and Kuwait to move towards "unity and stability".
Saudi Arabia has reopened its border with Qatar.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt are leading efforts to restore ties with Qatar by appointing new ambassadors to Doha first.
The Gulf Arab states' efforts to resolve their differences and restore relations with Qatar were driven by the need to unite in the face of common challenges in order to meet the interests of the countries and the stability of the region.
During the visit of the Saudi Crown Prince to Oman, the two sides agreed to open the first direct land route between the two Gulf neighbors.
The 725-kilometre channel will provide convenient conditions for the travel and integration of supply chains between the two countries.
The Public Investment Fund of Saudi Arabia will invest $5 billion in Oman, and 13 cooperation memorandums of understanding worth $30 billion were signed between the two countries' enterprises.
Prince Salman's visit to the Gulf states comes as Iran and world powers are negotiating a nuclear deal known as the Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action (JCPOA) - a deal denounced by Gulf Arab states for failing to address Iran's missile program.
The Gulf states have long viewed Iran as a long-term "competitor" and have viewed Iran's nuclear program as a "threat" to regional security.
Gulf states believe that not resolving the Iranian missile issue and not taking action to curb Iranian activities in the region is flawed.
In the backdrop of Saudi Arabia and Iran failing to meet the aspirations of the Gulf states in the nuclear talks with the major powers, direct talks were held between Saudi Arabia and Iran.
Its objective is to contain the escalation of tensions in the region.
It is one of the factors that have slowed Gulf Cooperation Council countries' economic growth.
The upcoming GCC summit will be the first summit since the end of the dispute between some member states and Qatar.
This is an opportunity to reassess the diplomatic efforts of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) to contribute to the unification of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) and to propose measures to fully cooperate with its member states to face common challenges and contribute to the stability and development of Gulf countries.
It has not been delivered until 9:30 now, and must be returned the deposit and cancel the order.
Okay
It is said to be the loudest exhaust sound in the New Town area!
This car, which we are presenting to you today, is a dream come true for many men.
It's the flagship supercar of Lamborghini, the replacement for the Murcielago, the Aventador LP700-4!
The price is nearly two million dollars, and the annual road tax is tens of thousands of dollars. Four-wheel drive, why is it called LP700?
With 700 horsepower, how fast can you imagine?
Well, I don't know, but according to the data, it only takes 2.9 seconds to accelerate from 0 to 100 km/h, which means that myvi only needs to reach 30 km/h when it reaches 100 km/h.
The low-slung body, the aggressive scissor doors, the huge intakes all over the car's flanks, and the glass-bottomed 6.5-litre V12, perfectly encapsulates the style of Lamborghini.
There is no need to say too much about the car model, just Google it yourself. We have collected some explanations that you may not get from Google!
Too much attention, where are you going, everyone is looking at you, uncomfortable! (Actually, it's a bit of a relief)
1km petrol costs around RM1 (the owner doesn't care)
Practice getting in and out of the car, otherwise it can be a bit embarrassing (because you can't get out of the car and get stuck half way)
The engine is too loud to hear after you get off, but it's totally worth it.
The car is too big to park in a normal parking space, and it's very dangerous to be hit by the door of the car next to you!
A little lonely, because there are no opponents on the road (I myself said this, and it has nothing to do with the car owner, haha)
Folks, this supercar is not for sale, sorry!
If you want to take a video of your car, please contact us!
More car news you didn't know about is available at The Car Guide / Allpar
A car accident worth millions of dollars!
The Bugatti Chiron and Porsche 911 are both well known to car enthusiasts, with the Chiron being one of the most expensive supercars in the world, and the Porsche 911 being one of the most expensive cars in the world!
Before that, in just a few minutes, foreign countries had knocked out a million 911s and a million supercars like the Chiron!
The results show that it was worth it!
Let the spirit of the university resonate with the spirit of the times - Xinhua News Agency
The spirit of a university is the long-term accumulation of a series of educational concepts and values in the process of development of a university, which is the soul of the university.
From ancient times to the present, the spirit of the university has been of great importance to the development of politics, economics, culture, science and technology, and society, and even the progress of a nation.
From the birth of the first modern university, the university has carried out a unique mission different from other social organizations. For Chinese universities, the spirit has been deeply influenced by traditional culture and the changes of the times. It advocates the value concept of “righteousness to the world and harmony to the world” and the patriotic responsibility of “strengthening the country and developing the country”.
At present, the trend of informationization and internationalization of higher education is becoming more and more obvious, and the global education competition, science and technology competition and talent competition are constantly intensifying. As an important "supply side", higher education is facing unprecedented opportunities and challenges in its structural reform.
Especially with the proposal of the Outline for Coordinated Promotion of World-Class Universities and World-Class Disciplines, it not only showed the confidence and determination of China to move from a big country in higher education to a strong country in higher education, but also set higher and more updated requirements for the development of universities.
How to achieve a leap in the world rankings in a relatively short period of time, and accelerate the construction of a number of world-class universities and a number of world-class disciplines on the basis of a certain gap, and achieve “surpassing the bends ” ?
In addition to the firm confidence in the goal, the path, and the ability, colleges and universities should fully play the three advantages: the first is the late advantage, through continuous introduction of outstanding academic talents from abroad, learning from the advanced experience of world-class universities, to achieve a significant improvement in academic levels and the quality of running schools; the second is the cultural advantage, inheriting the wisdom of Chinese civilization accumulated over five thousand years, promoting the development of excellent traditional culture, and thereby consolidating strength, shaping brands, and improving images; the third is the institutional advantage, making full use of the institutional superiority of socialist countries, strengthening goal-driven, pooling consensus, optimizing resource allocation, and providing a sustainable and solid guarantee for universities to accelerate catching up with the world's advanced levels.
It is particularly important to realize that it is impossible to build a world-class university in one school. At the same time, each school must highlight its own advantages and characteristics.
The distinctive features of education should have both common Chinese characteristics and reflect their own unique goals, positioning and school traditions and resources.
As for Zhejiang University, we have emphasized three features in our education: First, we have emphasized the training of innovative and entrepreneurial talents, built an integrated education environment of science and education, university and enterprise, so as to form a whole chain of entrepreneurship education ecology; Second, we have emphasized the feature of cross-disciplinary aggregation, promoted the optimization and adjustment of the discipline system, created a system environment of cross-disciplinary, so as to actively cultivate cross-disciplinary new disciplines and characteristic cross-disciplinary achievements; Third, we have emphasized the feature of the education system and social service, carried out in-depth international exchanges and cooperation, and accelerated the formation of a whole chain of cooperation between Zhejiang University and industry and research.
In this process, it is particularly important to always maintain the spirit of the university and let the spirit of the university resonate with the spirit of the times.
For Zhejiang University, the “Seek Truth and Innovation” school motto, the common values of “Diligence, Virtue, Clarity, and Practicality”, and the “Embrace the Ocean and River, Enlighten the Truth, Serve the People, and Build the Country” constitute the latest expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University.
This is an important guarantee for the school to persist in the correct direction of running schools, to continuously accumulate cultural height and to consolidate spiritual strength. It is rich in connotation and far-reaching in significance.
Among them, "Haihe River" emphasizes the spirit of openness and inclusiveness, which embodies the spirit of "using the talents of the world for my own use", and is manifested in the quality concept of quality education and training of world-class schools. "Qi Zhen Houde" emphasizes the spirit of seeking truth from facts, which means that the university should not only pursue the truth, but also be willing to accept the training of virtue and personality. "Ke Wu Ping Min" emphasizes the spirit of reform and innovation, which includes the spirit of seeking new knowledge and innovation in research, and is manifested in the spirit of reform and development and the spirit of innovation. "Shui Wo Bang Guo" emphasizes the spirit of patriotism and dedication, which means that the university should always be with the destiny of the nation and share the ups and downs of the nation.
This series of spiritual concepts and value pursuits is the soul of Zhejiang University's 120-year history.
"The wise listen to the silence, and the wise see the unseen."
Chinese universities should further stand on the global stage of socialist cause with Chinese characteristics, deeply grasp the era and historical mission of higher education, and accelerate the construction of world-class universities.
At the same time, upholding humanistic care and independence and freedom, so that the spirit of the university can resonate with the spirit of the times, the spirit of the nation, and provide inexhaustible motivation for the realization of national strength and national rejuvenation, and the realization of the common ideal of mankind.
Ordered a set, got 2 things wrong
Order
Wanted to pay the rider for the service
How can you pay now?
Iran President: If sanctions lifted, nuclear deal likely to be reached - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tehran, Dec. 11 (Reporter Gao Wencheng, Wang Shoubao) - Iranian President Hassan Rouhani said on Dec. 11 in Tehran, the capital of Iran, that if the United States lifts its sanctions on Iran, a comprehensive agreement on the Iranian nuclear issue can be reached.
According to a report published on the Iranian president's website, Larijani said during a meeting with Iranian ambassadors to neighboring countries that Iran has proven its willingness to negotiate by submitting proposals to other parties to the nuclear deal.
If the United States is determined, "the road to reaching an agreement will be open."
Talks between Iran and the five permanent members of the United Nations Security Council began in Vienna, Austria, in April this year to discuss the resumption of compliance by the two countries with the nuclear deal.
The new round of talks began in Vienna on November 29, and was temporarily suspended on December 3, and resumed on December 9.
I haven't received the delivery yet
Please contact the rider
Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Bay Area Science Forum - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11, 2021, President Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Bay Area Science Forum.
Xi Jinping pointed out that the world is undergoing a historic change unseen in a century, and global science and technology innovation has entered a dense and active period, and the new round of science and technology revolution and industrial transformation has had a profound impact on the global economic structure.
The Greater Bay Area should take the strategic positioning of building an international science and technology innovation center and strive to build a global science and technology innovation highland to promote the development of new industries.
China is ready to work with scientists and international science and technology organizations around the world to strengthen international science and technology exchanges and cooperation, strengthen research on major scientific issues, promote common scientific and technological breakthroughs, deepen scientific and technological cooperation on key scientific projects, and jointly promote the development of world science for the benefit of mankind.
The 2021 Big Bay Area Science Forum opened in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province on the day, with the theme of “exploring the future and sharing science”. It was co-sponsored by the Guangdong Provincial People’s Government.
Yes, the order is in the "accepted" state.
But the restaurant said it had to cut up the meat and bones because the rider didn't deliver the bones.
Do you understand my question?
It's not a delay in orders
Or you could have just called me
Are you following up?
The maximum length of time for college students to study and start their own businesses in Guangxi is up to 5 years - Xinhua News Agency
A reporter from Xinhua News Agency Nanning (reporter Zhang Ying) recently learned from the Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region Education Department that in the future, all colleges and universities in Guangxi will implement a flexible academic system, relax the time limit for university students to take a leave of absence, and extend the time limit for on-campus students to start a business by two to five years on the basis of the original academic system. The time for on-campus students to start a business can be regarded as practice education time.
In order to promote the improvement of the entrepreneurial innovation ability of college students, the education, labor and social welfare departments of Guangxi have joined hands to build a platform for entrepreneurship, and build more off-campus practice teaching bases, university science and technology parks, university entrepreneurship parks, and entrepreneurship incubation bases for college students, providing external guarantees for college students' entrepreneurship.
According to the requirements, by 2020, the innovation and entrepreneurship practice area of each university should reach more than 3000 square meters, and the undergraduate school should reach more than 3000 square meters, and the vocational school should reach more than 2000 square meters.
The government encourages universities to set up innovation and entrepreneurship credits, and supports students who perform well in innovation and entrepreneurship practice to transfer majors.
Every two years, college teachers must spend at least two months to work in industry enterprises to improve their awareness and ability of innovation and entrepreneurship education.
The Education Department of the autonomous region requires each college and university in Guangxi to implement the innovation and entrepreneurship training plan for college students in depth, so that every college student can participate in an innovation and entrepreneurship training plan during his or her study.
Colleges should actively organize students to participate in various levels of innovation and entrepreneurship competitions, and provide financial support.
NEWS GOV-MO: Australia awards honorary doctorate to seven distinguished people
The University of Macau held the "2021 Conferment of Honorary Degrees and Higher Degrees Ceremony" today (11) to award the Honorary Doctorate of the University to Liu Zunyi, Chen Kaixian, Nakamura Shojiro, Lee Lanjuan, Lee Xiaoling, Zhu Liliang and Jiang Chaohui in recognition of their outstanding achievements and significant contributions to the development of society and education.
At the conferment ceremony, the Vice-Chancellor and President of The University of Hong Kong, Prof. Michael K. Y. Leung, presented the Honorary Doctorate degrees to Prof. Lin Kincheng, Chairman of the University Council, and Prof. Song Yonghua, President of The University of Hong Kong, in the presence of Prof. Lin Kincheng, Chairman of the University Council, and Prof. Song Yonghua, President of The University of Hong Kong.
Professor Liu Zunyi was awarded the Honorary Doctor of Education Degree, Professor Chen Kaixian was awarded the Honorary Doctor of Science Degree, Professor Nakamura Shuji was awarded the Honorary Doctor of Science Degree, Professor Li Lanjuan was awarded the Honorary Doctor of Science Degree, Professor Li Xiaoling was awarded the Honorary Doctor of Business Administration Degree, Professor Zhu Lili was awarded the Honorary Doctor of Science Degree, and Ms. Jiang Chaohui was awarded the Honorary Doctor of Science Degree.
In his speech, Ou Yangyu first expressed his warm congratulations and high respect to the seven outstanding people who were awarded the honorary doctorates, who have made outstanding achievements in different fields and made great contributions to the development of the country and the progress of the world; at the same time, Ou Yangyu expressed his sincere blessings to the graduates and parents, and also expressed his sincere respect to the university’s dedicated and excellent teachers.
Professor Sun Yifang of the Australian National University delivered a valedictory speech when he read Liu Zunyi’s eulogy, saying that Professor Liu Zunyi was an internationally renowned economist and was known for his outstanding academic achievements and forward-looking educational philosophy.
In addition to his achievements in economic development, economic growth and East Asian economic fields, he was also a far-sighted educational leader.
In short, he has made great achievements in many fields.
Sun Yi Feng read a eulogy for Professor Nakajima, saying that Professor Nakajima was a pioneer of sustainable energy technology.
He was one of three winners of the 2014 Nobel Prize in Physics for inventing blue light-emitting diodes (LEDs).
Professor Nakamura's invention not only completely changed the lighting industry, but also led to the widespread application of white light-emitting diodes in daily life and industrial production, and made a great contribution to the welfare of mankind.
Sun Yifeng read out Li Lanjuan’s eulogy, saying that Professor Li Lanjuan, as the pioneer of China’s artificial liver industry, created a unique and effective Li artificial liver system, which made great breakthroughs in the treatment of severe hepatitis and hepatic failure, and significantly reduced the mortality of hepatic failure.
In the battle against the novel coronavirus, her team's "four against two balance" scheme and the three major technologies of artificial liver, micro-ecology and stem cells have significantly improved the survival rate of severe cases.
Sun Yifang read Li Xirong’s eulogy, saying that Professor Li Xirong laid the foundation for innovative research on operations management, shaped the thinking mode of supply chain theory and practice, and completely changed the business model of the world.
Li Xiaoliang is famous for popularizing the concept of the whip effect in operations management and has explored measures to deal with this phenomenon.
Now, with the outbreak and the tense economic situation, the long-term effect is increasingly prominent, and the supply chain is severely damaged.
Li Xialing's far-sighted research, such as the provision of coal in the snow, has helped the industry to cope with difficulties and has brought great social value.
Sun Yifang read a eulogy for Zhu Lili, saying that in her scientific research work, she discovered a breakthrough and innovative staining technique for preparing samples, which has a high reputation in the domestic and international scientific circles.
She has been awarded many important titles, such as the International Academy of Eurasian Sciences and the Corresponding Member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, for her outstanding achievements in science and technology.
Prof. Chen Xin, Dean of the Chinese Medicine Research Institute of the University of Macau, read Prof. Chen Kai-sen’s farewell speech, saying that Prof. Chen Kai-sen has devoted himself to the research and development of drugs for more than 40 years. His outstanding scientific achievements and important contributions to the country, Macao, the University of Macau and the State Key Laboratory have earned him a high international status and reputation.
His positive role in promoting the development of traditional Chinese medicine in Macao and the Greater Bay Area fully reflects his sense of mission to contribute to the country's pharmaceutical development strategy.
The president of the University of Technology of Australia said that Jiang Chaohui's major inventions and patents have accumulated more than 15 in the fields of storage virtualization, navigation, file system and power management, which are highly practical and widely used to improve the convenience of human life.
As an accomplished inventor, Ms. Jiang often manages to make high-tech and theoretical concepts accessible to the general public.
Finally, Chen Kai, as the representative of the honorary doctor, read the speech of thanks.
He was pleased to see that the medical industry in Macao and the Bay Area had set a good example: from the first state key laboratory of Chinese medicine and pharmacy established by the University of Macau to the rapid development of Chinese medicine in the Bay Area, the University of Macau has made a great contribution by integrating the excellent talents in the field of Chinese medicine in the Bay Area.
In addition, he believes that the management team of the University of Melbourne has a vision and is not only providing students with a research-rich environment, but also sending many people with a sense of responsibility into society.
He was honoured to be able to work with the University of Adelaide and congratulated the University on its recent achievements.
Did he have the right address?
I haven't seen it yet
That rider went the wrong way and I didn't get it.
But I #PRS_ORG# received
The app has not been able to contact the rider
My family thought I didn't
But it's been an hour.
As NFTs have taken the world by storm, the crypto community has come up with a new concept.
In 2021, a blockchain game called Axie Infinity had a huge impact in Southeast Asia, with residents who lost their jobs due to the pandemic starting to earn stable income from the game.
Axie Infinity is a pet-raising game built on the blockchain technology, which combines a variety of gameplay, including NFT, and is currently the highest-traded NFT project with more than $3 billion.
According to TokenTerminal data, Axie Infinity's daily income exceeded $82 million, approaching that of "League of Legends."
On August 6, Axie Infinity's official website announced that its daily active users exceeded 1 million.
The heat of Axie Infinity will pass on a new "palytoearn" model to more people, through the help of blockchain and smart contracts, players are no longer a single role, in addition to getting fun and economic benefits from the game, they can also participate in the governance of the game ecosystem.
This sovereignty is not granted by the game producer, but by the blockchain technology.
Seeing a news about a friend's stock price, my biggest feeling is that enterprises should choose the choice of the track, that is, the choice of the investment target industry, first of all, to choose the industry with a large growth space, at least 1000 billion market scale; secondly, to choose the industry with good growth potential in the future, considering that the growth potential of the industry will reach the best state in the next 3-5 years; lastly, to choose the industry with policy support.
The width of the track refers to the market size, the length of the track refers to the development stage of the industry, and the flatness or ruggedness of the track refers to the competitive pattern of the industry.
Go for the right lane!
The first thing in the new year is to summarize the adjustment of 2021 and adjust the tactical layout of 2022.
The strategy is to "do the right things," which means doing things right.
And the strategy is to "do the right thing," which is to do the right thing.
The strategic is in finding direction, the tactical is in landing, and there is plenty of room for strategic thinking above most tactical thinking.
For example, how to increase the number of customers (tactical thinking) above, can think about whether to deepen the current field or expand horizontally (strategic thinking); for example, how to improve customer retention rate (tactical thinking) above, can think about how to improve the retention rate of core customers and high-value customers (strategic thinking); in improving the participation rate of activities (tactical thinking) above, it can be considered how to set the correct activity KPI to achieve the correct activity target, such as improving the participation rate of target customers, activating high-value silent customers, and precision new customers. In improving DAU (tactical thinking) above, it can be considered whether the current growth is healthy and sustainable.
It has been 12 years since Bitcoin was born, and in 2021, it has witnessed several milestones.
On September 7, the small Central American country of El Salvador made Bitcoin its official currency, making it the first country or region to make Bitcoin a legal tender.
On October 12, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) approved ProShares' launch of a bitcoin ETF for the first time in eight years, and listed it on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE), marking the first regulated bitcoin futures ETF to enter the U.S. capital market, and expanding the investment scope of the cryptocurrency.
From the perspective of blockchain technology development, Bitcoin is not the main character.
On November 14, 2021, Bitcoin underwent a soft fork upgrade called “Taproot”, which improved the anonymity of Bitcoin network transactions and reduced the data burden of transactions by changing the data structure of the block itself.
McChicken, no McChicken sauce
If that McChicken was actually cooked, it would be a lot harder to eat
Is the $32 discount code only valid if you spend a certain amount of money?
Is it possible to cancel in less than 15 minutes?
I'm typing in the code, why is it saying order confirmation?
Okay
I didn't get the discount?
Hi
The food was not delivered
The rider has been delivered
I want you to be on time, not because I want your coupons!
Have you encountered problems with continuing education credits?
Late registrants are required to provide evidence of continuing professional development (CPD) for at least 30 hours in the 12 months preceding the date of application. Re-registrants are required to provide evidence of CPD for at least 120 hours in the 4 years preceding the date of re-registration. Re-registrants are required to provide evidence of CPD for at least 30 hours in each of the 12 years preceding the date of re-registration.
Cost engineers continue education fees standard
The cost of participating in continuing education is required to be paid to the respective management agencies when registering for the course. In general, the tuition fee is RMB 300 per person per year (including the continuing education unified textbook) for the compulsory courses of 30 hours.
The cost of the 30-hour elective course is 300 yuan/person/year.
The cost of compulsory courses and elective courses is 600 yuan/person/year (including the unified teaching materials for continuing education).
(1) Participate in continuing education learning organized by the registered price engineer network of the China Price Association or the provincial and departmental management institutions, and calculate the credit hours according to the time recorded in the online learning courseware;
(2) Participate in the centralized training of registered cost engineers organized by the Central Price Commission or provincial and departmental management institutions, and various types of training courses, seminars, etc., which can be counted as 4 credits per half day;
(3) Continue to provide training for cost engineers, cost accountants, and cost managers of provincial and municipal governments and departments, which can be counted as 10 credits per half-day;
(4) Participate in the Zhongji Co., Ltd. and provincial research projects, compile industry standards, and write teaching materials. Each year, 30 hours of credit will be recognized for each item.
(VI) Participate in the preparation of the national professional qualification examination for cost engineers, as well as the setting, marking and evaluation of the examination papers, which can be recognized as 30 credits per year;
(7) Engineering cost-related professional papers, books, and reports published with personal authorship and made publicly available.
Publishing a book of 10,000 words is equivalent to 12 credits.
For every 1,000 words published in a national journal, 8 teaching hours are recognized; for every 1,000 words published in a provincial journal, 5 teaching hours are recognized; and for every 1,000 words published in a municipal journal, 3 teaching hours are recognized.
(9) Organizations of engineering cost consulting enterprises approved or authorized by the Joint Price Negotiation Committee, provincial and department management institutions, and provincial construction cost associations can hold public training (excluding general management and skill training of enterprises) every half day, with a maximum of 4 credits per day, and a maximum of 30 credits per year.
The cost engineer network continues to learn the learning process
After the registration institution receives the fee, the student's identity is immediately opened, and the cost engineer can enter the online education classroom with his/her username and password.
Students learn through podcasts, question-and-answer sessions, and online discussions.
If you forget your password, you will be prompted for your username and password when you attempt to log in, and you will not be able to log in to study. Please contact your registered institution to help you change your password (but not your username), and use the new password to log in again.
Scan the QR code to download the Baidu Tieba client
Watch the high-definition live broadcast and video!
Please arrange delivery
My order hasn't arrived
The delivery man left without collecting the goods
Please notify the delivery person immediately, we are still waiting
The restaurant had given the rider food 30 minutes ago
The visual wedding photography base (Hebei store) has not yet opened a branch
The bridal fashion was ahead of the curve, the makeup was top notch, the photography and angles were professional, and the results were great.
A very reliable seller with good service.
The makeup was very exquisite, and the team service was also very good. This trip was very happy, and the professional team was very good. The seller's service attitude is very good, and he will introduce it to his friends. I am very satisfied.
Thank you to the photographer and makeup artist for giving me a one-of-a-kind wedding photo.
Thank you to all the staff who worked so hard to make our day so special.
Photographing a wedding is a physical job, especially for the photographer, who runs and jumps around.
The make-up artist was very thoughtful and designed a suitable makeup for my face shape. The photographer was humorous and professional during the shoot.
Thank you to my photographer and makeup artist for allowing me to look this beautiful in my last days.
The bride-to-be is pretty, has a good figure, and is well-behaved and well-mannered. She will be a good wife and mother in the future.
The bridegroom was lucky, happy, and had a beautiful wife.
The wedding photos are really good, just like what the Internet says, and we look very handsome and beautiful. We are very satisfied.
The seller's attitude is also very enthusiastic.
This trip was not only to appreciate the scenery, but also to take beautiful wedding photos, and also met this photographer friend.
The wedding photos are too good to be true, and the photographer and makeup artist are super professional.
I am very grateful to Mrs. Mu for her patience and careful guidance. I like the photos taken by her very much.
When I saw the wedding photos, I didn't recognize myself for a moment.
With the right photographer, you can have wedding photos that rival those of celebrities.
The most important thing about taking wedding photos is that both the photographer and the makeup artist are online. Fortunately, I met them.
When I saw my wedding photos, I realized that I was also "photoshopped."
Asian-American groups file discrimination complaints against 3 Ivy League schools - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Washington, May 23 (Reporter Xu Jianmei) - More than 130 Asian-American groups submitted complaints to the U.S. Department of Education and the Department of Justice against three Ivy League schools -- Yale University, Brown University and Dartmouth College -- for discriminating against Asian-American applicants in the admission process.
The Asian American Education Alliance, which filed the complaint, held a news conference in Washington the same day.
The president of the group, Zhao Yuankang, said at a press conference that the number of Asian applicants who meet the criteria for admission to top U.S. universities has more than doubled in the past 10 years, but the proportion of Asians at the three top U.S. universities has basically remained the same.
Many studies have shown that these colleges discriminate against Asian applicants in their "holistic" admissions process, "systematically and systematically" discriminating against Asian applicants over time.
Zhao Yuankang said that the research of Sanders and others in 2014 showed that in the three universities, the relative number of Asians was the lowest among all ethnic groups in the acceptance rate.
Brown University and Dartmouth College, both Ivy League schools, have the lowest acceptance rates for Asian students, and Yale University and Brown University have implemented de facto racial quotas for Asian applicants for more than 20 years.
Zhao Yuankang told Xinhua News Agency reporters that they hope that after filing a complaint, the U.S. Department of Education and the Department of Justice will conduct an investigation and take measures to prevent these universities from discriminating against Asians in enrollment.
They also expect the colleges that have received complaints to take the issue seriously and change their admissions policies towards Asian students.
The three universities have not yet responded to the complaints.
The Asian American Education Alliance was founded in 2015, when it filed a complaint against Harvard University for discriminatory admissions practices, but the U.S. Department of Education declined to pursue the case on procedural grounds.
In addition to the Asian American group, the coalition includes Indian, Korean, Japanese, and Pakistani education groups.
Need cutlery
Just cancelled the order
Why is it still going ahead?
Can you check to see if it was cancelled?
But I placed my order at 5:09 a.m. in the morning.
They don't know what they're talking about over there
Is there a phone number I can call directly?
In September 2020, Mr. Lu learned from a real estate agent that a factory building located in Jingtong Town, Yiwu, Zhejiang Province. After several site visits, Mr. Lu decided to purchase the factory building.
In December of the same year, Mr. Lu negotiated with the family of the owner of the factory house after purchasing the factory building, and transferred 200,000 yuan as a down payment on the same day through the bank.
Lin wrote his signature on the receipt for the deposit for the sale of the factory, which stated that if the buyer did not want to buy the factory, the deposit would be returned to the seller, and if the seller did not want to sell the factory, the deposit would be doubled and returned to the seller. The two parties agreed to sign a contract for the sale of the factory within a week.
However, after the parties failed to reach an agreement on the main contract terms, such as the scope of the sale of the factory and the payment method, the house purchase contract was delayed for a long time.
After a few days, Lin returned the 200,000 yuan deposit to Mr. Lu.
After finally finding the house of his dreams, the deposit was paid and the mortgage arranged, all that was left was to sign the contract, but the seller didn't sell, leaving Mr. Lu helpless and angry.
Therefore, Mr. Luo sued Mr. Lin to the Yucheng City People's Court.
The court considered that the parties failed to sign a formal contract, and it was not reasonable to hold the defendant solely responsible for the failure to negotiate. Therefore, this case should not apply the penalty provision of the deposit, and the defendant is not required to bear the double return of the deposit.
The plaintiff appealed the first judgment.
Recently, the Second Court of Appeal upheld the original judgment.
【Lawyers remind】 In the process of the transaction, you should pay attention to the necessary caution.
As a buyer, you have a duty to take reasonable care, for example, to verify the information about the property owner and whether the property is occupied, and to make clear in the contract the specific time and place of delivery, to avoid disputes arising at the time of delivery.
(Deutsche Welle Chinese) After the "Summit of Democracy" ended on Friday, China's Foreign Ministry spokesperson said on Saturday (December 11) that the United States' hosting of the "Leaders' Summit on Democracy" is "to divide the world into two camps, to draw ideological lines, to arm and weaponize democracy, to use the name of pseudo-democracy to do anti-democratic deeds, to foment splits and confrontations, and to divert domestic contradictions."
China believes that "for a long time, the United States has imposed its political system and value concepts on people, promoted the "democratic reform", abused unilateral sanctions, instigated the "color revolution", and caused disastrous consequences.
"Democracy" has already become America's "weapon of mass destruction" when it comes to interfering in other countries.
The summit is a fulfillment of Biden's campaign promise.
The two-day meeting was held via video and was attended by 111 leaders from 111 countries, including Taiwan, but China and Russia were not invited.
Before the summit, China and Russia criticized the United States for its own democratic problems, saying that the United States was not qualified to host such a summit.
There have also been criticisms internationally and domestically, such as the inclusion of some leaders with authoritarian tendencies, such as the leaders of the Philippines, Poland, and Brazil, who have been invited. It is suspected that the Biden administration's real intention is not to promote democracy, but to organize the summit for geopolitical purposes.
The new German Chancellor Scholz also attended the video democracy summit
China's Foreign Ministry said in a statement on Saturday that "Today's American-style democracy is sick, and the problems of money politics, identity politics, partisanship, political polarization, social fracture, racial conflicts, and rich-poor divide are becoming more and more severe."
In his remarks, President Biden said, "As leaders of government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, to strengthen the guardrails of democracy, to push for reform, to achieve transparency and accountability, and to better resist the forces of authoritarianism, and those who would seek naked power before the public interest. "
He stressed that democracy is not a given, "we have to keep renewing it generation after generation, and in my view, this is the defining challenge of our time."
Biden also said that "democracy and human rights are under sustained and troubling challenge around the world" and that "democracy needs champions."
The United States has promised to launch a year-long effort after the summit, including a $4.244 billion initiative to strengthen democracy around the world and support independent news media.
The United States hopes that countries will make specific public commitments before the 2022 end-of-year physical democracy summit to improve their democratic systems.
Biden said, "Let's all countries implement our commitments and report on our progress next year."
Well, I just hope he got the right address.
Ji Chang Restaurant (Wudaokou store)
Mint environment: Average [service bell] service: The food is served quickly "Gufamala Gao" my must-order dish Gufamala Gao is too fragrant and too soft and too delicious😋 People who like desserts must try "Dongjiang...
The food was good, the service was great.
It has been a long time since I came to Jichang, and the fruit is still so delicious and real. The first time I ordered a roast pork bun, it was the southern taste of soft flour!
The congee was just right in terms of wetness, and the portion was very generous. The signature chicken wings were as good as ever, and the soup was also very good. The treatment of the celery was also quite...
The food was great, the service was great, the meat was great.
The old shop of Ji Chang is also a popular place, and it has been a popular place for a long time. The Dongshan Xiao Lou and the wooden floor.
It is always a long wait to get a bowl of claypot rice, and the claypots are all cracked.
I haven't been to Ji Chang for a few years, and the rise of various small shops has dispersed the crowds.
It's rare to find a table when you walk in, and the quality of the food is as good as ever.
The flavors were great, the meat was great, the main dish was great.
Jichang take-out.
[Rice] Meal: This time the food was a little disappointing.
Three Cups Chicken: The side dishes were a bit too much, and the chicken was a bit too little.
The main flavor is a bit off, the bottom is not salty enough, which highlights the sweetness, you can imagine sweet + various seasonings...
What is a red label whiskey?
Everyone has different hobbies, some like to collect, some like to eat, of course, there are also those who like to drink, and the red label whiskey is one of the most popular Scottish whiskies in the world, and the red label whiskey has won the gold medal at the International Spirits Competition.
Each bottle of red label whiskey has its own unique taste, but if you don't know how to appreciate it, you are wasting its flavor.
So, how do you drink a red label whiskey?
Here is a brief introduction for you.
Red Label whisky:
The Johnnie Walker Red Label is a blend of about 35 whiskies from across Scotland, with a rich aroma and traditional Speyside character, with rich aromas of honey and smoke.
The entry is fresh and slightly grassy, with hints of vanilla and smoked malt.
It can be drunk straight from the bottle or mixed with your favorite drink.
Red label whiskey entered China, and in order to adapt to the taste of the Chinese people, red label whiskey + cola or Sprite or new energy drinks became a fashion that lasted for a long time.
These sweet drinks can not only neutralize the sour taste, but also make people feel happy when they are added to the drink, and can change the taste of the drink.
The most authentic and traditional way to drink it is with red wine, slices of lemon, and sugar (sugar can also be used).
The original red wine has a little bit of sourness, and adding sugar can neutralize the sourness. Lemon will bring a refreshing aroma to the wine, of course, the sweetness can be adjusted according to personal taste.
The above three are the best way to drink red label whiskey, and you can try them as a reference. I hope my introduction can help you.
Education thinking: How the university entrance examination makes the “genius” and the “idiot” each get their own way - Xinhua News Agency
Three Lanzhou Jiaotong University students wrote letters to the school leaders to reflect their confusion about the university entrance exam and to propose that the difficulty of the exam be raised, the exam questions be changed, and the exam truly reflect the students' actual level.
Indeed, for a long time, college exams have been a "hot topic."
In the university campus, students come from all over the country and have different levels of ability, and the learning situation is very different.
It is inevitable to have different feelings when assessing a group with so many features.
Of course, if the exam questions are of a single type, with a high degree of repetition, and the questions are too easy, this will inevitably lead to a completely different feeling.
The students who don't study hard may be able to pass the exam by cramming before the exam, but if they try other ways, they may achieve double the result with half the effort.
As a result, there are "dummies" who can pass the exam even if they don't put in any effort, and even get high scores; and there are "geniuses" who don't fall behind in class, do their homework and notes well, and don't get high scores at all.
It seems that the Lanzhou Jiaotong University students' reflection on the problems in the university entrance examination is not for no reason, and Lanzhou Jiaotong University is not the only one.
In this sense, we should applaud the students who wrote letters to the three.
In fact, anyone who has gone to university knows that it is not uncommon to see people trying to get hold of past papers from their teachers, trying to squeeze the syllabus, and trying to get "special tutoring" before the exam. Even in the exam itself, it is not uncommon to see people sneaking in notes and asking their teachers to raise their hand.
In my opinion, as a teaching quality evaluation-oriented measure, whether a university's examination is qualified or not is more in the comprehensive grasp of teachers on teaching and learning, and on this basis, scientific setting of questions.
At the undergraduate stage, specialisation begins, and many courses are based on basic knowledge.
Without a doubt, whether or not one has a comprehensive grasp of the basic knowledge points of a subject is what is tested in college entrance examinations.
Undergraduate knowledge is basically the basic theory and basic common sense of each discipline, and the change space of knowledge points is not large, which is basically fixed.
As teachers have said, "20 years ago you learned the basics of university maths, and now you're still learning, and it's important."
But the knowledge points are basically unchanged, and it does not mean that the exam questions are all the same or repeated.
In many universities, the examination is usually organized by a group of examiners, and the examination paper is compiled by the senior teachers of the subject, and the marking of the examination is also carried out by the whole teachers of the subject, so as to overcome the situation of repeated questions to a certain extent.
However, it is difficult to formulate a set of exam questions that meet the actual conditions of teaching and learning. The exam questions should be formulated according to the overall situation of students' learning, and the difficulty should be in a normal distribution. In addition, the teaching situation should be comprehensively analyzed, and the degree of students' learning should be comprehensively analyzed, so that the exam questions can have a dynamic grasp of the difficulty and types of questions. At the same time, the exam questions should be innovatively designed.
Exams are the command rod of university education, and what kind of exam students will have a corresponding preparation plan, and in the long run, it will affect the effectiveness of university education.
Lanzhou Jiaotong University attaches great importance to the advice letters from students, and has deployed a rectification plan in the whole school.
Require each teaching unit to organize teachers to conduct self-examination through seminars and course completion examinations, formulate examination papers and related systems, and strengthen supervision and inspection over the examination paper-setting and examination process, and refine the grading of scores, and strengthen the comprehensive assessment of all aspects of course teaching.
From the perspective of mechanism, the problems of single question type, repeated questions and so on are issues that need to be faced by university examination affairs. Of course, it is necessary to put in place corresponding systems, but the key is daily work. Teachers need to have a comprehensive understanding of the teaching situation, not only to understand the teaching content, but also to understand the learning situation of the students. Both sides need to understand each other, and the teaching and learning will be better connected, and the examination will be more in line with reality, so that the "brainy students" and the "stupid students" can get what they deserve.
If I can't change the store location, can I have it delivered?
I don't have to give you any more money, do I?
The orders have already been delivered
We can't get it done
GPS? No, no, no.
The Mrs. King's Bridal (South Street Store) has not yet opened a branch.
Because we didn't arrange the time well before the photo shoot, we changed the time twice. Lanlan was very patient and helped us arrange the time.
Later, he chose a sunny weekend to shoot.
The staff of King's, from the consultants to the make-up artists to the photographers, were all superb.
That was my first time to formally put on makeup, wow, I can't believe that one day I will look like this, haha.
Xiaojie and another sister (sorry I can't remember her name) did their makeup very patiently and naturally.
The outdoor scenes were filmed in Georgetown, and we were lucky that the weather was good that day. We didn't feel very cold when we were taking pictures, and the makeup artist would occasionally check our clothes, headwear, and so on. If there was something wrong, they would help us fix it immediately.
The photographer was also very funny and made the day very enjoyable.
When selecting photos, because I had seen many cases online, I didn't want to delete too many photos for the guests, but when we selected the photos, really, none of us wanted to add photos to the package, and the 24 photos in the package were just as they were. (I heard that my sister-in-law, who had the same time as me to take wedding photos, added a thousand more photos to the thousand-dollar package, and I was shocked. I was also afraid that I would choose too many photos.)
Today, the photos were fixed, and Lan Lan sent them to me. I looked at two of them and felt that they were not very good. They immediately helped me to fix them.
I compared the photos of my sister taken before, and I feel that our photos are really satisfactory. They are simple and fresh, just the style I want.
I sincerely recommend everyone to go to the wedding photo of Mrs. Zhenshan Jin.
Package price: 3999 yuan
Mrs. King is grateful for your kind wishes and wishes you all happiness and prosperity in the future!
How much is this set?
What conditions would $32 meet?
That's good, no refund needed
Your rider says he can't find it
Not found
But I didn't understand a word he was saying in English.
The editors bring you which Omega watch is good?
How does the Omega mechanical watch hold up?
1. Swiss Omega OMEGA Seamaster Automatic Men's Watch, Quartz Women's Watch
Recommendation: Swiss made, time art at your fingertips, OMEGA is elegant, simple and understated, but very attractive, suitable for commuting and formal occasions.
The couple's style, which expresses the sweetness of love between them, is always together, and the exquisite pointer makes people fall in love at first sight.
No quotes
2, Swiss Omega (OMEGA) watch, the disc fly series steel bracelet automatic mechanical men's couple watch quartz women's watch 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001
Reasons for recommendation: Swiss made, must be a masterpiece, Omega watch, thin and elegant gold watch, couple watch, both can show the noble identity and show the sweet love.
The dial design makes the time scale more clear, and the blue dial is popular. The overall design is simple and clear.
The brand OMEGA, the strap material is steel, the dial color is blue, the movement type is mechanical (automatic), the waterproof function is 30 meters, the display type is pointer, the national warranty is national warranty, the strap interface type is flat interface, the case material is stainless steel, the case size for men's watch is 39.5mm, the case size for women's watch is 27.4mm, the strap interface size is 20mm, the buckle type is butterfly, the crystal material is artificial sapphire, and there are currently 3 reviews, with a 100% positive rating.
3. Swiss OMEGA OMEGA Butterfly series men's automatic mechanical quartz 424.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001
Recommended reason: Swiss made, quality benchmark, the movement of this Omega watch is very accurate, the couple design, simple and elegant appearance, the time flows from the edge of the pointer, and it is always moving at a slow and steady pace, suitable for business people to wear, and release the charm of the wrist.
4. Swiss OMEGA watch, disc fly series, automatic mechanical watch, men's watch, fashion quartz watch, couple watch, pair of watches
Omega couple watches, pair of watches, deposit
Recommended reason: Original imported from Switzerland, it is natural that it is of high quality. Omega is elegant and simple, but it is very attractive, and it can be worn in commuting and formal occasions.
The fashion, the style, the grace, the elegance, the movement of the pointer, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see you, I see
The watch is made of stainless steel bracelet, mechanical (automatic), buckle type folding, waterproof function 30 meters, dial size 39.5 for men and 27.4 for women, display type pointer, national warranty, bracelet connection type flat connection, case back material stainless steel, dial color white, brand Omega, bracelet connection size 18mm, crystal material artificial sapphire, currently has 20+ people evaluated, received 100% of the praise.
So I'm going to give you the curry base back to you?
I only received half
There were six boxes that didn't have anything in them
The company was working late, and I hadn't eaten since lunch. I wanted to order take-out, but I didn't know if it would be cancelled.
You're Zheng Mei, and this is your second week in Japan.
You're walking down the street and suddenly someone is following you, and you're running faster and faster until you're running away.
He was behind you, calling, "Miss! Please wait!" (in full Japanese dialogue) You stopped at the convenience store.
"Miss... I'm a director, and I think you're very pretty. Would you be interested in doing a reality show?"
You're suspicious, afraid it's a scam.
He hands you a business card and you discover he is a director for one of Japan's largest entertainment companies.
"If you have time, we can go to the company to talk, the remuneration is definitely not enough."
He said he came to the company in a hurry because he saw you on the street, and he really wanted you to come.
You think it's no big deal, and you can make money, so you sign the contract.
It's a big dating reality show, split into two parts.
The earlier seasons allowed celebrities and ordinary people to get to know each other in real life and build a bond.
Later, they will enter the game together to complete the challenge.
It's going to start recording next week, and you don't know who your partner is going to be, or what kind of fun things are going to happen.
So, is the system able to see the new orders?
So what would happen to that rider?
I can't accept an order that hasn't been delivered in 20 minutes
3,200 newborn babies in Sabah without birth certificates due to lack of counterfeit-proof paper
(Kuala Lumpur, Nov 11) The National Registration Department of Sabah said that due to the shortage of special anti-counterfeiting paper, it has not been able to issue birth certificates to newborn babies since early October, and the cumulative number of affected people has reached 3,200.
However, the director of the bureau, Kareem Aminus, assured that all babies who have already applied for birth certificates will have their information recorded in the system, and new certificates will be issued once the anti-counterfeiting paper arrives next week.
At a press conference, he explained the 10-month delay in printing the Sarawak Report by referring to a news website.
He said the issue had been raised two months ago and Sarawak was facing the same problem.
"One reason is that the Chinese manufacturers of customized anti-counterfeiting paper have been affected by the epidemic, resulting in delays in delivery to China. "
He explained that the paper used for the Sarawak Report was different to that used in other states and so it was not possible to borrow stock from other states.
Keralamurthy revealed that the latest batch of security paper arrived in Kuala Lumpur on June 6 and was handed over to the printing company on June 8 for some printing work.
"The office will send someone to Kuala Lumpur on Thursday to collect the goods, and immediately start the final stage of printing in Sabah, which is estimated to take two working days (December 20) to deliver to the applicant. "
"We will notify applicants to collect their admission papers at local offices. "
He added that Sabah has issued 24,801 birth certificates this year.
I've been waiting since around 7 p.m.
Is that about to happen?
I mean food
I'm also waiting across the street at #PRS_ORG.
Well, thank you, because the restaurant says they're ready.
People's Daily commentator: "14th Five-Year Plan" off to a good start - - on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11, 1999 - People's Daily Comment on December 12, 1999: "14th Five-Year Plan" Achieves a Good Start - - On Learning and Implementing the Central Economic Work Conference
"Achieved a good start to the 14th Five-Year Plan" and highly evaluated the achievements of China's economic and social development in the past year at the Central Economic Work Conference held from December 8 to 10.
General Secretary Xi Jinping delivered an important speech at the meeting, deeply summarized the work of the economy in 2021, analyzed the current economic situation in depth, and made major deployments for the work of the economy in 2022, providing a direction for us to do a good job in the economy next year and the successful convening of the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China.
We solemnly celebrate the 100th anniversary of the founding of the Communist Party of China, officially announce the completion of the construction of a moderately prosperous society and the realization of the first centenary goal, and embark on the journey of comprehensively building a modern socialist country and advancing to the second centenary goal.
We held the 19th CPC National Congress, summed up the major achievements and historical experience of the Party in its hundred years of struggle, passed the third historical resolution of the CPC Central Committee on the major achievements and historical experience of the Party in its hundred years of struggle, which is a political declaration of the Communist Party of China in the new era to remember its mission and purpose, to uphold and develop socialism with Chinese characteristics, and is an action guide for realizing the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
Over the past year, the world has witnessed a once-in-a-century major change and the global spread of the new coronavirus pandemic, and the external environment has become more complex and severe. The domestic epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development tasks are extremely heavy and arduous.
Under the leadership of General Secretary Xi Jinping, the Party Central Committee has persisted in taking a holistic view of domestic and international affairs, persisted in adhering to the general guiding principle of stability and progress, remained calm in the face of a century-long change and a century-long epidemic, and taken a holistic view of epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, accelerated the construction of a new development pattern, strengthened macro-policy fine-tuning across cycles, and worked hard to promote sustainable and healthy economic development, and worked hard to deepen reform and opening up and innovation, and made strenuous efforts to accomplish the arduous tasks of reform and development.
The "14th Five-Year Plan" has achieved a good start, and an important aspect is that we have made new progress in building a new development pattern and achieved new results in high-quality development.
China's economic development and epidemic prevention and control have maintained a leading position in the world, and the characteristics of strong resilience, great potential and strong driving force have continued to show. The national strategic science and technology forces have accelerated their growth, and major innovative achievements have emerged one after another. The science and technology innovation capability has continued to improve, and the breakthrough of key and core technologies has been achieved. The resilience of the industrial chain has been improved, and the volume of foreign trade has continued to increase, and the structure has continued to optimize. The new driving force represented by new industries and new businesses has continued to grow and develop. The reform and opening-up has been promoted in depth, and the blocking points of supply and demand matching and the flow of factors have been broken through, and the new advantages of cooperation and competition have been created. The people's livelihood has been effectively guaranteed, the employment scale has continued to expand, and the income of residents has grown in line with the growth of the economy, and the growth of residents' income has been synchronized with the growth of the economy. The annual grain output has remained above 130 billion tons for seven consecutive years, and the "eighteen consecutive years of good harvest" has been achieved.
These achievements are the result of the strong leadership of the Central Committee of the Party with Comrade Xi Jinping at its core, the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, and the result of the concerted efforts and hard work of the whole party and the whole country.
Practice has again proved that the Party has established Xi Jinping’s core position in the Party Central Committee and the whole Party, and has established the guiding position of Xi Jinping’s new era socialism with Chinese characteristics. It is of great significance to the development of the Party and the country in the new era, and to the advancement of the historical process of the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
With General Secretary Xi Jinping as the core and the core of the whole party, with Xi Jinping’s new era of socialism with Chinese characteristics as the scientific guidance, with the whole party and the whole people of all ethnic groups united and determined to struggle, we will definitely be able to overcome all kinds of difficulties and obstacles and create new achievements and make new historical achievements in the new journey of building a modern socialist country.
The 20th National Congress of the Party will be held next year, which is a major event in the political life of the Party and the country.
Adhering to the great spirit of the founding of the Party, adhering to the general tone of seeking progress while standing firm, fully and accurately implementing the new development concept, speeding up the construction of a new development pattern, comprehensively deepening reform and opening up, insisting on innovation-driven development, promoting high-quality development, insisting on supply-side structural reform as the main line, coordinating epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, and coordinating development and safety, we will definitely be able to maintain a stable and healthy economic environment, a social environment of national stability and public order, and a political environment of cleanliness and honesty, so as to welcome the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China with great success.
Let us unite more closely around the Party Central Committee with General Secretary Xi Jinping at its core, strengthen the “four consciousnesses”, the “four confidence”, and achieve the “two guarantees”, continuously improve our political judgment, political insight and political execution, and implement the Party Central Committee’s decision and arrangements in an actual sense, and constantly push forward the cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era.
I re-ordered with the points, thanks to you.
Where did you take the address from?
I can't see the address
Download the Suning.com APP
Follow the public number of Suning Push
Save money, share profits
Download the SuNing Financial APP
Follow the service number of Suning E-commerce
Super convenient, just like opening a file on my computer. It solved my problem of running out of hard disk space on my computer.
The new solid state drive I just got is not readable by the mobile solid state drive computer, the mobile solid state drive computer is not recognized by the mobile solid state drive computer, but the computer with the U disk can be read.
The machine is very light and easy to operate. It is beautiful and atmospheric.
I used it for an afternoon and the heat dissipation was very good. I didn't feel hot at all, and the running speed was very fast. It killed 99% of the users in seconds when it was turned on.
The battery is also very strong, and it should have no problem with 9 hours of standby and 4 hours of use. In short, this price can buy this kind of quality of the machine, I feel very happy, and other functions and so on will be added later.
It looks very good.
In terms of performance, I will evaluate after using it for a period of time.
The machine is fast, bigger than I expected, and the rendering effect is very good. I like it. I will wait and see after using it for a period of time.
It's not bad, and the serial number of the machine was found in Hong Kong. The quality should be OK.
**Feels like a brick, one hand can't hold it, it's not really big, it's just a little bit bigger than 15.6 inches, runs very stable, and doesn't feel any lag, and the fan noise is great, and it feels great, and it doesn't spin like a gaming laptop.
The things are good, and they are much cheaper than the official flagship store, and they also sent a backpack, which is very good.
The in-store service was also good, reminding me to update my BIOS and getting my PC up and running in no time.
Worth it!
Heat dissipation: The heat dissipation is very good, and there is basically no heat. The lightness degree: It is convenient to carry. The appearance material: The traditional design of Thinkpad is satisfactory.
The seller is a reliable seller, and carefully checks the appearance of the whole machine, all interfaces, no refurbishment or traces of use. It is indeed a new and beautiful version, and the configuration is the same as the page.
Forgot to send the backpack, immediately sent me a backpack, although not the original factory backpack, but the service follow-up is enough to prove that it is a conscience seller.
If a friend needs a notebook, I'll buy it again.
Exterior material: The exterior is atmospheric, and the display effect is good. The screen resolution can be, the clarity is good, and the weight is light. The texture is good, after all, the heavier the thing is, the better it feels.
Heat dissipation: I tried it out for the first time, and I will evaluate it later.
The keyboard is very good when typing, and a mouse and a converter were also sent. This configuration is very cost-effective compared to domestic ones. In general, the things are cheap and the performance of the machine will be evaluated after using it for a period of time.
This screen is so relaxing!
It's very easy to use, and I'll review it after using it for a while!
Education information: Beijing compresses the proportion of 2016 early middle school entrance special talents - Xinhua News Agency
On the 21st and 22nd, the examination work for the special entrance examination for junior high school students in Beijing was implemented by the unified organization of each district education committee.
This year, all districts in Beijing have compressed the proportion of special talents admitted, and the competition for special talents has become more fierce.
For example, in Dongcheng District, the proportion of special talents admitted to junior high school in this year is generally not more than 5% of the total number of enrollments in the district. The number of planned enrollments is 380, and the proportion of enrollment is not more than 10% of the number of enrollments in the school.
Students with sports, art and science talents and who have registered online are eligible to participate in the special entrance examination.
In order to facilitate students to participate in the examination nearby, the Dongcheng District continued the examination arrangement of last year, and set up 1-2 examination sites in each school district, with a total of 13 examination sites.
The examination points are divided according to the examination area, and the examination time is divided according to the hour, and the students will be examined in different examination rooms in different examination areas according to the examination time.
On May 23, the online examination center of the district education bureau posted the list of students who passed the examination. Students can check the examination results online.
Can it be delivered in 10 to 15 minutes?
No food received
The key is that I haven't eaten since last night.
If you don't get it, you can say it earlier
President of the Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina: Confident that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, the Xinhua News Agency reported that Kvesic, the president of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina, said recently that his country is looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics and believes that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period.
Chinese Ambassador to BiH Qi Ping met with the president of the BiH Olympic Committee, Kvesic, in Sarajevo yesterday.
During the meeting, Kvesic positively evaluated the relations between the two countries and said that he had visited China in 2008 during the Beijing Olympic Games and was deeply impressed by the excellent organization work of the Chinese side. He believed that China has the ability to successfully hold the Winter Olympic Games in a special period of time; the Bosnian Olympic Committee is actively organizing the participation of the Winter Olympic Games in Beijing; he hopes to have more exchanges and cooperation with China in the field of sports.
Jiping said that the two countries have a special "Olympic bond."
The 1984 Sarajevo Winter Olympics were successfully held here, and in two months, the 2022 Beijing Winter Olympics will open, presenting the world with a simple, safe and wonderful event.
The Chinese Embassy in Bosnia and Herzegovina is willing to continue to play the role of a bridge, to promote the deepening of people-to-people exchanges between the two countries, and to let the people of the two countries “go together towards the future”, and wish the Bosnian athletes to achieve good results in the Beijing Winter Olympics.
Before the meeting, the Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee held the "Best Athlete of the Year" award ceremony, and Ji Ping, as a special guest, presented the award to the best young athlete of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The event played a loop of Beijing 2022 Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games promotional videos.
Disappointing
Will you refund me?
It's not acceptable! The shipping fee is 20 yuan
There's no way around it! Ask that restaurant
Thanks for following, of course some of the riders did a great job
Chocolate: The Dark Art by Dominique Ansel, translated by Miao Xiaoxiao, Shanghai Science and Technology Press【Original book, full discount】
Original books support seven-day no-questions-asked returns
Grandma's New Year's Eve: Sing-a-thon, Clear-Winter-Air, Grandpa's a Stupid Child, Grandma Lives in a Weird Town, Dumplings and Soup, a Block of Chocolate, 2022
[Nora's Books] The original "Crying Chocolate", the original "The Thief and the Little Hand", the original 1st, 2nd and 3rd grade, the original classic story book set, children's literature, elementary school students' extra-curricular books
【佳英财图书】2022大阅小森百班千人二年级奶奶的除夕夜一块巧克力二十四节气爷爷是个笨小孩我的奶奶住在古里古怪镇饺子和汤
[Nola Books] Charlie and the Chocolate Factory by Roald Dahl, Illustrated by Quentin Blake, Puffin Books, 1964.
The 13 books, the amazing Fox Father, the Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, the Roald Dahl Collection, the Children's Story Book, the 9-12 grade, the 2nd-4th grade, the 5th-6th grade, the 7th-8th grade, the 9th-12th grade, the Elementary Plus, Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, Level 5, Level 6, Level 7, Level 8, Level 9, Level 10, Level 11, Level 12, Level 13, Level 14, Level 15, Level 16, Level 17, Level 18, Level 19, Level 20, Level 21, Level 22, Level 23, Level 24, Level 25, Level 26, Level 27, Level 28, Level 29, Level 30, Level 31, Level 32, Level 33, Level 34, Level 35, Level 36, Level 37,
The Scary Science series has 72 volumes, the classic mathematics series has 12 volumes, the classic science new knowledge, natural exploration, electric shock horror, chocolate secrets, important mathematics, and the fourth, fifth and sixth grade science extra-curricular reading book.
Some books are sold at a higher price than the original price. Be careful when bidding.
Chocolate in the office: seven rules for work and happiness (de) by Weißenau, Chen Bao translated by Yunnan Science and Technology Press
【Fast invoice, order online, high-quality after-sales, support 7-day no-reason return and exchange】
Nola books: the original 6 volumes, 100 classes, 2nd grade extra book, a piece of chocolate, grandpa is a stupid child, saying that he can tell the time by looking at the sky, saying that he can sing and dance the twenty-four solar terms, saying that he can see the far mountains and dumplings in winter, and saying that my grandmother is a stupid old man.
Nora's Books: Original, The Monster Who Ate Darkness, A Guide to Natural History, A Tale of Transformable Vehicles, The Great Baggage Adventure, Picture Books for 3-4-5-6-Year-Olds
[Nola Books] Original, you don't know coffee + wine + bread + chocolate + tea, baking, cooking, tasting, making, appreciating, foodie, diet culture, interesting and informative lifestyle encyclopedia
Suitable for primary school students three to five years old, story books, summer and winter reading books, and out-of-school reading books.
[Nora Books] Original [All 3 Volumes] French Blue Ribbon Sweet Treats Cookbook, Chocolate Sweet Treats Class, World Sweet Treats Master's Creative Works, 100 Beginner-Friendly Tutorials on How to Make Desserts from Scratch
Nola Books - 3-in-1 set of original 3 books by Roald Dahl - Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Matilda, and The BFG - 6-12 year old reading children's literature - original children's literature
Hi, I've been waiting for this order for so long
It's constantly delayed
Thank you
Please cancel them all and re-order everything.
He needs to order for me to get credit?
Did they miss this one?
How many can be sent?
There is no way.
The code includes four $20 off discounts
#NAME# said to help me re-order
I was re-ordering and paying for so much money again
But I placed my order at 1:30.
48 hours negative nucleic acid test, set up "buffer zone", the State Council's joint prevention and control mechanism issued a notice to strengthen the prevention and control of the epidemic in the ports and cities - Xinhua News Agency
Beijing, Dec. 11 (Xinhua) -- The State Council's unified defense and unified control mechanism recently issued a notice on strengthening the prevention and control of the new coronavirus pneumonia in port cities, requiring that people who have recently left land border ports (excluding those connected to Hong Kong and Macao) must hold a negative test result for nucleic acid detection within 48 hours, and people arriving at land border ports must undergo at least one nucleic acid test.
According to the notice, the time range for the above requirements is from the date when the port cities are determined and announced by each province, autonomous region and municipality to March 15, 2022.
In addition, the notice also proposed that port cities with conditions could study setting up a buffer zone for epidemic prevention and control within their jurisdiction.
According to the relevant person in charge of the Disease Prevention and Control Bureau of the State Health and Family Planning Commission, for some port cities, cross-border trade is the main economic pillar of the local economy, and the border residents often visit each other.
Implementing differentiated management policies, from a single line of defense to two lines of defense, is expected to move the checkpoints forward, compress the risk of the spread of the epidemic, and achieve the maximum effect of epidemic prevention and control with the minimum social impact and minimum social cost.
Recently, there have been a number of domestic cluster outbreaks in China, all of which were imported through the port cities of foreign countries.
The notice pointed out that this exposed some problems such as the lack of timely epidemic monitoring and early warning, the non-implementation of closed-loop management of high-risk personnel, the formality of routine nucleic acid testing, the failure to kill pathogens at every link of the cold chain, the non-standard management of concentrated isolation and quarantine facilities, and the lack of scientific and accurate emergency response to the epidemic.
The notice called for efforts in nine areas, including improving the mechanism for epidemic prevention and control in port cities, strengthening the system for monitoring and early warning of epidemics, and implementing border control measures, so as to fill in the gaps and weaknesses in the prevention and control of port cities, and do a good job of prevention and control without slackness and scientifically and accurately.
The notice stressed that the cities along the ports should study and deploy the work of epidemic prevention and control and people's livelihood simultaneously, publish and open the hotline for people's livelihood guarantee, regularly check the potential risks of basic livelihood supplies and prices, and timely solve and actively respond to the prominent problems raised by the public.
According to the notice, the port cities mentioned in the notice include the counties (cities, districts, counties, counties) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the cities (provinces, autonomous regions, municipalities) where the counties (cities, districts, counties, counties) are located, and the cities (provinces, autonomous regions, municipalities) where the counties (cities, districts, counties, counties) are located. The specific range is determined and announced by each province (autonomous region, municipality) according to the need for epidemic prevention and control.
Color: As shown in the picture (avoid color difference caused by shooting, the closest color to the real object will be explained, and the outdoor light will cause the clothing color to become brighter, and the color problem should be consulted in advance before purchase)
This item is vintage, and the first time you buy vintage, please search for "vintage" or "vintage" on Baidu.
It's a rare thing.
Vintage single items are inevitably imperfect, so if you decide to buy vintage products, you should have this in mind. If you are a perfectionist, you should be careful when you take pictures. I will explain the obvious flaws, which is the characteristic of vintage products. I think good things don't care about that little bit of impact!
The store does not accept returns or exchanges.
The so-called vintage, vintage, design will have a sense of retro, that is, nostalgia, the reason why we like vintage is also because of its age and its texture!
So, girls who can't handle it, don't say it's frumpy, just say it's not for you!
There is no way to avoid risk when buying online, and shopping needs to be done carefully.
If the items are not suitable for the buyer, or if the buyer does not like them, or if the items cannot be returned or exchanged, please do not buy them. Thank you very much for your cooperation!
On June 11, 2021, some parts of the circle were sold.
The items are sold on a first-come, first-served basis, and no refunds or exchanges are allowed.
Buying instructions
All goods sold by the store are non-refundable and non-returnable
Please take a few minutes to read the purchase instructions
The goods in the shop may have a little color difference due to the display screen and light, and we do not accept any color difference. Please read this carefully before you buy, and consider carefully before you buy. The problem of color difference is not a reason for return and exchange.
The store does not accept the reasons of change of mind, style or colour is not as expected as the reason for exchange and mid-range review.
The sizes are all measured manually, and there is bound to be an error, but we believe that the error is very small, and if you receive the wrong size, it is not possible to return or exchange. Therefore, we must consider carefully before buying.
If you have any problems, please contact me as soon as possible. I will do my best to solve them. If there is malicious bad review, I will complain to the end.
We check everything before it goes out, so the quality won't be an issue.
Please confirm receipt and leave feedback within 48 hours of receiving your order. Thank you for your understanding.
Oil pipeline video exposes US military's 20-year bloodletting in Iraq - Xinhua News Agency
(Video source: YouTube)
On December 11, a micro-documentary called "Killing Machine" attracted wide attention.
The film tells the story of the United States' war in Afghanistan in the name of "anti-terrorism," forcing the output of American democracy through war, 20 years of bloody-handed, bloodthirsty, and indiscriminate killing, committing all kinds of inhuman crimes.
They abused the use of drones to attack hospitals, schools and other civilian places. They distorted human nature and established a killing squad.
In the past 20 years, the US military has killed thousands of innocent civilians in Afghanistan.
The US military set up a "black jail" to torture and humiliate "criminals."
Each atrocity has sparked more hatred among Afghans.
As the video says, the U.S. "war on terror" is "getting more and more dangerous."
War has not brought peace, democracy, prosperity and hope to the Afghan people; instead, it has brought a country in ruins and countless killings and destruction.
Click the video to let us reveal the truth behind America's "anti-terrorism" and blood-thirsty killings in the name of democracy, and puncture the hypocrisy of American democracy!
I came across the following article, which discusses from a commercial and preservation point of view why a client would want a bonded logistics company to do the canning for them, even though canning is a form of processing and not part of the bonded logistics company's scope of operations.
I visited many milk powder factories and saw many milk powder production lines.
In fact, the powder in the bag and the powder in the can are the same, and there is no difference.
So, then, why is the shelf life of a bag one year, while the shelf life of a can is two years or more?
Or ask: Why is the price difference between canned and bagged so great?
In fact, many consumers or mothers think that it is because the raw materials are different that the quality is much better.
In fact, the raw materials are the same, but people think that the good ones are expensive.
Some consumers have said that after eating them, they have said that the taste or the texture is different!
Now I'll tell you why it's so expensive, and where the money goes.
Why is the price difference so great for the same raw materials?
Because the manufacturers consider that if the packaging price is too high, consumers will not accept it, which means that the profit of the manufacturers is low, or even no profit, so how can the manufacturers survive?
So they have a big margin to protect their profit space.
Therefore, most manufacturers are promoting hearing aids rather than hearing aids.
And every year, every manufacturer spends tens of millions, or even hundreds of millions, on advertising. Where does this money come from?
Of course, everyone can imagine.
Therefore, with the development of society, the promotion cost of the market, such as: the promotion personnel of the shop, the display cost of the shop, the gift cost of the product, and the advertising cost, etc. are also increasing.
Therefore, each manufacturer is constantly adding new products, and the price is also constantly rising. This is a new product that comes out with the increase in market costs.
The main purpose is to get higher profits, and the cost of raw materials will not be more than 3 or 4 yuan.
There are also some brands that, in order to promote their own products, do not hesitate to hook up with the doctors of the hospital, and help them to promote the products, from 30 yuan to 80 yuan.
And the relevant laws of China are absolutely not allowed to do this way of operation. In fact, this kind of operation is harmful to consumers.
It is suggested that people buy powder in bags and put them into cans at home, so that they can save money and increase the preservation and sealing of the powder, and have no effect on children.
Also, don't think that the shelf life of canned food is longer than that of packaged food. If the shelf life of canned food after opening is the same as that of packaged food, it is just that canned food is inconvenient to store after opening, and it is easy to deteriorate due to moisture.
The delivery was late, the food was cold, and the food was hard and dry, and I couldn't eat it.
And the soup came out as well.
It's already been cancelled, and the #PRS_ORG # stuff he's sent back must be cold by now.
I didn't get it!
#NAME# says you didn't go and get it.
We called the police
If you don't refund me, I'll call the police.
Repeatedly using #PRS_ORG#, today's experience was the worst
It cannot be accepted in any way.
Okay, that's fine.
But we also have to warn the restaurants and the riders.
to prevent it from happening again
I want to know the exact delivery time
That time kept getting delayed
I don't know when that's going to happen.
Can I get a refund if I cancel my order?
How do I pay the rider for the service?
One rider was confirmed one hour ago.
I'm not going to wait any longer
Don't scare people at the starting line - Xinhua News Agency
When you visit a book fair, you can often feel the heat of success of self-help books.
Today's self-help books often preach the "best principles" -- that is, to assume or imply that you can "do" something, and then tell you what it is you need to do.
It means skipping over the "how to" part, which is actually the most important and fundamental part.
That's why these books have a common theme - - either go all in or don't bother - - either 100 or 0 - - either climb Mount Everest or just stay put.
This "best practice" has been recognized as "absolutely right" by everyone who sees it, but 99% of people will be scared out of starting before they even get to the starting line.
Because this theory advocates a path of "you have to make a decision to change your life and make a 180-degree turn," which is precisely the fatal weakness of many people.
For those who are stuck in their ways, who refuse to change, you should tell them, "You need to change." This is nothing more than self-deception and playing the fool.
Most people will be afraid to show weakness in front of the word "change" and will hesitate to make a decision. Or they will make a decision based on a momentary impulse and bravely take the first step, but often it is short-lived, and they are not able to maintain it for a long time, and it is difficult to see the persistence.
Ma Sanli's famous "From Tomorrow On" crosstalk is the best embodiment of this "universal humanity."
The biggest problem with the "best principle" is that the threshold is too high, and it often exceeds the limits of ordinary people, making most people "despair" .
Perhaps the "second-best principle" is a way to make more ordinary people walk on a relative success path.
The core of the "second best principle" is "lowering the threshold" - - it encourages a "small wins make big wins" theory, that if you can't do 100, you can do 1, because 1 is always greater than 0; if you can't climb Mount Tai, you can climb a small sand hill in front of your house, because it is always better than standing still.
In the end, anything you do is better than nothing.
With the lowered threshold, there are more opportunities for ordinary people to achieve persistence, and the probability of success will also increase.
But it is a bit longer than the road of following the principle of "second best".
In short, the "best principle" may sound like a rallying cry for everyone to succeed, but it ultimately inspires only a few; the "next best principle" can effectively inspire more people, and benefit as many as possible.
Do I need to re-order now?
No one answered the phone
It kept getting delayed.
It hasn't been delivered yet
When will it be delivered?
How can this be done?
Please cancel my order
I can't wait any longer, thank you
He missed two meals, but one order was complete.
I wanted to ask, how do you get in touch with the rider?
The first rider I spoke to said there would be another rider coming out.
The amount of naked carp resources in Qinghai Lake increased by 0.71 thousand tons this year - Xinhua News Agency
Xining, Dec. 11 (Xinhua News Agency) - The latest monitoring results show that the amount of bare carp resources in Qinghai Lake this year has increased by 0.710,000 tons, reaching 10.850,000 tons, which is 40 times more than that in the initial protection period in 2002, according to the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs.
The common name of the naked carp in Qinghai Lake is Huang fish. It is a precious fish species in Qinghai Lake and plays an important role in maintaining the safety of the ecological chain of “water-fish-bird” in the Qinghai Lake watershed.
In the 1960s and 1970s, the number of crucian carp in Qinghai Lake sharply decreased due to factors such as the large-scale killing of crucian carp by humans and the deterioration of the breeding water environment. In 2002, the amount of crucian carp resources in Qinghai Lake was only 2,592 tons.
In 2004, Qinghai Lake naked carp was listed as a critically endangered species in the Red List of China.
Since 2003, Qinghai Province has implemented the closed-lake fishing policy, prohibiting any unit, collective or individual from fishing for naked carp in Qinghai Lake and its main rivers and tributaries, and prohibiting the sale of naked carp and its products.
At the same time, through artificial propagation and release, and the cleaning of the main inflow rivers of Qinghai Lake, and the design of scientific and reasonable "fishways", the protection efforts have been continuously increased, and the resources of the naked carp in Qinghai Lake have been increasing year by year.
Yang Lin, deputy director of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Department of Qinghai Province, introduced that up to now, the Qinghai Lake naked carp has been artificially bred and released into the wild more than 1.8 billion, and the contribution rate to the recovery of Qinghai Lake naked carp resources is more than 23 %.
The Three Rivers Source Region of Qinghai is an important ecological barrier and water source conservation area in China and Asia. Qinghai Lake is a natural barrier and ecological function area that controls the eastward spread of desertification in the west.
In order to protect the ecological environment of the headwaters of the three rivers and the water area of Qinghai Lake, protect aquatic wild animals and maintain the biodiversity of the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, this year, Qinghai has successively issued notices on the prohibition of fishing in key water areas of the Yangtze River, Yellow River and Qinghai Lake, and built up a “one river, one river, one lake” comprehensive fishing ban management system.
I used my #PRS_ORG RED credit card to spend more than $180 on food.
But the order was short $20
The original software is free to try, and the computer and mobile phone are used, and the paperless version is used.
2022 Leaf South 《高级英汉翻译理论与实践》（第2版）笔记和考研真题详解/硕士研究生考试大纲 辅导教材 复习资料 入学考试
2022 Leaf Modern Television News Book Notes and Homework (Including Typical Questions) Explanation/Master's Degree Examination Syllabus Guidance Material Review Material Entrance Examination Questions
The original mobile phone photography introduction, take a beautiful photo is very simple, the trick of the mobile phone photography, the photography composition with the light technique, the mobile phone photography tutorial book, the app software photography post-processing
Quality books, original guarantee, quality service, timely delivery, worry-free after-sales.
Red Hat Linux System Administration Guide (CD-ROM)
The King of Animal Novels Shen Shixi Collection of Books: Tiger Girl with Golden Leaves [If you need to buy, please contact customer service]
The information of the books is collected and uploaded by the software. If there is an error, please refer to the actual book. If you mind, please do not shoot!
If you have any questions, please contact our online customer service.
The restaurant only gave me one bag, and I had to put it in the bag, and it was cold
So, is the takeaway in a bag?
We only saw one bag
Want to know if it was a leak or someone took it, thanks
It's been an hour and it hasn't been delivered
I just read a piece of fake writing that was too long.
For the men who don't know.
Most girls experience their first period at some point between the ages of 13 and 15, and stop menstruating around the age of 50.
After that, it will be more regular, once a month, as long as my health permits.
But it's not predictable enough to be accurate, and it's usually about a week or so in advance, so you need to plan ahead, and sometimes you'll get it wrong (sometimes by several days in advance).
The length of time, the amount of blood, and the severity of the pain vary from person to person, and some people bleed for three days, while others bleed for a week; some people bleed little, while others bleed a lot; some people don't feel anything, while others are in so much pain that they need to be taken to the emergency room. The severity of the pain changes over time, and not feeling pain doesn't mean you'll never feel it again.
Periods cannot be controlled, and there is blood for 24 hours a day, beginning to end. The only thing that can be done is to use sanitary napkins or sanitary tampons to prevent the blood from dripping onto clothes, chairs, etc.
Menstrual pain is mainly due to the secretion of prostaglandins, and it is effective to relieve the pain of the month when the period has not started. After the menstrual pain begins, it is of no use to take anything.
Before the menstrual period, due to the uterine congestion and the excessive release of prolactin, it is easy to have diarrhea.
If you're about to start your period, you'll probably start to have cramps within a few days, and you'll have your period within a couple of weeks.
Tampons should be changed every two to three hours, otherwise bacteria can grow, and the worst case is to change six times a day, seven days a month, which is 42 pieces, and if you have prepared some in advance, there may be 50 pieces, which is not used every month.
(Here, the sanitary cotton strips do not need to be changed often, maybe every 5-6 hours, and the longest is 8 hours)
Hormonal changes during the menstrual cycle can make you more irritable, and hormonal changes during ovulation can make you emotionally unstable, which is very bad for your health.
But official crime statistics show that women are still very good at controlling their emotions, and will not use emotional problems as an excuse.
The blood is not just the blood, it includes the shedded uterine lining.
The lining of the uterus is at its thinnest after a period and then gradually thickens to prepare for the arrival of a baby. The uterus is like a house, and each month it builds a new house (the lining thickens) to welcome the baby. If the baby doesn't come, the house is torn down and a new one is built the next month.
Menstruation is very inconvenient, and has been for decades, with periods of 24 hours a day for several days every month, accompanied by abdominal pain and back pain. Who would want to go through that?
But a person can be born because his mother went through her period, her period is to prepare a house for you to live in for 10 months when you first come to this world, everyone should thank their mothers for their regular and healthy periods.
In the past, a lot of things were suppressed for women, and the society brainwashed women that it was dirty, shameful, and everyone thought that was the way it was, but times have changed.
If someone feels nauseated by menstruation, feels nauseated by a woman's body preparing for the birth of life, it should not be said out loud in public, little girls should stand up and stop thinking that way, they have never experienced it, they will never experience it, and men who don't know much about it should not be so ungrateful, and how can such an attitude be justified in front of one's own mother, how can one want one's own children?
Finally, try a sanitary pad, it really works.
Today is the Winter Solstice, and it's disappointing
In addition, I have to order food for the kids.
I hope that stores check their products before they put them out for sale
Is it a short circuit in the foot bath?
Choosing a suitable foot bath can play a good foot massage and health care effect. Today, the editor of Guomei will answer this question for you, hoping to help friends.
With the improvement of people's health awareness, foot baths have become more and more popular with consumers, and a large number of products of different grades have emerged in the market, ranging from hundreds of yuan to thousands of yuan. This has given consumers a lot of choice space.
In the relevant data surface, compared with traditional home appliances, the sales of health care home appliances such as foot bath are hot, but the foot bath does not have a specialized industry standard, so there is a certain safety hazard.
"Soaking your feet in the electric water is really dangerous!"
Mr Lee told the reporter that recently, he bought a foot bath for his father as a birthday gift, but his father felt his soles were numb when he was soaking his feet.
Mr Lee initially thought the vibration function of the foot bath was causing the problem, but when he turned off the vibration function, his father still felt the soles of his feet were numb.
Mr. Lee tried the electric pen and was surprised to find that the pen actually lit up. Mr. Lee found that the water in the foot bath was electrified.
He then contacted the merchant, and the merchant's attitude was good, though he still felt dissatisfied.
He found that there are no clear and detailed industry standards for the maximum temperature setting, who the baths are suitable for, and what materials ensure safety.
However, in general, foot baths are not prone to electrical problems, but there is always the possibility that some products are not strictly checked at the time of manufacture.
Therefore, when purchasing, choose a split-style foot bath.
Water and electricity separation has no safety risks.
You can also take a free HIV test.
The 13th Provincial Tea Expo opened - see the head of the rules - Hunan Daily Net - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily, December 10, 2019 (full media reporter Zhang Shangwu, Hu Panpan, reporter, Liu Xiaoling, photographer, Li Jian) Today, the 13th Hunan Tea Industry Expo and the New Huzhou Red Tea Promotion Conference were held in the Hunan International Convention and Exhibition Center. The exhibition of the tea industry, the innovation of tea technology, the promotion of tea culture, and the acceleration of the target of the billion-dollar tea industry.
Hou Shouli, deputy director of the board of the All-China Federation of Supply and Marketing Cooperatives, and Ye Hong, deputy director of the Standing Committee of the Provincial People's Congress, attended the opening ceremony.
Professor Liu Zhonghua, an academician of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, made a grand introduction at the opening ceremony: The source of Lake Hong, which is located in New Huzhou, has injected new power into the “Five Colors of Xiang Tea” with the rise of red tea.
In recent years, the provincial party committee and provincial government have given strong support to the development of tea industry, and promoted the construction of a billion-dollar Xiangxi tea industry, forming the development pattern of “three Xiang, four waters, five colors of tea”.
The tea industry in the province has increased innovation, and the main tea products such as green tea, black tea, and red tea have been launched one after another, and the main production areas have promoted the fusion of tea tourism and increased the income of the majority of tea farmers.
Feng Shui wheels turn, and red tea is back in the spotlight.
Experts in the tea industry in the province said that after harvesting green tea, red tea and black tea, tea farmers have income throughout the year, and the output value of tea gardens has increased.
At the opening ceremony, provincial leaders awarded certificates to enterprises that have obtained the right to use the “Hunan Red Tea” trademark, and New Huzhou was proud of “Huzhou Red Tea”.
At the Xinchua Red Tea Exhibition Hall, Fujian tea merchants immediately placed an order for a high-mountain tea called “Bingli Spring”.
Secretary-General Wang Jun of the provincial Tea Industry Association said that the current epidemic and other factors have affected the tea market to some extent, but from the tea exhibition site, there are many highlights.
Xinhua red tea is red, and it is infused with the connotation of tea culture. It is popular and the transaction is hot. The Hunan tea industry welcomes a new spring.
So if these foods aren't hot, can we take them back?
I didn't want it, because I couldn't park underneath it, and he couldn't deliver it.
Metaphysics is the study of questions that cannot be answered by direct perception.
Metaphysics is the basic law of philosophy, which aims to explain the basic nature of existence and the world.
The term "metaphysics" is derived from the phrase "the way of things" in the "Yi Jing" (Book of Changes), which means "the way of things" and "the way of things" respectively. The term "metaphysics" was translated from "metaphysic" by Japanese Inoue Tetsujiro in the Meiji period.
The metaphysical branch includes ontology, natural theology and its extensions.
Ontology is the study of what names refer to real entities and what names refer to concepts.
Theistic naturalism is the denial of the existence of God.
Its theoretical basis is that all phenomena can be explained by natural reasons, proposed by philosophers who supported science and evolution.
And the naturalistic method is the method of studying God without words.
The philosophy of mind is a branch of philosophy that studies the relationship between consciousness and the body (especially the brain), in essence.
Dualism and monism are the two main schools of thought that discuss the relationship between the mind and the body.
Epistemology is a branch of philosophy that explores the nature, origin, and scope of knowledge.
Ethics is a discipline that systematically examines and studies human moral life; here, morality is defined as a set of rules of conduct recognized by a group or culture.
It is mainly divided into meta-ethics (abstractly studying the theory of ethics or the essence of criticism), and normative ethics (evaluating various different moral views and giving moral guidelines for correct or wrong behavior.
It studies the moral behavior standards that people should follow, applies ethics (the academic study of applying ethics to real-life situations, including bioethics, political ethics, etc.), and describes ethics (the collection of information about how people live, from the observation of styles).
It does not view ethics from a theoretical perspective, but from the actual moral agents who make and are observed to make real choices, and all the moral factors that are involved in those choices. It studies the ethical views held by social groups.
The history of ethics includes Greek and Roman ethics, and Christian ethics of the Middle Ages.
Part 1: The ethical ideas of humanism, represented by Valla and Montaigne.
The second part: the ethical ideas of the Reformation, represented by Calvin.
Part Three: Political Ethics, represented by Machiavelli and others, Modern Ethics (17-18th century, British Empiricism, represented by Hume, and Continental Rationalism, represented by Spinoza, 18th century, French Enlightenment, represented by Voltaire, and 18-19th century, German Academy, represented by Kant and Hegel, 18-19th century, English Utilitarianism, represented by Bentham and Sidgwick, late 19th - early 20th century, German Neo-Kantianism, represented by Lipps, and Neo-Hegelianism, represented by Theodor Adorno).
Logic is a discipline that studies "principles and standards of valid reasoning and proof."
Logic usually consists of three parts: inductive reasoning, deductive reasoning, and abductive reasoning, which can be divided into formal logic and non-formal logic.
Aesthetics is a discipline that studies the nature and meaning of beauty.
#NUMBER# yuan has been received, which is missing food
Yang Xingdao (chè), born in the year of the sheep, in the month of the sheep, on the grass of the sheep, fittingly, is called Yang Xingdao, and is known as "Sheep Uncle".
He is known in the industry as the "master of conspiracy theories" and claims to be "good at telling tall tales."
"Black Light" (also known as "Strange Stories from a Chinese Studio") is a 2010 Chinese horror film directed by Lu Chuan.
"Travellers on the other path" Nan Xiaoluo and Yue Wuhua have once again opened up a journey of investigation, and their identities are about to be revealed.
"The Mystery of White Hair" has accumulated millions of copies of best-selling books and donated them!
The original "China's Strange Stories" is the new work after the "Strange Code", the same author, the same protagonist, and the continuation of the unfinished story of "Thailand's Strange Stories" and "India's Strange Stories"!
He gave me one, and I had to pay for a McChicken sauce.
You call the restaurant to have it delivered.
I just don't want to go downstairs to buy things, so I'll spend all that money on delivery
Ding Zilin: To my friends.
On behalf of my family, I would like to express my heartfelt gratitude to all of you for the humanitarian assistance you have provided to us over the past 30 years, especially since I issued an appeal for humanitarian assistance on my own behalf in early 1994, which has continued to this day.
Nowadays, most of the victims' old parents have passed away, and the orphans have grown up and are employed.
It was your efforts that helped us through the most difficult time.
The coronavirus pandemic is sweeping the world, and most of the donors are already retired.
Therefore, I earnestly request that you stop our difficult cause - the humanitarian donations for the Tiananmen Mothers group. This humanitarian relief activity should have ended long ago.
I will always remember your kindness and I believe that your efforts will be remembered in history.
Due to various reasons, I can only express my wishes in this way. I ask for your understanding!
Please accept my sincere congratulations.
Mr. Tao said: I would like to take this opportunity to introduce the 32-year history of the International Federation of Chinese Students and Scholars (IFCSS) and the Minnesota China Democracy Foundation (MCDF).
In humanitarian relief work, the American Red Cross and the Minnesota Chinese Democratic Foundation are parallel organizations with overlapping project implementers.
(Apple Daily photo: The website of Tiananmen Mothers is managed by a potter.) pic.twitter.com/UxID9ZGjzm
The relief funds are often unable to reach the hands of those in need.
In 1994, Ding teacher suggested that a special group be established to coordinate and supervise the collection and distribution of relief funds.
In 1998, the MCDF established the "Orphan Education Fund for June 4th Children" and after 11 years, in 2009, when all the June 4th orphans graduated from university, the MCDF established the "Special Hardship Fund for June 4th Orphan Elders" and has been in operation ever since.
The projects are funded by donations from the campus and the community in 1989, individual generosity, and the support of the Yale Democratic Fund.
Since 2018, it has also received support from the Labor Rehabilitation Research Foundation.
It was only until last year, 31 years later, that the June 4th victims finally received a portion of the donations raised in Hong Kong in the name of the June 4th.
During this period, China Human Rights also independently carried out its humanitarian relief projects.
We understand that Mr. Ding suspended the donation for the sake of the donors, and we are also some retired elderly people, whose income is not as abundant as before retirement. We would like to thank Mr. Ding for his “Letter to Friends”.
We will respect the decision of the indigenous people and terminate the project within two years, and immediately resume it when needed.
I also express my gratitude and respect to those who have risked their lives to deliver humanitarian assistance over the years.
Brand: mesobiosystem
Origin: Mainland China
Color classification: Droplet chip 1, Droplet chip 2, Droplet chip 3, Droplet chip 4, Droplet chip 5, Droplet chip 6, Droplet chip 7, Droplet chip 8, Double-layer droplet
Thank you for choosing our products. Please spend five minutes to read the following content before using our chips:
Please check that the goods are complete after opening the box.
Please contact customer service as soon as possible if there are any missing items.
The cover plate of the microfluidic chip is made of PC material, and it should not be exposed to solvents that react chemically with PC.
Do not inject directly onto the chip with a syringe, as this may cause leakage.
All standard substrates are tested at 500mbar (100um channel depth) or 300mbar (50um channel depth) injection pressure with pure water prior to shipment.
Chips on glass substrates are hydrostatically tested at 800mbar (100um trench) prior to shipment and should be handled with care to avoid damage to the substrate.
Please consider the viscosity of the solution when using it and do not exceed this range, otherwise leakage may occur.
For standard bottom microfluidic chips, we recommend flow rates of 150ul/min or less for aqueous phases and 50ul/min or less for oil phases.
Based on the actual viscosity of the sample liquid, increase the value of the flow rate parameter from slow to fast.
After the experiment, please clean the internal channels of the chip in time to avoid blockage.
Microfluidic chips are consumables and cannot be reused.
If the chip is damaged due to long-term use or improper operation, it will not be replaced.
If you need a microfluidic chip with higher pressure or flow rate, please contact customer service for customization.
The normal delivery cycle of chips is within one week, and the stock can be shipped within 24 hours after the goods are sold. Please consult with the customer service before placing an order.
If you have any questions about how to connect our chip to the sample collection system, you can refer to the following link https://zhuanlan.zhihu.com/p/60474873, or search for the "Microbiota" public account for more help.
You can also visit our website (http://www.mesobiosys.com) to download our brochure and learn more about our products.
For more information on our products, contact our online customer service.
I'm across the road from #PRS_ORG
Hi
What's more, the delivery time is getting longer and longer.
How long will it take to get there?
Originally booked for 16:10-16:30
I'll wait until 7:30 to see if it can be delivered.
Where does Saint Street go?
Which street in Hong Kong leads to Saint Street?
What is the current situation of the order?
I entered it in December.
So, this month you can enjoy $20 savings on four uses of #PRS_ORG #RED credit card
I didn't get an order, can you check to see if the rider is still on the road?
Hi, can you help to contact the rider and ask if he is still on the road?
I did not receive an order, and there was no food on the check, and no one contacted me to cancel.
There is always take-out, and the management office downstairs will call to ask, and then they will let people in first, but the management office has never contacted me
Design is everywhere (Recommended for Class 4 to 6)
Cambridge English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate in English for Speakers of Other Languages (FESOL) Level 2 Certificate
The original version of Cambridge, international award-winning works, sweeping the world for 20 years, the world's teenagers are synchronously read, the national middle and primary school library directory, the national key high school teacher compilation, scan the QR code to listen to the English and American sound effects recording
[New] A Black Book on Color by Peng Yi, with 3 to 6-year-old Children's Picture Book Illustrations by Bolonja Selected for the New Reading Basic Directory of Preschool Children's Books, Reclaiming Press Original
New genuine version can develop invoices, group purchase has preferential prices
Descriptive Catalogue of the Writings of Sir Walter
【小译林中小学阅读丛书】设计，无处不在（入选《中学生阅读指导目录》）泽轩然图书
A black book about colors, with 3 to 6-year-old children's picture books, won the award in Bologna, and was selected for the New Reading Foundation Directory of Pre-school Children's Books.
【可开票】正版 世纪见证人 伟大的译员达尼卡 塞莱斯科维奇 人物纪实文学 传记文学 同声传译 语言翻译师生参考书籍
The real time witness of the century, the great translator Danica Seleskovic, the biography of literature, the biography of literature, the translation of the same voice, the language translator, the reference book of the research publisher
【Original book】【Primary and secondary school reading series】Design everywhere (included in the "primary and secondary school reading guide directory") [can be invoiced]
There was #PRS_ORG# to prove it, no one went to get me, #PRS_ORG# made me take matters into my own hands.
I'm saying it again, I'm delivering.
They did it, and you didn't take it to go, and then you blamed me for taking it.
I demand that you cancel it immediately or I'll call the police
The time-lapse photography has not yet opened a branch
Member reviews
[Effect] Photo effect: I took two sets of clothes, and the overall effect is good. I like this set of pictures very much.
[Service] Service details: Because pregnancy is a little uncomfortable when applying makeup, the makeup artist and staff are very considerate and let me rest for a while, and they also keep giving me hot water to drink.
The price of the set: 1000 yuan
Thank you for the rabbit's comment. I originally said that it was not suitable for ancient music. I didn't expect the finished product to be so beautiful.
Thanks for the endorsement, Dan, and your approval will keep us moving forward, we will continue to work hard!
This photography studio is really great and I strongly recommend it to all my friends!
From reception, make-up, wardrobe, lighting, photography to post-production, it was faultless.
The makeup artist was very meticulous, and matched my style to come up with a suitable makeup for me. The makeup products used were also from top brands.
Mr. Tian is a very professional photographer.
The studio is full of artistic atmosphere, and there are two little cats to play with.
We were working in Beijing, and the better movie theaters in Beijing needed to be booked half a year in advance. My colleague had filmed in Beijing, and after seeing the film, I thought it was just so-so.
The studio was specifically sought out, a place with soul and attitude.
Our facial expressions are not very good, and this is also the shortcoming of most people. Photographer Liangge will capture the natural and wonderful moments.
Makeup, photography, post-production, a great team.
We were all talking about it all day long.
She's already recommended it to her friend and her friend has just seen the film and is over the moon.
I hope that this studio doesn't get lost, and that more people discover it and make it their own, rather than a copy of something that's been done before.
Thank you very much for the five-star review of Zhenting and Jingling. Both of them are very thoughtful and creative new people. We are a creative studio. We will do our best to complete 100% of the customer's satisfaction. Thank you for meeting and knowing each other.
The sweet and thoughtful assistant, the lively and cheerful photography teacher, every person in the team is super nice, beautiful and wonderful, and it is a very memorable experience, and the effect of the shooting is much better than I imagined. Everyone worked hard, thank you very much 😘😘
Thank you for your comment. It is also a coincidence that we know each other. From Hefei to Qinhuangdao, the distance is thousands of miles. Your trust in us is so far away. I am very happy to know you. If there is a chance in the future, I will come to Qinhuangdao to play.
How do I pay?
The re-ordered food has already been delivered.
No takers
Now the restaurant staff are calling me.
A programming noob who wants to share his personal experience.
If you are planning to enter this industry, you can choose to find a place to train, but if you do not have this in mind, it is better to learn on your own. After all, training is very expensive, and it takes six months to learn.
But if you are planning to get into this industry, training is a very good option, especially for those with weak will power.
If you are more self-disciplined, you can choose to self-study, but it will be more tiring.
Of course, choosing a good training institution is very important.
First, we need to look at the strength of the institution's faculty. If the faculty is not strong, then the training institution has no meaning. Of course, some newly opened training institutions do not have very strong faculty.
Secondly, before choosing, it is best to find out about the training institution, and if possible, find out about the students who have graduated from the institution. After all, only the students of the institution know what the institution is like, and the courses taught are good or bad.
Hello, actually I don't know how to answer this question because I haven't introduced my own situation, and the learning of this thing has a lot to do with my own situation.
For example, professional, age, the language you want to learn, and even the city you want to study in are all related to the industry you want to work in.
If you are a student and have not graduated or have graduated from the computer major, I personally recommend self-study. This is the most efficient and cost-effective, and many of the offline and online training institutions are quite good now, but the cost of learning is high, and the investment of time is relatively long. Basically, you need to concentrate on training for 3-6 months.
But if I say these things, self-study is very convenient now, and many learning resources on the Internet are free, or there are many training resources on bilibili. If you don't find resources, you can also contact me through the introduction to get free resources or detailed consultation.
In addition, there are some more classic books that can be combined with videos for comprehensive learning.
If you are not a computer professional, but are willing to spend some money and time to learn, I would recommend that you go to a training institution to learn. The learning is not very difficult, and the teacher is very detailed, and there is someone to answer your questions. In addition, it is also helpful in planning or supervision.
And now many training institutions will sign employment agreements, with internal recruitment quotas, and after learning, they will recommend to go to the company, so that the subsequent job interview process can save a lot of things.
These are some of my views, which are based on my understanding of your situation, and are not detailed or detailed. If you have any other questions, you can contact me at any time for consultation and communication.
I said I was there by 1 p.m. and I saw it on the app.
What is it called?
I haven't finished, what are you going to do?
I am self-employed and undertake all types of work (installation, cleaning, repairs), wall-hung boilers, water heaters, purifiers, washing machines, air conditioning, toilets, cookers, extractor fans, lighting, glass polishing, professional seamstress, household services
Thank you to those who have been silently supporting me. Life is hard, but I will continue to work hard.
Life will not disappoint anyone who works hard. If you like, just follow me. Thank you to those who have silently supported me.
Life is like this, others only see the results, but you alone carry the process, facing life, we can only be strong and continue, there is no choice, the road can be turned back, but you can not go back...
Cleaning is work, and it is a duty. Life is beautiful because of service, and service is wonderful because of heart.
Although we do the dirtiest job, we do it with the most serious attitude, cleaning every corner of the customer's home, and seeing the smile on the customer's face and the thumbs up, all the hard work is worth it!
My daily work
- Your request, my service.
Heart service, heart clean, keep beautiful.
The details you care about, Fenggujia service helps you to “clean” me, and serve your family.
Bao Wen is clean, and the trees are well-maintained. The service is good, and the home is clean.
Indoor and outdoor cleaning, my daily work
Although the crystal chandelier is beautiful, it will become dull and dim if it is not cleaned for a long time. Only after it is cleaned can it be released in full glory. Life is also like this
Only with sincerity can we succeed, and only with meticulousness can we shape exquisiteness. We are serious about our craft.
I will give you the opportunity to be satisfied, quality speaks for itself, because professionalism deserves to be trusted, your approval is my greatest encouragement!
It's not a good time to be in any line of work!
But I always believe that as long as you are serious, persistent, and hard-working, you will be better than others, at least you will be better than those who just complain!"
A day begins with the dawn, and all good things begin in the morning. I wish you a happy, lucky, healthy, and prosperous journey. Start a new day with a good mood. Good morning
As a child, happiness was something to have; as an adult, happiness is a goal to achieve; and as an adult, happiness is a state of mind.
Do the most real and kindest self, follow your heart, no regrets in this life; Life is a road, walk your own road; Life has two treasures: a good body and a good mood, and a bright and beautiful life to the end!
Every stage of life will bring its own set of challenges.
Often what holds us back is not our ability, but our courage to face it.
If you can't avoid it, you might as well face it.
The more you fear, the more you will be knocked down; the more you face difficulties, the more they will be resolved.
China's Changsha hosts Saudi's first contemporary art biennial - Xinhua News Agency
Liyadh, Saudi Arabia, December 12 (Xinhua) -- The first Saudi Arabia Contemporary Art Biennial - Diriya Contemporary Art Biennial opened to the public on Dec. 11 in the Diriya JAX art district located in the northwest of Riyadh, Saudi Arabia. A total of 64 artists from Saudi Arabia, China and other countries participated in the exhibition.
The two-year exhibition was jointly planned by the Saudi Diriyah Biennale Foundation and the UCCA Yuanlong Contemporary Art Center in China, and the director of the UCCA Yuanlong Contemporary Art Center, Tian Feiyue, served as the artistic director.
According to the exhibition team, the theme of the biennial is "Crossing the River by Feeling the Stones," which is a metaphor for the reform policies taken during the period of social and economic transformation, and also reflects the current situation of Saudi social and cultural development.
The exhibition covers an area of nearly 12,000 square meters, and the exhibition hall spans six interconnected buildings, presenting six units: "Crossing the River by Touching the Stone," "Tradition as Experiment," "Marginal Thinking," "Towards the Public," "A New World of Beauty," and "On the Spirit of Art."
Among them, the number of works by 27 Saudi artists accounts for more than 40% of the total number of works in the exhibition, including painting, installation art and performance art, etc. Twelve Chinese artists are also well-received, with some artists using recycled materials in innovative ways, such as Xu Bing in Back Stories from the Mountains and Rivers (2014), which reconstructed a classic landscape painting.
David Buckley, chief executive of the DIFC Fund for the Triennial, said: "We hope this year's Triennial will create an international dialogue and provide a platform for global audiences to engage with Saudi Arabia's thriving cultural and creative industries and communities.
Tai Feiyu says, "The biennial's goal is twofold: to allow Saudi contemporary art to participate in the global dialogue, and to allow Saudi audiences to integrate into the world of contemporary art. "
It is understood that a series of lectures will also be held during the opening week of the biennial, with artists, curators and opinion leaders from the creative industries discussing topics such as cross-cultural exchange and the development of contemporary art.
I ordered a tomahawk steak
The restaurant told me riders can't bring bones
To find out the reason
Bones can be picked up and delivered separately
However, the system is not very convenient, and it is better to use another one.
I'm at #ADDRESS# in the Meatpacking District.
I'm a long way from home
Business English Vocabulary 100+ + Business English Vocabulary Dictionary (with multiple learning gifts)
Learn to speak with no prior knowledge in just 10 minutes a day!
It covers all the common business scenarios, and all the common business English expressions are included, and all the business English communication skills are explained!
You can also download the free business English vocabulary and pronunciation practice, and easily improve your business English speaking skills!
Practical Business English Conversation 100 by Wang Huili, Zhang Lili, Wang Yuchui, published by China Aerospace Publishing House, can be issued with a regular invoice, and any problems can be contacted online at any time!
English bedtime for 5 minutes, those classics that have been passed down for hundreds of years, Yang Chunli, Cheng Yuchui, Song Bing Translated by 9787512415812 Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics Press
Original books, electronic invoices, after-sales guarantee, any questions, please consult online customer service.
The Woman Who Wore Hand-Made Shoes, Adriana Trigiani, Dong Yannan, Chen Huijie Translated by 9787513306645 New Star Press【Direct】
Original books, direct from the publisher, issued with a legitimate electronic invoice, and online customer service is available at any time if there are any problems!
Beautiful, Confident 100% [de]Kompwiret【正版书】
In-store discounts, reach the amount of discounts, many discounts, welcome to buy!
【文轩正版】实用商务英语口语情景100
The original books of Xinhua Wenxuan (Jiangsu, Chengdu, Hubei, Tianjin) are delivered within 1 day in 75% of cities!
Let's talk about autism and autism-related 55 questions (plus Brigitta K. Brigitta C. Brown【正版】【正版书】
Beautiful English, those beautiful letters (letter rolls) (volume 800, knowledge expansion 1000, authoritative English 2000, classic quotes 3【Original book】【Original book】
Yunnan: Coordinated to standardize the management of rural public welfare jobs - Xinhua News Agency
On December 12, 2020, Xinhua News Agency (reporter Lin Bifeng) reported that in order to continue to do a good job in the employment and livelihood assistance of the population in poverty alleviation, to consolidate and expand the achievements of poverty alleviation, Yunnan Province recently issued relevant policies to promote the management of rural public welfare positions, which will help to promote the comprehensive promotion of rural revitalization.
The relevant person in charge of the Yunnan Provincial Department of Labor and Social Affairs introduced that at present, Yunnan has developed 448,300 rural public welfare jobs, which are used to provide employment for the rural poor and other disadvantaged groups, and play an important role in helping the rural poor achieve employment increase, consolidate the achievements of poverty alleviation, and effectively improve the capacity of rural public services.
The new regulation was jointly issued by the departments of human resources and social security, rural revitalization, finance and other seven departments. It mainly unifies the scope of recruitment of rural public welfare personnel at the grassroots level, fund management, post development, post management and other aspects.
In terms of job development, the new regulations are clear, and the principle of “vacancy-driven, post-based, dynamic management, and total quantity control” “who develops, who uses, who is responsible” and “one post for one person, voluntary disclosure, unified management” is adopted.
The recruitment process must follow the steps of announcement, application, review, announcement, appointment, pre-employment training and placement.
In addition, the new regulations also clearly specified the specific responsibilities of the main development departments of rural public welfare posts, the subsidy standards and subsidy methods of rural public welfare posts, and required that the development departments of rural public welfare posts should purchase commercial insurance for accident injury for the employees of rural public welfare posts; and required the relevant departments to regularly supervise the subsidy situation of rural public welfare posts.
The address was wrong
Hi
Can I cancel the order?
I re-ordered
Has it been cancelled?
Secondly, though the right has had its heyday in history, it is not long, so it is short because a little sunshine makes them brilliant, a little water makes them sweat; a little hope makes them think they are invincible, and a blow makes them cower.
But in practical terms, the right has played a positive role in social progress.
From the end of the Cultural Revolution to the development of the economy, the improvement of science and technology, and the promotion of institutionalization of politics and human rights protection, the positive significance of the rightists should not be denied.
Three, although I do not completely agree with some of Li Weidong's words, I am very concerned about his words and very respectful of Li Weidong as a person; because he is serious, he is serious about China, and he takes China's social problems seriously.
But I disagreed with his anti-communist theory, believing that revolution was necessary, and that revolution would inevitably lead to social instability, damage to the people's livelihood, and a muddled mess of political groups, and that foreigners would take advantage of the situation.
Fourth, to change or improve China, one must have patience and a sense of responsibility for the country and the people. Those who seek political opportunities in the fire are not rightists, but scoundrels.
Let's talk about left.
On the left, in fact, are the orphans of time and politics.
If the right has a positive social significance, the Communist Party will listen to some of the right's opinions and analyses when it needs to, but the left has no place for this, because the left wants to get rid of the rubbish left by the Communist Party!
Five, recently saw some friends arguing with the rebels and rejecting the left-wing lunatic, which was quite lively. I think it is not necessary.
Don't try to reason with a traitor or a lunatic. They're both one and the same.
And don't try to prove that we're right, and don't try to get the rebels and leftists to admit it, why should you?
I told my friends that when a traitor calls you a five-cent piece, when a leftist calls you a right-winger, it proves that our middle road is the right one!
Many people have ideals when they are young, but when they grow old, they forget their ideals or pursue their ideals, but become eccentric.
And as ideals fade, even the Dragon Slayer turns into a Dragon.
I think left and right usually refer to constraints and freedom, and China is inherently left-leaning because of its historical and cultural genes.
Domestic right is liberal and focuses on efficiency and development, while left focuses on regulation and fairness and safety.
Now, the society as a whole hopes to pay more attention to fairness, while China and the United States are in conflict, and the left is definitely positive. It is estimated that it will continue for many years.
Although I can't read it, I like the way it sounds.
Nothing to say, Flower is just like this
In the past two years, the United States has blocked and encircles Huawei chips, which has not only put Huawei in an unprecedented predicament, but also made the "American" enterprises suffer huge losses.
The United States has pressured the Chinese chip industry, requiring its own enterprises and allies to simultaneously block the relevant enterprises of the Chinese chip industry, which directly led to the consequences of affecting the orders and profits of global chip suppliers, reducing the research and development investment of chip production enterprises, and reducing the production capacity, which resulted in the shortage of the global chip supply chain.
Now the "chip shortage" has spread to all major industries in the world, such as car companies, mobile phones, and almost all industries that use chips are deeply affected.
In order to master the “chip” autonomy, more and more science and technology giants in many countries have begun to take the road of “de-Americanization”.
To firmly control the global semiconductor industry and restrain the development of China's semiconductor industry, the United States has acted frequently recently, and is hosting a "chip summit" and inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries' giants to establish a semiconductor alliance,
When most people thought that Intel's move would have a certain impact on Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) and may even take away TSMC's "job",
This is because Intel, as one of the old tech giants in the United States, has been engaged in the semiconductor field for decades, and has a large number of talent teams and technological reserves. It must rise quickly in the short term and defeat Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC).
However, Zhang Zhongmou, founder of Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Co., was not impressed with Intel's decision.
At the "2021 Master Think Tank Forum" held in April this year, Zhang Zhongmou made a shocking statement, saying that Intel's investment in the construction of a chip foundry is very ironic.
Zhang Zhongmou's disdain for Intel's entry into the foundry business is because Zhang Zhongmou still has a grudge against TSMC and Intel from three decades ago.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Intel was the jewel in the American manufacturing crown, occupying the global summit position and being the world's leader in the semiconductor industry.
By the 1980s, the world's high-end chips had been monopolized by a few strong players.
At that time, the semiconductor industry was characterized by the IDM model, in which chips were designed, manufactured, and tested by one factory. Intel was the representative of that era.
However, such a model has made some small enterprises bear a heavy burden, and many semiconductor entrepreneurs can only stand aside due to the huge construction cost of the production line.
After entering the 1980s, the chip industry began to see the phenomenon of cooperation in the division of labor, and in 1984, Zhang Zhongmou heard that there was a company specializing in chip design, and he thought that since there was a company specializing in design, then it would be possible to set up a factory specializing in wafer fabrication.
Soon after, Zhang Zhongmou's vision became a reality, and TSMC was born.
Taiwan Semiconductor focused on the "wafer-processing" single link, and did not engage in design, only providing foundry services for the manufacture of wafers.
At the time, Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) was just a small fish in front of the giant Intel.
In order to get capital support, Chang Zhongmou once approached Intel, but when Intel heard that TSMC only did the manufacturing process of the chip industry, it was obviously self-satisfied and looked down on TSMC, so it decisively refused to invest in TSMC.
Zhang Zhongmou also concluded that Intel at that time did not look down on the service of wafer fabrication.
It never occurred to me that the giant in the wafer manufacturing service industry that I looked down on in the past would also start to do wafer subcontracting.
So Zhang Zhongmou felt that Intel's entry into the foundry business was ironic.
TSMC is now worth more than Intel.
In the face of TSMC's strong offensive, Intel is also not afraid to stand still.
Now, TSMC is racing toward 3nm chips, while Intel is still stuck at 14nm from seven years ago.
It is not easy to catch up.
No way
By 19:06, it was sold out in 2 hours 😅
Today, we look at some of the "strange searches."
What is normal public opinion?
Randomly select three hot searches: February 2, the dragon rises, the price of Good Luck Friends rises, and the event of Hualala. The public opinion spreads and forms a peak, and then the [index drops] (smooth curve) finally dissipates. If there is secondary public opinion, there will be a small peak reappearing.
They look exactly like the "evolution model of network public opinion" that the Cyberspace Administration of China once displayed on its website.
What is an abnormal atmosphere?
Six hot searches in the same event were randomly selected, and the shapes of the "peak", "sawtooth" and "cliff" were presented.
The "孤峰状" means that it is artificially heated and quickly rises to the top of the hot search, attracting the attention of the public; the "sawtooth" means that it is cyclically heated, ensuring that the topic remains in the hot search list; the "cliff" means that it is collectively evacuated, and the hot search has played its "function", and it will receive a new task and rush to a new battlefield.
As shown in Figure 9, the heat wave of one event exactly coincided with the valley of another event, and the time difference was not more than a second. It must be that the batch of marines received the task and started a new offensive.
The professionalization of black public relations can be seen: dozens of hot searches are listed at the same time, which attract attention, which are responsible for popular science, which incite war, which divert attention, which affect cognition, which mislead judgment, which incite emotion, and which bind decision-making. Black accounts are operated in batches and nodes, and all elements of the spread of public opinion are considered.
Propaganda is a science, and leaving aside position, emotion, and all subjective factors, black public relations will not be able to escape.
Anyone who has walked through here has left a trace, and we are going to dig it up together.
Data source: Google Zeitgeist.
First cases of Omicron variant infection found in countries such as Mauritius - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, Dec. 12 (Xinhua) - A total of three countries, Mauritius, Cyprus and Malawi, have recently reported cases of infection with the Omicron variant of the new coronavirus.
Mauritius reported its first two cases of the Omicron variant on 10 December.
According to Health Minister Kailesh Jagutpal, the first case involved a visitor from South Africa who arrived in Mauritius on November 27; the second case involved a local resident who had contact with a person who had recently returned from South Africa and tested positive for the virus on November 30.
After being isolated in the hospital, the two patients tested negative for nucleic acid testing, and have returned to their respective places of residence.
Cyprus's health ministry announced on Monday that it had confirmed three cases of infection with the Omicron variant.
The three are students who returned from a trip abroad earlier this month and were not admitted to the hospital due to their mild symptoms.
In order to prevent the spread of the Omicron strain, the government of Serbia has continued to increase its prevention and control efforts.
From December 6 to January 10, all passengers aged 12 and above who enter the country by plane will have to pay for self-paid nucleic acid testing at the airport.
The Ministry of Health also announced on the 10th that it would start vaccinating children aged 5 to 11 in the country against the new coronavirus.
Malawi's health minister, Khumbize Chiponda, said on Wednesday that the country had for the first time recorded three cases of the Omicron variant.
The country's health department conducted genomic sequencing of 12 positive samples collected from November 9 to December 2, and found the three cases.
The delivery never came
All the rider's phone numbers were fake
I've already re-ordered
Will I get a refund on the last single?
If not, cancel the order and refund you.
I was thinking of ordering early so that I could eat early, but now it's 7 p.m. and I haven't eaten yet.
I don't understand what you're talking about.
Is your Chinese translated or do you prefer to use English?
That was sent to
Should I call him?
Dear valued customers!
Thank you for choosing to dine at Zhiyun Restaurant. Our mission is to provide you and your family with more delicious and convenient dishes, and better service. Your satisfaction and praise are our driving force!
Thank you for your 5-star review, I love you!
Thank you for choosing to dine at Cloud Restaurant and we are very sorry for the inconvenience caused.
At the same time, I would like to thank you for your real experience evaluation, so that we can find the shortcomings in time, we will definitely take effective measures to improve, strictly control the quality and quantity of the dishes, and I am the "little cloud" of the Cloud Restaurant, my phone number is 18912251735, and we are synchronized on WeChat. I look forward to seeing you again.
Dear valued customers, thank you for choosing Cloud 9 Restaurant for your dining experience. We sincerely apologize for the unpleasant dining experience caused by the problem with the dishes. We have communicated with the kitchen to strictly control the dishes, and thank you for your understanding and support. I am Little Cloud of Cloud 9 Restaurant. I look forward to seeing you again!
Going to a banquet and leaving with a good mood!
Dear customers, thank you for your evaluation and support for our "Little Cloud". When our carefully cooked dishes are well received by you, it is the happiest moment for us!
Looking forward to meeting you again
Dear beloved master, first of all, thank you for your recognition and evaluation. We will try our best to do better!
Secondly, we would like to thank you for your support and likes in your busy schedule, and wish you a happy meal and a good mood every day!
I don't think that's going to help!
It's money in the bank
The order is a claw
Okay, the number is #PHONENUMBER#.
Do I need to stay in the conversation?
I spoke to your staff on #NAME#.
Your rider told me the address was too far
360 Home Furnishings
Address: 156, No. 12, Floor 12, Happiness Home, South Ring Road
At first, it was a friend's introduction because of trust, so I chose to take a look. At first, my budget was 70,000 to do a basic renovation.
When you get to the store, it's a series of scams.
I was the first time to visit their office just to show them my floor plan, they didn't even go to measure the house, they actually quoted me that my 135 square meters house can be built for 70,000. I didn't know what kind of materials they were using.
Their second scam is that once you go to the store, they will drag you across the finish line and make you pay the deposit (and you will never see that money again, unless you have enough experience to out-argue them).
When I was hesitating whether to pay the deposit, they would invite their so-called manager to tell me that if I paid the deposit today, I would get a discount of how much.
This is a big pit, and I am an example of being cheated in the heat of the moment. I paid a deposit of more than 10,000.
He gave me a quote with a lot of problems - $70,000 not including water and electric, not including any doors or cabinets, and that's where the bulk of the cost is.
In addition to these, their service charge is also higher than other companies.
I lost trust in the company, and I signed a contract without being told anything.
When I went to get my money back, they acted like they knew what they were doing, with their own little team to deal with you.
No matter what, it's the customer's problem, and they have no responsibility.
All kinds of excuses, and a lot of details, I don't want to say one by one, it's all tears, in short, don't choose them, because my friend who hired them to decorate the house is also of poor quality, and they will charge you for various expenses later.
Damn, they were the original scam head decoration, now they've been changed into a big beauty, as if they've gone out of business again and changed into something else.
So, everyone should not choose such a despicable decoration company.
In the future, everyone should look up Baidu more when they choose. Because the renovation is not a small amount of money.
If you want to ask a merchant, please log in or register first
Prohibited the publication of various forms of business reviews, please see the merchant inclusion statement for details
Dazhong.com.cn Kunming Decoration Design Channel provides you with the latest merchant information such as the address, phone number and business hours of the beautiful 360 integrated home decoration, and find the decoration company to decorate the company, just go to Dazhong.com.cn
In less than 30 minutes, please cancel the order!
Is there no other way? Like, a new address?
Okay, then don't cancel this conversation. If I don't get my money back in five to 10 days, I'm going to pursue it.
I asked if it could be cancelled in 15 minutes.
The chicken was supposed to be cooked, but we received raw meat, so we couldn't eat it.
Starry sky has about 丨Double-star meteor shower on the 14th - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tianjin, Dec. 12 (Reporter Zhou Runjian) As the last large-scale meteor shower of the year, the Geminid meteor shower will peak on Dec. 14 in the Northern Hemisphere, and friends who like meteor showers can observe it after midnight on Dec. 14.
Beijing amateur astronomer An Hui captured the Gemini meteor shower in Qinghai on December 13, 2018.
Most of the parent bodies of the meteor showers are periodic comets, but the parent body of the Taurid meteor shower is 3200 Phaethon, an Apollo-type asteroid.
The Gemini meteor shower is also the second known meteor shower not to be spawned by a comet.
Mr. Xiu Lipeng, a board member of the Tianjin Astronomical Society and an expert in astronomical popularization, said that just like a blockbuster movie, the Geminid meteor shower usually appears at the end of the year, and the “showing schedule” can last from December 4 to 17.
This shower is noted for its high and steady rate, and along with the Leonids and the Orionids is one of the three major Northern Hemisphere showers.
One of the distinctive features of the Gemini meteor shower is that the meteor bodies are relatively slow, colorful, and there are many fireballs. It is suitable for visual observation and astronomical photography for beginners.
Yang Jing, an amateur astronomer in Tianjin, took a picture of the Gemini meteor shower on December 13, 2020.
The Geminid meteor shower is expected to peak around 15:00 GMT on December 14, with a ZHR (the number of meteors visible per hour in ideal observing conditions) of 150.
The Gemini meteor shower chart.
"Last year, the "Lyra" meteor shower left a deep impression on people, but this year, the "Lyra" meteor shower will be affected by the moon, and the quality will be slightly reduced.
On the 14th, the 11th of the lunar calendar is the full moon, and the bright moonlight will interfere with the observation. Fortunately, the moon will fall at night, and the radiation point of the Gemini meteor shower will also rise to a higher altitude.
Those who like to watch the meteor shower can do so for a few hours after the moon sets in the latter part of the night, but it is important to keep warm and well-protected. ”
How can we observe more meteors?
"It is not recommended to observe in the city, and one can choose a place with a high altitude, little light pollution, and an open view to the northeast, and then patiently wait for the moon to fall, and then observe visually.
Note that the flow of the Gemini meteor shower is very large in all directions, and you do not need to stare at the radiant point of the Gemini meteor shower all the time when observing.
Photographers who like to take pictures of meteor showers should choose a wide-angle lens with a large aperture, and use a high ISO and a large aperture when shooting.
Stability and durability are key considerations, so a tripod, extra battery and cable release are essential. "
Li Peng reminded.
What is the difference between laser TV and traditional TV?
According to my understanding, the traditional TV referred to by the author should be the liquid crystal TV, and the difference in market positioning between the laser TV and the liquid crystal TV is mainly as follows:
First, laser TV is more focused on the large-screen market.
Compared with the full-scale market positioning of liquid crystal television, laser television is obviously more focused on the large screen market, or laser television itself is a product born for large screens.
Currently, the mainstream LCD TV sizes are mostly in the range of 55 inches to 65 inches, and the size of the laser TV is generally above 75 inches, and the largest is more than 100 inches, which can fully meet the needs of users for large-screen color TVs.
In recent years, the proportion of global shipments and sales of laser televisions has been increasing, and the proportion in the overall television sales of more than 80 inches has exceeded 60%.
According to the prediction of Zhongyi Kang, the sales volume of laser TV in 2020 will grow by more than 140% and continue to maintain a high growth rate.
The reason why it has done so well in the large-screen market is mainly due to the excellent performance of laser televisions in eye protection.
Based on the imaging principle of laser television, the light emitted by the laser light source does not directly enter the eyeball, and the imaging process is closer to the imaging process under natural conditions, and the stimulation to the eyes is smaller.
The Xixi Laboratory of the China Electronics Standardization Research Institute and the ophthalmologist of Beijing Chao-Yang Hospital conducted a strict comparison experiment of watching laser television and liquid crystal television under the same conditions, and obtained 144 sets of test data.
The data proves that the laser TV has strong eye protection characteristics, and even has certain improvement effects in some aspects.
With eyesight health becoming more and more important, the laser TV not only attracted more and more users with its eye protection advantages, but also opened another breakthrough in the mobile phone market.
Second, laser TV is more focused on the high-end market.
In contrast to the falling prices of LCD TVs, the current prices of laser TVs are mostly above 10,000 yuan, and the prices are gradually rising as the size and light source are upgraded.
Why is a laser TV so expensive?
It's a reasonable thing to do.
With the continuous development of light sources and technology, laser TV has many advantages that cannot be achieved by liquid crystal TV and projection.
With the super short focal length projection technology, the projection distance of the laser television is shorter than that of the traditional projection device, and it can achieve a 100-inch big screen experience in a short distance, and the required space is small, and the host is small and occupies a small space.
In terms of brightness, the big brand laser TV can reach more than 2000 lumens.
In addition, the lower heat output means less wear on the equipment, and a longer life for the television.
In addition, many high-end laser TV models are equipped with true 4K ultra-high-definition picture quality, artificial intelligence systems, biomimetic screens and other cutting-edge technologies, which can provide users with a more shocking visual and auditory experience.
There is no such thing as fake demand, but the product of segmented demand. In terms of picture quality and input-output ratio, the laser television is not for the audio-visual players. It can be tried if you want to balance the big screen and the viewing environment. Everything has pros and cons, and you can judge yourself after weighing the pros and cons. I am afraid to believe one-sided words.
In short, the super-wide-angle close-up projector - the laser television - has to use expensive super-wide-angle lenses and mirrors to get close to the screen, which is not in accordance with the optical best design.
To shield some of the ambient light, a micro-structured Fresnel screen costs a lot of money, and a 80-inch price is about the same as a 65-inch LCD.
And one more thing, I really hate it when projector manufacturers use "eye-safe" as a selling point. Come on, the light on the screen that the eye can see is direct light, and the light that bounces off the ceiling is not. Why do you have to make it look like a liquid crystal TV is also "eye-safe"?
And, if the projection screen isn't a mirror, it won't work.
The hot spot effect of the high gain screen was ignored, and a large amount of light was reflected back to the eyes at a certain angle, which was really uncomfortable.
The visual aesthetics photography gallery has selected the quality stores temporarily, and there is no store yet.
After adding WeChat, the little sister arranged the time for me to choose, and the reply was very timely.
Before going, I looked at the works in the store, which were mostly outdoor wedding photos, and they were very beautiful. There were many styles of shooting involved.
After arriving that day, I simply communicated with the little sister about my ideas. She was very patient and helped me try on two styles of clothes that I was indecisive about. In the end, I decided to start makeup and styling. The photographer will arrange some props before shooting, guide the action, and pay attention to every detail.
But maybe because I didn't share my specific ideas with him, it didn't come out the way I wanted it to, but it should be good.
After the shoot, the photographer will help you choose the photos, communicate about the post-production style, which is quite thoughtful.
It takes about half a month to heal, and wait for the effect~
The second time I won the photo banquet activity - most of the clothes can be selected for shooting.
Finally, she chose a black gauze skirt, to experience different styles.
The whole shooting process takes about 2 hours, and the makeup and shooting are responsible for the photographer who is 95 years old. I feel a little shy, and I hope that in the future, I can give more advice on the customer's shooting action guidance. It is quite talkative. The shooting process is quite happy.
Visual Aesthetics Photography Museum Preferred Quality Stores Reply
And check out Queenie on the home page!
When I arrived, I filled out a form with my name, phone number and email address. I was then shown to a dressing room, where I tried on three or four dresses. I was very patient while trying on the dresses, and then I had my makeup and hair done for a long time. The service was good, and they taught me how to pose for the photos. I felt that my face was very big, and it took half a month and three days to receive the photos. I felt that there was no difference from the original film.
【Environment】Overall, it was okay.
There are many optional clothes.
There are three makeup rooms, one of which is a studio.
【Service】is very warm and thoughtful.
The stylists are very patient.
The photographer will also teach you the moves.
If you are not satisfied, the photographer will also offer to reshoot.
【Experience】Maybe the styling is a bit over the top, with the original double eyelids replaced with three.
The eyebrows have been plucked too, which is a bit embarrassing for those who don't draw their eyebrows every day.
The pictures have been taken for ten days, but the effect is not very good. I feel that the double eyelid stickers are still very obvious.
Because I wasn't sure what style I wanted, I tried two, and I ended up choosing the black dress. The little girl said that this set was quite retro and vintage.
After choosing the clothes, I started to do makeup and hair. The hairstylist and makeup artist are very patient and the effect is very good.
After I did my makeup, I started taking pictures. The photographer was directing me the whole time, and the process was very easy and harmonious.
After the shoot, I carefully selected four of my favorite photos and asked my little brother to edit them in 15 minutes. The ending was very satisfactory.
No response for 3 days... because your system can't recognize my credit card, so I can't join the #PRS_ORG# plus monthly plan!
The strangest thing is that I used the same credit card every time I paid.
I now have to pay for shipping every time.
Can I waive my monthly fee until you finish your investigation, and then collect my monthly fee?
Is it worth buying umbrella insurance?
Umbrella is an online insurance broker platform.
From the perspective of setting conditions: According to the "Regulations on the Supervision of Insurance Brokerage Institutions (Revised in 2015)", in order to become an insurance brokerage company, it must meet three keywords: shareholders, founders must have no major violations in the past three years, the minimum registered capital must be RMB 500 million, and it must be approved by the China Insurance Regulatory Commission.
These three are actually quite strict. In summary, they require strength, approval from the national authority of the China Banking and Insurance Regulatory Commission (supervising insurance companies and banks nationwide), and good corporate governance on the part of the shareholders. As a small umbrella insurance company, the policyholder does not need to worry too much about whether the small umbrella insurance is legitimate or not, because there are these three requirements.
At this point, it is good, it is reliable.
From the insurance product perspective: small umbrella insurance is an insurance supermarket, many of the company's star critical illness insurance are sold on this platform, such as the newly launched and泰超级玛丽5号重疾险，赔方和承保方都是和泰寿险，小雨伞保险只是第三方中介，不用质疑它的可靠性。
From the payment mode: Internet platform products, because of the lack of operating costs of business outlets and the cost of business employees, so the Internet products are generally more cost-effective, and the payment mode is flexible, supporting monthly payment, which relieves the pressure of the insured's payment, and at the same time can maximize the leverage of insurance.
That's a good thing.
It's something to consider.
From the perspective of professionalism: this is particularly important, because insurance is a very professional industry, and many Internet product customers can self-insure, which will lead to many misunderstandings. In the health disclosure and profession, non-insurance personnel tend to add their own subjective awareness when they self-insure, which may lead to many hidden risks of claims.
I myself have done insurance phone sales for "Tencent Micro Insurance" (just like the umbrella umbrella, which is also an Internet insurance broker platform), and I am very responsible in telling everyone.
Internet insurance is true and reliable, and the unreliable is people. The Internet channel does not have professional staff, and there are many sales misguidance.
For example: 1 yuan insurance covers 600 million, buy insurance and get a mobile phone, free to receive 60,000 critical illness insurance, these marketing strategies are not wrong, but they are evasive, they will not tell the policyholder, the first month is charged at the normal rate, and the second month is charged at the normal rate, and the amount is about 100 to 200, and many customers do not know what they are buying.
He thought he could spend $1 and the insurance company would pay $6 million (天下掉馅饼).
Free mobile phones are only given to special insurance policy numbers such as 6666, 8888, and so on, and if the winning message is sent, you do not exchange it yourself, and no one reminds you.
(This is another pitfall for the insured person) Free of charge to receive 600,000 extra health insurance, is short-term, if only relying on this, without other commercial insurance, in the event of a serious illness, what is the use of 6 universal insurance, can not solve the problem, life begins to be naked.
The government is also cracking down on misleading sales of internet insurance.
So, in general, the platform is not a problem, the products are not a problem, the problem is the professionalism and professional ethics of the sales staff.
The author suggests that the main should be comprehensive and cautious, and the products of many offline insurance brokers are more comprehensive and customers can choose more opportunities and products, and the cost performance of some products is better than that of Internet products.
I have helped 59 Internet customers to purchase offline products, and saved each of them 2,000-3,000 yuan per year.
If you have any questions, please feel free to contact me.
I am a licensed insurance broker with more than 3 years of experience in enterprise management training, and I have served more than 1,000 corporate users. I have cooperated with more than 100 insurance companies and customized insurance products for customers according to their needs. During the insurance process, I will compare three insurance companies to help customers get the best insurance results. After the insurance, I will help customers to sort out the insurance policies and manage the insurance policies, so that customers can rest assured and worry-free.
Grow with each customer for their lifetime.
I hope my answer is helpful to the questioner!
According to the definition of insurance supervision department, Internet insurance is insurance business that can complete all insurance procedures after clicking on the insurance link of the policyholder.
In this process, the policyholder does not need to sign, and the insurance advisor does not need to sign. All steps can be completed by the policyholder himself.
Internet insurance is not as "ceremonial" as traditional insurance, and may not even have a printed paper contract, but this does not affect the validity and legal effect of the electronic contract.
This model is somewhat similar to the "telemarketing" style of sales, but there is a fatal flaw to buying insurance in this way, and that is that follow-up service may not be able to keep up.
Insurance is usually a long-term contract that lasts for decades. When we buy insurance, shouldn't we think carefully about whether the "intermediary" we choose can be with us for a long time and provide us with services in the future?
How can I contact the delivery person?
It's already almost 3 p.m.
Is that going to give me compensation?
I said I'd knock and deliver
But the rider left them on the doorstep and walked away
And they sent it wrong.
Your rider has already delivered my takeaway to #NUMBER# but I'm still waiting.
Rider received my order at 7:25 pm but would not leave
Should I get anything else to eat?
What to do
Where did your rider go?
And wait for what?
I'm going to deliver.
Well, if you don't cancel, I'll call the police
But my food would be a health and safety hazard.
Classic Sword Appreciation Guide Gold-Bound Collector's Edition【正版图书 无忧售后】
【Original books, lightning delivery, quality worry-free, can issue invoices】
Classic Emblem Appreciation Guide + Classic Sword and Knife Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Uniform Appreciation Guide Gold Edition 3 Volumes World Military Books Classic Military Badges Performance Introduction Military Uniforms Swords and Knives
China Painting Appraisal Collection Strategy Nine Lectures【Original Book, Fast Delivery】
【满额立减 下单速发 可开发票 正版图书】
Western swords and swords: appreciation and collection [original book, lightning delivery]
Piano Skills Practice Guide【正版书籍 闪电发货】
Industrial Design Hand-drawn Masterpiece Creative Implementation + Industry Guide + Performance Luo Jian, Li Yu, Liang Jun, Qinghua University Press [Original book, lightning delivery]
Chinese antiques auction highlights: porcelain in English【Original book, lightning delivery】
Nine Songs Map【Original Book, Fast Delivery】
The Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream of the
Chinese Painting History【Original book, fast delivery】
Woodblock Prints of Birds and Flowers【Original book, fast delivery】
Realism and Chinese films in the 1980s (book)
Chinese flag design 1【Original book, lightning delivery】
Grass Flower Poem Collection【Original Book, Fast Delivery】
Swords of Legends 02: Einherjar【正版图书 无忧售后】
Song Jianfeng - Miniature of Personage Painting (Original book, lightning delivery)
Good law and good governance - institutional history and public administration
The 20th Anniversary Commemorative Edition of “Lectures on History and Culture for Party Leading Cadres” by Wang Chunyu, Zhang Daxie, Xiong Zhaozheng, Ge Jianxiong, Deng Xiaonan and 14 renowned historians, cultural celebrities and eminent scholars
All you need to do is to re-enter the discount code.
No problem, remember that there is no need to arrange for re-delivery, I have already bought more, I don't want to waste
Thanks for your help
I have always opposed any form of abuse and bullying, and I cannot accept this kind of personal attack.
In a civilized society, we can accept everything, but we must eradicate this scoundrel.
If you don't look at the parties and factions, the first thing to resist is this kind of uncivilized style.
From the moment you started sending me Facebook friend requests, to the mocking posts that followed, to now trying to publish my home address and my father's name on social media, I have chosen not to respond.
Afterward, you doubled down on your efforts to tag me every few hours, and continued to post on Facebook and with your so-called friends about my cryptic, humiliating remarks about my looks, my body, my lifestyle, and whether or not I like strawberries in the sack. I...don't.
I didn't know that later I would receive multiple friend requests on Facebook from friends who uploaded a photo of me and made sexual comments about me.
I'm sorry, as a woman, I can no longer remain silent.
After I posted my story, you didn't calm down, you got more and more belligerent.
I don't care what your political background is, or what your social status is, in our society, it is necessary to respect both genders.
Yes, you can continue with this mocking, cryptic, humiliating, abusive, insulting speech, you can continue to say that you only care and are concerned about me, you can continue to think that this is not harassment, you can even continue to deny that it is your drawing, and you can continue to publish all of this hateful speech.
Yes, I can't and I won't.
I don't know you, I don't want to know you, and my looks and my figure don't need you to comment on them.
I don't think any girl would want to be so publicly humiliated for the sake of being famous.
A friend asked me how I was doing.
I said I wouldn't believe you.
I don't think any one of those girls would be able to say they were okay after something like that.
It doesn't matter if it's in the workplace, in society, in politics or in business, it's only those who have no basic decency who will choose to hurt any one woman in this way.
I believe in justice.
I have transcribed some of the comments for you to review.
Your own posts shouldn't be able to be impersonated.
I can only say you are a public enemy of civility
A smile of the heart
Vietnam News - Prime Minister Nguyen Tan Dung attends the 3rd Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum
Two major conferences were held during the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum, discussing topics around digital technology enterprises and national digital transformation, digital technology enterprises and the economic recovery and development after the COVID-19 pandemic.
Nguyen Manh Hung, Minister of Information and Communications, said that in 2021, despite the continued spread of the COVID-19 pandemic, the number and revenue of digital technology enterprises in Vietnam continued to grow, reaching nearly 10 percent.
In 2021, the number of typical digital products in Vietnam has been cultivated and concentrated to solve the major problems faced by Vietnam, and many digital products have been exported. Vietnam's digital technology ranking has also improved.
Minister Ruan Mengxiong called on digital technology enterprises to take on the responsibility of developing the national digital transformation platform, and the task of developing these national digital platforms is to fulfill the mission of the country.
At the forum, leaders of departments and state agencies, enterprises, organizations and individuals who have researched, developed, applied and transferred digital technologies shared their ideas and solutions to mobilize and gather resources of the whole society to develop Vietnamese technology enterprises, join hands to promote the country's digital transformation, and recover the economy after the outbreak of COVID-19.
Premier Li Keqiang emphasized at the forum that digital transformation is the world's inevitable path and an objective demand for development.
Digital transformation has become a global issue, and digital transformation services are universal. Therefore, it is necessary to mobilize the whole population to participate.
People and enterprises are the core, subject, target and driving force of digital transformation.
Therefore, all policies should be for the people and enterprises.
Premier Li Keqiang emphasized that digital transformation should reflect the spirit of the nation, and should be led by domestic strength, strategic, long-term and decisive factors, and important and breakthrough factors.
He also believes that digital transformation should drive the development towards in-depth and sustainable development, participate in the prevention and control of the new coronavirus pneumonia, economic recovery and development, respond to the changes after the epidemic, overcome the phenomenon of natural resource depletion, and help the green transformation and development of green energy.
The digital transformation requires participating in the establishment of databases for the protection and promotion of national cultural values, historical traditions, national landscapes and folk customs, and promoting the digital transformation of banking, taxation, land management and development, logistics and other fields.
The ultimate goal of digital transformation is to make the people happier and the country more prosperous and developed.
Prime Minister Phan Minh Chanh asked all levels of government, all levels of agencies and enterprises to increase their leadership and guidance in developing digital technology, raise their awareness of digital transformation, continue to formulate and perfect the system of digital transformation, and strengthen national management and promote the development of digital technology enterprises in a spirit of respect, communication, listening, positivity and initiative.
During the forum, Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attended the 2021 “Vietnamese Made” Excellent Digital Product Award Ceremony and the Opening Ceremony of the “Vietnamese Made” Digital Product Exhibition.
I reported it and provided pictures, but have not received a response
What a cow, no cow
It's chicken soup and raw meat.
You can't eat it
You make sure it's fresh, not old?
unacceptable
They had already placed an order early in the morning.
It was said to be delivered at around 7 p.m.
Why remake it?
It's ridiculous
“Zhihui Xiangxiang” 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Talent Summit Opening - Rolling News - Hunan Daily Net - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily, December 10 (full media reporter Zhou Zhiheng) On the 9th, the “Zhihui Xiangxi” 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Talent Summit opened in Zhuzhou.
Wang Cheng, a member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and the Secretary of the Provincial Organization Department, attended the launch ceremony and made a speech.
Wang Cheng pointed out that the holding of the talent summit is an important measure to implement the spirit of the Central Talent Work Conference and the 12th Provincial Party Congress, which shows that Hunan attaches great importance to talents, craves for talents, and makes good use of talents.
Hunan has a good tradition of loving, respecting and caring for talents, a broad platform for developing talents, and an environment for realizing a better life. In recent years, it has implemented the talent-led development strategy in depth, with the Fuling Talent Action Plan as the driving force, to build a talent work pattern from nurturing to retention, which has become a fertile land for talent growth, a hotbed for innovation and entrepreneurship, and a pleasant place to live and work.
At present, Hunan is fully implementing the strategic positioning and mission tasks of “three highs and four new”, and will further open the door to attract and recruit talents, issue more preferential policies for talent innovation and entrepreneurship, concentrate more resources, and create better conditions, so as to welcome outstanding talents from all walks of life to join in and contribute to the high-quality development of Hunan.
The exhibition site set up Changsha, Zhuzhou, Xiangtan exhibition halls and Hunan Free Trade Test Zone exhibition halls. The Hunan Science and Technology Department, the Hunan Ministry of Industry and Information Technology, and the Hunan Ministry of Human Resources and Social Security released the list of key demands for technological innovation in advanced manufacturing and the list of demands for intelligent manufacturing industry talents and the list of demands for intelligent manufacturing industry young talents.
48 large enterprises such as China CNR Corporation, China North Locomotive and Rolling Stock Corporation, and Yuan Da Technology gathered talents on the spot, and more than 1,000 relevant professional graduates and social talents participated in the talent project docking.
Hi
Just placed an order, and it shows the rider is waiting in the restaurant, but the restaurant says the order is ready and no rider has been seen
Can you follow up on that, because I'm kind of in a rush, thank you
It is possible to be late by half an hour without explanation
In fact, do you have a solution?
The editor brings you the eight-mile-long which is good?
1) [Brewery direct sales] Ningcheng Bailihuang old cellar 42 degrees 500ML concentrated type sorghum original white wine, mouth feel soft old wine, whole box four bottles
The recommendation reason: Selected sorghum as raw material, using traditional technology to brew, the white wine from Inner Mongolia plateau, the taste is more classic, concentrated and sweet, bitter and sweet, rich in layers, the use of traditional solid-state white wine process, retained its original juice and flavor, let the wine body with rich and thick taste.
This grade 1, capacity 500, storage method is normal temperature, cool, dry, ventilated place, other packaging, alcohol strength 42, strong aroma, Inner Mongolia province, product weight (kg) 2.9, currently has 4 comments, with a 100% approval rate.
2. Ningcheng Bailihe Old Cellar, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white wine, 52 degrees of white
Recommended reason: After years of aging, it is more concentrated and more transparent, and is the favorite liquor of the nomadic people in Inner Mongolia. The strong aroma is inherited from the traditional brewing process, and it is intoxicated by the simple and kind nature of the Chinese people. It is suitable for various banquets or home use.
The capacity is 5000ml, the packaging is in a jar, the product weight (kg) is 8, the fragrance is strong, the storage method is ventilation, the province is Inner Mongolia, the grade is first grade, the alcohol content is 52, and there are currently 50+ people who have evaluated it, with a 95% positive rating.
3,【Brewery Direct】Ningcheng Bailihuang old cellar 42 degrees 500ML concentrated type sorghum original white wine mouth feeling soft old wine whole box six bottles
Reasons for recommendation: This white wine is made from ecological brewing of high-quality sorghum. The fragrance is coordinated, and it is fermented and aged in the cellar. The taste is more fragrant.
The Baijiu from the plateau of Inner Mongolia has a more classic taste, and the fragrance of the concentrated flavor flows over the guests' lips and teeth, allowing them to enjoy it.
Reasons for recommendation: Selected high-quality sorghum, processed by unique craftsmanship, so that you can drink freely at the banquet and the family gathering.
The home of the high-speed train
Location: 555 N. Belvidere Road, Rockford, IL 61101
The home appliances here are quite complete, and there are many brands. The well-known brands are all there.
On the 12th, I went to the "Houston" water purifier store to see the water purifier. The store was having an activity, and the prices were cheaper.
There are a total of 11 floors in the house, from the second floor to the ninth floor, and the first and second floors are all parking places. During the day, parking is free!
It's not a nice area, there are only a few hardware stores and the food is average.
This elevator is also very useless, just like the one with the big disease, going up and down from minus two to minus one, back and forth, making me press the same floor over and over again, from the safety channel to the first floor, it is also very useless, directly to a furniture store, the furniture store is closed, the safety channel can't get out!
It's still a work in progress, and there's a lot of places that haven't been developed.
Address: 555 N. High-Speed Blvd., San Ysidro, CA 92173, convenient transportation, large parking lot, free during the day.
Environment: To be honest, the store is large, with 8-9 floors, and you can buy furniture, household appliances, and various small things... at home. Many famous brands have set up shops in the store, such as Muxi, Oppa, Huadi, Boss, Feng Chuang Zhi Hua, Hanson, Jacques, Yue Bing, Silang, Fu Pin Ju, Wan Jia Le, Natural, Zhong Lian, Mei Di, Yadan... There are so many brands, I can only remember a few of them. It is a good place to buy products. If you are tired of shopping, you can sit on the sofa to rest.
Recently, I wanted to buy a set of comfortable sofas. My friend said that there are many sofas to choose from here. I looked at Gujiajia Home and Meikem Home. I felt that it was OK, but the price was a little expensive, so I was still hesitating.
You can get the latest merchant information, such as the address, phone number, business hours, etc. of the high-speed home of Urumqi, and find a decoration company by using the Urumqi home channel of Meituan Dianping.
Already sent to my guests, #PRS_ORG# can't be completed
It's over, it's over
If it can be delivered in 20 minutes, it's not cancelled.
The mainstream of the Yangtze River realizes the full coverage of the water-green comprehensive service area - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Wuhan, December 11 (Reporter Wang Xian) On the 10th, the Chongqing Fuling Water-based Green Comprehensive Service Area was put into operation as scheduled, which is the second water-based green comprehensive service area in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River after the Fuzhou Water-based Green Comprehensive Service Area in Sichuan Province was put into operation on the 8th.
This has covered the upper, middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River.
Mr. Qiu Jianhua, deputy director of the Yangtze River Navigation Management Bureau of the Ministry of Transport, introduced that previously, 10 water-green comprehensive service areas had been built and operated in the middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River in Hubei, Hunan, Jiangxi, Anhui, Jiangsu and other provinces, which were well received by river pilots and played an important role in promoting the high-quality development of Yangtze River navigation.
The full coverage of the Yangtze River Green Comprehensive Service Zone is another milestone in the construction of the Yangtze River Green Shipping. The receiving and service capacity of Yangtze River ships have been significantly improved.
It is reported that the water-green comprehensive service area is an important facility that provides all-round production and life services for the vast ships and sailors, and helps the vast sailors solve the problems of “urgent, difficult and hope”.
The two water-based green comprehensive service areas on the upper reaches of the Yangtze River, which have been completed and put into operation this time, integrate the services of life, production and government, with the theme of green and environmental protection, and the features of ship repair and ship emergency rescue services, so as to realize the “ one berth, multiple services ” of ships in the port, which will make the work of the crew on the Yangtze River more efficient and the life of the crew more convenient.
The U.S. Navy's three aircraft carriers have gathered in the vicinity of China, the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam, and the U.S. media reported that the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam. The U.S. media also reported that the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam. The U.S. media reported that the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam. The U.S. media reported that the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam. The U.S. media reported that the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam. The U.S. media reported that the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam. The U.S. media reported that the most powerful weapons in the U.S. arsenal have made a rare visit to the island of Guam.
According to the South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform of the Chinese think tank, on January 9, a satellite found the U.S. aircraft carrier USS Carl Vinson near the Bab-el-Mandeb Strait.
The Balabac Strait connects the South China Sea and the Sulu Sea, and is a strategic point on the first island chain in the western Pacific.
The platform is expected to deploy the "Carl Vinson" in the South China Sea.
This is the first deployment of the USS Carl Vinson with F-35C fighters and CMV-22 "Osprey" cargo aircraft.
The USS Carl Vinson and the USS Abraham Lincoln, which departed San Diego on January 3, are also in the Pacific.
The USS Lincoln also carried the first F-35C Marine Corps squadron, the 314 Marine Fighter Attack Squadron.
In addition to the two carriers mentioned above, the US Navy currently has the “Ronald Reagan” (USS Ronald Reagan) carrier stationed in Yokosuka, Japan.
The carrier battle group also includes the guided-missile cruiser USS Lake Champlain and the guided-missile destroyer USS Stockdale.
The U.S. Navy's three aircraft carriers have gathered in the South China Sea, and the latest satellite images released by the South China Sea Strategic Situation Awareness Platform on January 17 show that the U.S. Navy's three aircraft carriers are gathering in the South China Sea.
(weibo @South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception) The US three aircraft carriers gathered in the vicinity of China, and the most powerful weapons were rare to visit the island of Guam in 2022. On January 17, 2022, the flight route of the U.S. CMV-22B transport aircraft.
(weibo@Nanhai Strategic Situation Perception) According to CNN on January 17, the most powerful weapon in the U.S. Navy's arsenal made a rare visit to Guam over the weekend.
The Ohio-class nuclear submarine USS Nevada, carrying 20 Trident ballistic missiles and dozens of nuclear warheads, arrived at the U.S. naval base in Guam on Saturday (Jan. 15).
The USS Ronald Reagan, USS Nimitz and USS Theodore Roosevelt are operating in the Western Pacific as part of a regularly scheduled rotation of U.S. forces in the region.
This is the first visit to Guam by a U.S. ballistic missile submarine since 2016 and the second public visit to Guam since the 1980s.
The three US aircraft carriers have gathered in the vicinity of China, and the most powerful weapons are rare to visit the island of Guam. In recent years, China has built a large number of military facilities in the Spratly Islands.
The picture shows Yongshui Island in the Nansha Islands.
(The South China Sea Research Forum) The U.S. Navy said in a statement that the visit of the Ohio-class nuclear submarine "Nevada" to Guam strengthened cooperation between the United States and its allies in the region, demonstrated the U.S. ability, flexibility, readiness and commitment to the security and stability of the Indo-Pacific region.
Ballistic missile submarines are often called "boomer subs."
The whereabouts of the 14 U.S. Navy "Sea Dragon" submarines are usually kept secret.
The secret of the submarine-launched ballistic missile made the "Thunderbolt submarine" the most important survival weapon in the triad, which also included land-based ballistic missiles in the United States and bombers carrying nuclear bombs such as B-2 and B-52.
When asked about Meta's recent 26% drop and $251 billion market value evaporation, Zuckerberg responded, "We're facing unprecedented competition." Why?
Meta (formerly Facebook) is essentially an ad company, with revenue primarily coming from ads. Today's profitable ad companies have their own distribution channels.
Facebook, Instagram, WhatsApp and other functions are all traffic channels for Meta.
Not only that, Meta is the largest “ad alliance”, many apps are using Meta’s ads, and through Meta’s advertising platform to achieve monetization.
But times have changed.
First, because of Apple's privacy policy changes, Meta is unable to obtain user data information, which has affected the efficiency of ad placement.
Apple's current privacy policy is very user-friendly, and will clearly prompt users whether an app can access their information, and most people's normal reaction is to say no.
If Google were to strike again, the impact on Meta's revenue would be even greater.
Second, the China factor in Meta's revenue growth has weakened (the weight of this factor is uncertain, but it does exist).
Everybody knows that Meta doesn't have a business in China, but that's not really true.
At least 10% of Meta's revenue comes from China every year, mainly from companies that do business in China.
Meta has about 500 people in its Hong Kong office, and a few dozen agents in mainland China.
Chinese companies want to expand overseas markets, and Meta is the only advertising channel that cannot be bypassed. Most of the money burned is given to Meta.
Interestingly, TT is now one of Meta's main competitors, but over the past two years, Meta has made a lot of money from TT.
Domestic agencies are helping ByteAds go to Meta to advertise, and Meta's performance in Greater China is also very good.
I haven't been specifically looking into it, but I'm sure it won't be better than before.
Chinese companies have already passed the stage of large-scale spending abroad.
Third, the new channels of traffic expansion are not smooth.
Facebook is getting older, and new platforms, including TT, are not in Meta's hands.
The biggest problem is not just falling incomes, but a lack of expectations of growth.
Capital markets are not just looking at income, they are looking at what the future looks like.
Clearly, Meta's expectations were not met.
To tell a new story to the market, Zuckerberg told "The Metaverse."
The metaverse is indeed one of the future directions, but the implementation cycle of the metaverse is relatively long, and this story should not be able to support Meta's market value in the next two years.
So the next couple of years are going to be pretty tough for Meta.
Don't be fooled by Facebook's current look of success, with $100 billion to $200 billion in annual revenue, the company is in the midst of a major crisis, and it has no good moat to protect it like other Internet companies and high-tech companies.
While his social apps have a lot of daily active users and are mainstream social apps like Facebook, WhatsApp, etc., they don't have a lot of confidence in the face of TikTok's rapid development. It's just a blink of an eye.
And the concept of a metaverse, which is a concept that is so far-fetched that it has no chance of working in the short term, Facebook is very dangerous, and that's why Zuckerberg is changing the name of the company, and that's why he's always looking for the next thing, but I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's going in the wrong direction. I think he's
Article 17 The State shall implement a registration and licensing management system for registered fire engineers.
The personnel who have obtained the certificate of Grade I or Grade II registered fire engineer can practice under the name of registered fire engineer after registration.
Article 18 The Fire and Rescue Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security is a registration and approval department for first-class registered fire engineers.
The provincial, autonomous region and municipality directly under the central government public security organs and fire departments are the registration and approval departments for the second-level registered fire engineer qualification, and are responsible for the preliminary review of the registration of the first-level registered fire engineer qualification.
Article 19 Persons who have obtained a Grade I or Grade II registered fire engineer qualification certificate and applied for registration shall be employed by an approved fire technology service agency or a fire safety key unit, and shall submit the registration application materials to the public security fire department of the place where the employing unit is located (the employing unit is a subsidiary of the enterprise, and the registration is submitted to the place of registration of the enterprise).
Article 20. The public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the central government shall, after receiving the registration application materials of the applicant, inform the applicant in person or in writing within 5 working days whether the application materials are incomplete or do not comply with the statutory form. If the applicant is not informed within the specified time, the application shall be deemed to have been accepted from the date of receipt of the application materials.
For the registration application accepted or not accepted, a written certificate with the stamp of the fire department of the public security organ at the local level and the date shall be issued.
Article 21 From the date of receipt of the application for registration of the first-level registered fire engineer and the registration approval of the second-level registered fire engineer, the public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the central government shall complete the preliminary review of the application materials for the registration of the first-level registered fire engineer and the registration approval of the second-level registered fire engineer, and report the application materials for the registration of the first-level registered fire engineer and the preliminary review opinions to the Fire Control Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security for approval.
The Public Security Bureau should make a decision within 20 working days from the date of receipt of the application materials and preliminary review opinions submitted by the provincial public security fire department.
If the application is not approved within the stipulated time, the applicant should be informed of the extended time and the reasons.
Any decision not to approve should be explained in writing, and the applicant should be informed of the right to apply for an administrative review or to file an administrative lawsuit in accordance with the law.
Article 22 The registration approval department shall issue and deliver the corresponding level registration certificate within 10 working days from the date of the approval decision.
Article 23 The registration certificate shall be valid for three years.
The registration certificate is a professional certificate of the registered fire engineer, which is kept and used by the registered fire engineer himself.
Article 24 Applicants for initial registration shall apply within one year from the date of obtaining the qualification certificate of Grade I or Grade II fire engineer.
Applicants who apply for initial registration after the deadline must meet the continuing education requirements.
The specific methods of registration management, including initial registration, continued registration, change of registration, cancellation of registration and non-registration, shall be separately stipulated by the Ministry of Public Security.
Section 25. Continuing education is a prerequisite for the renewal, re-registration and late initial registration of registered fire engineers.
Each level of registered fire engineer should complete the corresponding continuing education according to the regulations within each registration period.
Article 26 The registration approval department shall timely announce the registration of fire engineers to the society, establish the fire engineer registration credit file, and exercise credit management over their professional activities.
Article 27 The registration management departments of various levels of registered fire engineers should strictly implement the relevant provisions of the Administrative License Law of the People's Republic of China.
This is the end of today's exam information sharing, and I hope it can help you.
Everyone must work hard to prepare for the exam and strive to pass the fire engineer exam as soon as possible!
Real-time access to the latest financial/accounting/architecture exam information.
I cancelled... I've waited so long
You keep pushing it off.
But the whole box of chicken soup is raw meat, and it can't be eaten. Can it be refunded?
Pineapple, eggs, and steamed buns have not arrived, and #PRS_ORG# has refunded #NUMBER# yuan.
But is water chicken refundable?
Because you can't eat if you're born
Can I cancel if I want to?
The joint exercise of the two armies of China and Vietnam "Peace Rescue-2021" ended successfully - Xinhua News Agency
On December 12 (Zhou Na, Teng Huijian), the Chinese contingent participating in the “Peace Rescue-2021” joint exercise with the Vietnam People’s Army returned to China’s Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region, marking the successful completion of the seven-day training mission.
In this joint operation, the two armies of China and Vietnam focused on the major theme of humanitarian medical rescue, and closely followed the mission of rescue and relief, and completed the content of joint command, joint on-site rescue, and batch treatment of casualties according to the standard of actual combat. It effectively improved the capability of the two armies' rescue and relief.
The exercise results were praised by the Chinese and Vietnamese armies.
The commander of the Vietnam People's Army Logistics Department, Mr. Nguyen Xuan Sheng, said at the closing ceremony of the exercise that through this exercise, the Vietnamese military doctors learned the knowledge of exercise organization and professional activities from the Chinese military doctors, and also saw the medical and support equipment of the Chinese side.
The results of the exercise demonstrated the professional capabilities of the two countries' military medical forces in medical assistance and epidemic prevention.
Chen Chunming, deputy director of the Health Bureau of the Logistics Support Department of the Central Military Commission, said that the exercise was another breakthrough and innovation practice based on the success of the 2018 joint medical service activities. It has very important significance.
During the exercise, the Chinese People's Liberation Army donated medical protective masks, medical protective clothing, rapid nucleic acid detection instruments and other health and epidemic prevention materials to the Vietnam People's Army.
